Vol. I. B
THE PRAIRIE.
CHAPTER I.
I pray thee, shepherd, if that love, or gold
Can in this desert place buy entertainment,
Bring us where we may rest ourselves and feed.
As you like it
.
Much
was said and written, at the time, concerning
the policy of adding the vast regions of Louisiana, to
the, already, immense and but half-tenanted
territories
of the United States. As the warmth of
controversy
,
however, subsided, and personal considerations
gave place to more liberal views, the wisdom of the
measure began to be, generally, conceded. It soon
became apparent to the meanest capacity, that, while
nature had placed a barrier of desert to the extension
of our population in the west, the measure had made
us the masters of a belt of fertile country, which, in
the revolutions of the day, might have become the
property of a rival nation. It gave us the sole
command
of the great thoroughfare of the interior, and
placed the countless tribes of savages, who lay along
our borders, entirely, within our control; it
reconciled
conflicting rights, and quieted national distrusts;
it opened a thousand avenues to the inland trade, and
to the waters of the Pacific; and, if ever time or
necessity
should require a peaceful division of this vast
empire, it assures us of a neighbour that would
possess
our language, our religion, our institutions, and
it is also to be hoped, our sense of political justice.
Although the purchase was made in 1803, the spring
of the succeeding year was permitted to open, before
the official prudence of the Spaniard, who held the
province for his European master, admitted the
authority
,
or even of the entrance, of its new
proprietors
.
But the forms of the transfer were no sooner
completed, and the new government acknowledged,
than swarms of that restless people, which is ever
found hovering on the skirts of American society,
plunged into the thickets that fringed the right bank
of the Mississippi, with the same careless hardihood,
as had, already, sustained so many of them in their
toilsome progress from the atlantic states, to the
eastern
shores of the father of rivers.
Time was necessary to blend the numerous and
affluent colonists of the lower province with their
new compatriots; but the sparser and more humble
population, above, was almost immediately
swallowed
in the vortex which attended the tide of instant
emigration. The inroad from the east was a new and
sudden out-breaking of a people, who had endured a
momentary restraint, after having been rendered,
nearly, resistless by success. The toils and hazards
of former undertakings were forgotten, as these
endless
and unexplored regions, with all their fancied as
well as real advantages, were laid open to their
enterprise
.
The consequences were such as might easily
have been anticipated, from so tempting an offering,
placed, as it was before the eyes of a race long
trained
in adventure and nurtured in difficulties.
Thousands of the elders, of what were then called
the New States, broke up from the enjoyment of their
hard earned indulgencies, and were to be seen leading
long files of descendants, born and reared in the
forests
of Ohio and Kentucky, deeper into the land, in
quest of that which might be termed, without the aid
of poetry, their natural and more congenial
atmosphere
.
The distinguished and resolute forester who
first penetrated the wilds of the latter state, was of
the number. This adventurous and venerable
patriarch
was now seen making his last remove; placing
the endless river between him and the multitude,
his own success had drawn around him, and seeking
for the renewal of enjoyments which were rendered
worthless in his eyes, when trammelled by the forms
of human institutions.
In the pursuit of adventures, such as these, men
are ordinarily governed by their previous habits or
deluded by their secret wishes. A few, led by the
phantoms of hope, and, ambitious of sudden
affluence
,
sought the mines of the virgin territory; but,
by far the greater portion of the emigrants were
satisfied
to establish themselves along the margins of the
larger water-courses, content with the rich returns
that the generous, alluvial, bottoms of the rivers never
fail to bestow on the most desultory industry. In this
manner were communities formed with magical
rapidity
;
and most of those who witnessed the purchase
of the empty empire, have lived to see already a
populous
and sovereign state, parcelled from its
inhabitants
,
and received into the bosom of the national
confederacy
,
on terms of political equality.
The incidents and scenes which are connected with
our present legend, occurred in the earliest periods
of the enterprises which have led to so great and so
speedy a result.
The harvest of the first year of our possession had
long been passed, and the fading foliage of a few
scattering
trees was, already, beginning to exhibit the hues
and tints of autumn, when a train of wagons issued
from the bed of a dry rivulet, to pursue its course
across the undulating surface, of what, in the language
of the country of which we write, is called a rolling
prairie. The vehicles, loaded with household goods
and implements of husbandry, the few straggling sheep
and black cattle that were herded in the rear, and the
rugged appearance and careless mien of the sturdy
men who loitered at the sides of the lingering teams,
united to announce a band of emigrants seeking for
the
Elderado
of their desires. Contrary to the usual
practice of the men of their caste, this party had left
the fertile bottoms of the low country, and had found
its way, by means only known to such adventurers,
across glen and torrent, over deep morasses and arid
wastes, to a point far beyond the usual limits of
civilized
habitations. In their front were stretched those
broad plains, which extend, with so little diversity of
character, to the bases of the Rocky Mountains; and
many long and dreary miles in their rear, foamed the
swift and turbid waters of La Platte.
The appearance of such a train, in that bleak and
solitary place, was rendered the more remarkable by
the fact, that the surrounding country offered so little,
that was tempting to the cupidity of speculation, and,
if possible, still less that was flattering to the hopes
of an ordinary settler of new lands.
The meagre herbage of the prairie, promised
nothing, in favour of a hard and unyielding soil, over
which the wheels of the vehicles rattled as lightly as
though they travelled on a beaten road; neither
wagons
nor beasts making any deeper impression, than to
mark that bruised and withered grass, which the
cattle
plucked, from time to time, and as often rejected,
as food too sour, for even their hunger to render
palatable.
Whatever might be the final destination of these
adventurers, or the secret causes of their apparent
security in so remote and unprotected a situation,
there was no visible sign of uneasiness or alarm
betrayed
in the countenance or the deportment of any
among them. Including both sexes, and every age
the number of the party exceeded twenty.
At some little distance in front of the whole, march
ed the individual, who, both by his position and air
appeared to be the leader of the band. He was a
tall, sun-burnt, man, past the middle age, whose dull
countenance and listless manner denoted any other
emotion than that of compunction for the past or
anxiety for the future. His frame appeared loose and
B 2
flexible; but it was vast, and in reality of prodigious
power. It was, only at moments, however, as some
slight impediment opposed itself to his loitering
progress
,
that his person, which, in its ordinary gait
seemed
so lounging and nerveless, displayed any of those
energies, which lay latent in his system, like the
slumbering
and unwieldy, but terrible, strength of the
elephant
.
The inferior lineaments of his countenance
were coarse, extended and vacant; while the
superior
,
or those nobler parts which are thought to affect
the intellectual being, were low, receding and mean.
The dress of this individual was a mixture of the
coarsest vestments of a husbandman with the leathern
garments, that fashion as well as use, had in some
degree
rendered necessary to one engaged in his present
pursuits. There was, however, a singular and wild
display of prodigal and ill judged ornaments,
blended
with his motley attire. In place of the usual
deer-skin
belt, he wore around his body a tarnished silken
sash of the most gaudy colours; the buck-horn haft
of his knife was profusely decorated with plates of
silver; the martin's fur of his cap was of a fineness
and shadowing that a queen might covet; the buttons
of his rude and soiled blanket-coat were of the
glittering
coinage of Mexico; the stock of his rifle was
of beautiful mahogany, riveted and banded with the
same precious metal, and the trinkets of no less than
three worthless watches dangled from different parts
of his person. In addition to the pack and the rifle
which were slung at his back, together with the well
filled, and carefully guarded pouch and horn, he had
carelessly cast a keen and bright wood-axe across his
shoulder, sustaining the weight of the whole with as
much apparent ease, as though he moved, unfettered
in his limbs, and free from the smallest incumbrance.
A short distance in the rear of this man, came a
groupe of youths very similarly attired, and bearing
sufficient resemblance to each other, and to their lead
er, to distinguish them as the children of one family.
Though the youngest of their number could not much
have passed the period, that, in the nicer judgment
of the law is called the age of discretion, he had
proved
himself so far worthy of his progenitors as to have
reared already his aspiring person to the standard
height of his race. There were one or two others,
of different mould, whose descriptions must however
be referred to the regular course of the narrative.
Of the females, there were but two who had
arrived
at womanhood; though several white-headed,
olive-skin'd faces were peering out of the foremost
wagon of the train, with eyes of lively curiosity and
characteristic animation. The elder of the two
adults, was the sallow and wrinkled mother of most of
the party, and the younger was a sprightly, active,
girl, of eighteen, who in figure, dress and mien
seemed
to belong to a station in society several gradations
above that of any one of her visible associates. The
second vehicle was covered with a top of cloth so
tightly drawn, as to conceal its contents, with the
nicest care. The remaining wagons, were loaded,
with nothing more valuable than such rude
furniture
and other personal effects, as might be supposed
to belong to one, ready at any moment, to change his
abode, without reference to season or distance.
Perhaps there was little in this train, or in the
appearance
of its proprietors, that is not daily to be
encountered
on the highways of our changeable and
moving country. But the solitary and peculiar
scenery
in which it was so unexpectedly exhibited, gave to
the party a marked character of wildness and
adventure
.
In the little vallies, which, in the regular formation
of the land, occurred at every mile of their progress,
the view was bounded, on two of the sides, by the
gradual and low elevations, which give name to that
description of prairie, we have mentioned; while on
he others, the meagre prospect ran off in long, narrow,
barren perspectives, but slightly relieved by a pitiful
show of coarse, though, somewhat, luxuriant
vegetation
.
From the summits of the swells, the eye
became
fatigued with the sameness and chilling
dreariness
of the landscape. The earth was not unlike the
Ocean, when its restless waters are heaving heavily
after the agitation and fury of the tempest have begun
to lessen. There was the same waving and regular
surface, the same absence of foreign objects, and the
same boundless extent to the view. Indeed so very
striking was the resemblance between the water and
the land, that, however much the geologist might
sneer at so simple a theory, it would have been
difficult
for a poet not to have felt, that the formation of
the one had been produced by the subsiding
dominion
of the other. Here and there a tall tree rose out
of the bottoms, stretching its naked branches abroad,
like some solitary vessel; and, to strengthen the
delusion
,
far in the utmost distance, appeared two or
three rounded thickets, looming in the misty horizon
like islands resting on the bosom of the waters. It
is unnecessary to warn the practised reader, that the
sameness of the surface, and the low stands of the
spectators exaggerated the distances; but still, as swell
appeared after swell, and island succeeded island,
there was a disheartening assurance that long, and
seemingly interminable, tracts of territory must be
passed, before the wishes of the humblest
agriculturist
could be realized.
Still, the leader of the emigrants steadily pursued
his way, with no other guide than the sun, turning his
back resolutely on the abodes of civilization, and
plunging, at each step, more deeply if not
irretrievably
,
into the haunts of the barbarous and savage
occupants
of the country. As the day drew nigher to
a close, however, his mind, which was, perhaps,
incapable
of maturing any connected system of
forethought
beyond that which related to the interests of
the present moment, became, in some slight degree,
troubled with the care of providing for the wants of
the coming hours of darkness.
On reaching the crest of a swell that was a little
higher than the usual elevations, he lingered a
minute
,
and cast a half curious eye, on either hand, in
quest of those well known signs, which might indicate
a place, where the three grand requisites of, water,
fuel and fodder were to be obtained in conjunction.
It would seem that his search was fruitless; for
after
a few moments of indolent and listless
examination
,
he suffered his huge frame, to descend the gentle
declivity, in the same sluggish manner that an over
fatted beast would have yielded to the downward
pressure.
His example was silently followed by those who
succeeded him, though not until the young men had
manifested much more of interest, if not of concern
in the brief inquiry, which each, in his turn, made on
gaining the same look-out. It was now evident by
the tardy movements both of beasts and men, that the
time of necessary rest, was not far distant. The
matted
grass of the lower land, presented obstacles which
fatigue began to render formidable, and the whip was
becoming necessary to urge the lingering teams to
their labour. At this moment, when, with the
exception
of the principal individual, a general lassitude
was getting the mastery of the travellers, and every
eye was cast, by a sort of common impulse, wistfully
forward, the whole party was brought to a halt, by a
spectacle, as sudden as it was unexpected.
The sun had fallen below the crest of the nearest
wave of the prairie leaving the usual, rich and
glowing
,
train on its track. In the centre of this flood of
fiery light, a human form appeared, drawn against the
gilded background, as distinctly, and, seemingly as
palpable, as though it would come within the grasp
of any extended hand. The figure was colossal; the
attitude musing and melancholy, and the situation
directly
in the route of the travellers. But imbedded,
as it was, in its setting of garish light, it was
impossible
to distinguish more concerning its proportions or
character.
The effect of such a spectacle was instantaneous
and powerful. The man in front of the emigrants
came to a stand, and remained gazing at the
mysterious
object, with a dull interest, that soon quickened
into a species of superstitious awe. His sons, so soon
as the first emotions of surprise had a little abated,
drew, slowly, around him, and, as they who governed
the teams, gradually, followed their example, the
whole party was soon condensed in one, silent, and
wondering groupe. Notwithstanding the impression
of a supernatural agency was very general among the
travellers, the ticking of gun-locks was heard, and one
or two of the bolder of the youths cast their rifles
forward, in guarded readiness for any service.
Send the boys off to the right, exclaimed the
resolute wife and mother, in a sharp, dissonant voice,
I warrant me, Asa, or Abner will give some account
of the creatur!
It may be well enough, to try the rifle,
muttered
a dull looking man, whose features both in outline
and expression, bore no small resemblance, to the
first speaker, and who loosened the stock of his piece
and brought it dexterously to the front, while
delivering
this decided opinion; the Pawnee Loups are
said to be hunting by hundreds in the plains; if so,
they'll never miss a single man from their tribe.
Stay! exclaimed a soft toned, but fearfully
alarmed female voice, which was easily to be traced
to the trembling lips of the younger of the two
women
;
we are not all, together; it may be a friend!
Who is scouting, now? demanded the father,
scanning, at the same time, the cluster of his stout
sons, with a displeased and sullen eye. Put by the
piece, put by the piece; he continued, diverting the
other's aim, with the finger of a giant, and with the
air of one it might be dangerous to deny. My job
is not yet ended; let us finish the little that remains,
in peace.
The man, who had manifested so hostile an
intention
,
appeared to understand the other's allusion, and
suffered himself to be diverted from his object. The
sons turned their inquiring looks, on the girl, who
had so eagerly spoken, to require an explanation;
but, as if content with the respite she had obtained
for the stranger, she had already sunk back, in her
seat, and now chose to affect a maidenly silence.
In the mean time, the hues of the heavens had
often changed. In place of the brightness, which
had dazzled the eye, a gray and more sober light had
succeeded, and as the setting lost its brilliancy, the
proportions of the fanciful form became less
exaggerated
,
and finally quite distinct. Ashamed to
hesitate
,
now, that the truth was no longer doubtful, the
leader of the party resumed his journey, using the
precaution, as he ascended the slight acclivity, to
release
his own rifle from the strap, and to cast it into
a situation more convenient for sudden use.
There was little apparent necessity, however, for
such watchfulness. From the moment when it had
thus unaccountably appeared, as it were, between the
heavens and the earth, the stranger's figure had
neither moved nor given the smallest evidence of
hostility. Had he harboured any such evil intention,
the individual who now came plainly into view,
seemed
but little qualified to execute them.
A frame that had endured the hardships of more
than eighty seasons was not qualified to awaken
apprehension
,
in the breast of one as powerful as the
emigrant. Notwithstanding his years, and his look
of emaciation if not of suffering, there was that about
this solitary being, however, which said that time,
and not disease, had laid his hand too heavily on him.
His form, had withered, but it was not wasted. The
sinews and muscles, which had once denoted great
strength, though shrunken, were still visible; and his
whole figure had attained an appearance of
induration
,
which, if it were not for the well known frailty
of humanity, would have seemed to bid defiance to
the further approaches of decay. His dress was
chiefly of skins, worn with the hair to the weather;
a pouch and horn were suspended from his shoulders;
and he leaned on a rifle of uncommon length, but
which like its owner, exhibited the wear of long and
hard service.
As the party drew nigher to this solitary being, and
came within a distance to be heard, a low growl
issued
from the grass at his feet, and then, a tall, gaunt,
toothless, hound, arose lazily from his lair, and
shaking
himself made some show of resisting the nearer
approach of the travellers.
Down, Hector, down; said his master, in a
voice, that was a little tremulous and hollow with
age. What have ye to do, pup, with men who
journey
on their lawful callings.
Stranger, if you ar' much acquainted in this
country, said the leader of the emigrants, can
you tell a traveller where he may find necessaries
for the night.
Is the land filled on the other side of the Big
River? demanded the old man, solemnly, and
without
appearing to hearken to the other's question; or
why do I see a sight, I had never thought to behold
again!
Why, there is country left, it is true, for such as
have money, and ar' not particular in the choice,
returned the emigrant; but to my taste, it is getting
crowdy. What may a man call the distance, from
this place to the nighest point on the main river.
A hunted deer could not cool his sides, in the
Mississippi, without travelling a long five hundred
miles.
And in what way may you name the district,
hereaway?
By what name, returned the old man, pointing
significantly upward, would you call the spot, where
you see yonder cloud?
The emigrant looked at the other, like one who
did not comprehend his meaning and who half
suspected
he was trifled with, but he contented himself
by saying
You ar' but a new inhabitant, like myself, I
reckon
,
stranger, otherwise you would'n't be backward
in helping a traveller to some advice; which costs
but little, seeing it is only a gift in words.
It is not a gift, but a debt that the old owe to the
young. What would you wish to know?
Where I may 'camp for the night. I'm no great
difficulty maker, as to bed and board, but, all old
journeyers, like myself, know the virtue of sweet
water, and a good browse for the cattle.
Come then with me, and you shall be master of
both; and little more is it that I can offer on this
hungry prairie.
As the old man was speaking, he raised his heavy
rifle to his shoulder, with a facility a little
remarkable
for his years and apearance, and without further
words led the way over the acclivity into the
adjacent
bottom.
Vol. I. C
CHAPTER II.
Up with my tent: here will I lie to night,
But where, to-morrow?Well, all's one for that.
Richard the Third
.
The
travellers soon discovered the usual and
unerring
evidences, that the several articles necessary
to their situation were not far distant. A clear and
gurgling spring burst out of the side of the declivity,
and joining its waters to those of other similar little
fountains, in its vicinity, their united contributions
formed a run, which was easily to be traced for miles,
along the prairie, by the scattering foliage and
verdure
which occasionally grew within the influence of
its moisture. Hither, then, the stranger held his way,
eagerly followed by the willing teams, whose instinct
gave them a prescience of refreshment and of rest
from labour.
On reaching what he deemed a suitable spot, the
old man halted, and with an inquiring look, he
seemed
to demand if it possessed the needful
conveniences
.
The leader of the emigrants cast his eyes,
understandingly
,
about him, and examined the place
with the keenness of one competent to judge of so
nice a question, though in that dilatory and heavy
manner, which rarely permitted him to betray any
unmanly precipitation.
Ay, this may do, he said, when satisfied with
his scrutiny; boys, you have seen the last of the
sun; be stirring.
The young men manifested a characteristic
obedience
to the injunction. The order, for such, in tone
and manner it was, in truth, was received with
respect
;
but the utmost movement was the falling of
an axe or two from the shoulder to the ground, while
their owners continued to regard the place with
listless
and incurious eyes. In the mean time, the elder
traveller, as if familiar with the nature of the
impulses
by which his children were governed,
disencumbered
himself of his pack and rifle, and, assisted
by the man already mentioned as disposed to appeal
so promptly to the rifle, he quietly proceeded to
release
the cattle from the gears.
At length the eldest of the sons stepped heavily
forward, and, without any apparent effort, he buried
his axe to the eye, in the soft body of a cotton-wood
tree. He stood, a moment, regarding the effect of
his blow, with that sort of contempt with which a
giant might be supposed to contemplate the puny
resistance
of a dwarf, and then flourishing the
implement
above his head, with the grace and dexterity
with which a master of the art of offence would
wield his nobler though less useful weapon, he
quickly
severed the trunk of the tree bringing its tall top
crashing to the earth, in submission to his prowess.
His companions had regarded the operation with
indolent
curiosity, until they saw the prostrate trunk
stretched along the ground, when, as if a signal for a
general attack had been given, they advanced in a
body to the work, and in a space of time, and with a
neatness of execution that would have astonished an
ignorant spectator, they stripped a small but suitable
spot of its burden of forest, as effectually, and almost
as promptly, as if a whirlwind had passed along the
place.
The stranger, had been a silent but attentive
observer
of their progress. As tree after tree came
whistling down, he cast his eyes upward, at the
vacancies
they left in the heavens, with a melancholy
gaze, and finally turned away, muttering to himself
with a bitter smile, like one who disdained giving a
more audible utterance to his discontent. Pressing
through the groupe of active and busy children, who
had already lighted a cheerful fire, the attention of
the old man became next fixed, on the movements
of the leader of the emigrants and of his savage
looking assistant.
These two had, already, liberated the cattle, which
were eagerly browsing the grateful and nutritious
extremities
of the fallen trees, and were now employed
about the wagon, which has been described, as
having
its contents concealed with so much apparent
care. Notwithstanding it appeared to be as silent,
and as tenantless as the rest of the vehicles, the men
applied their strength to its wheels, and rolled it
apart from the others, to a dry and elevated spot,
near the edge of the thicket. Here they brought
certain poles, which had, seemingly, been long
employed
in such a service, and fastening their larger
ends firmly in the ground, the smaller were attached
to the hoops that supported the covering of the
wagon. Large folds of cloth were next drawn out
of the vehicle, and after being spread around the
whole, were pegged to the earth in such a manner as
to form a tolerably capacious and exceedingly
convenient
tent. After surveying their work with
inquisitive
,
and perhaps jealous eyes, arranging a fold
here and driving a peg more firmly there, the men
once more applied their strength to the wagon,
pulling
it, by its projecting tongue, from the centre of
the canopy, until it appeared in the open air,
deprived
of its covering, and destitute of any other freight,
than a few light articles of furniture. The latter
were immediately removed, by the traveller, into the
tent with his own hands, as though to enter it, were
a privilege, to which even his bosom companion was
not entitled.
As curiosity is a passion that is rather quickened
than destroyed by seclusion, the old inhabitant of the
prairies did not view these precautionary and
mysterious
movements, without experiencing some of its
impulses. He approached the tent, and, was about
to sever two of its folds, with the very obvious
intention
of examining, more closely, into the nature of
its contents, when the man who had once already
placed his life in jeopardy, seized him by the arm,
and with a somewhat rude exercise of his strength
threw him from the spot he had selected as the one
most convenient for his object.
It's an honest regulation, friend, the fellow, drily
observed, though with an eye that threatened
volumes
,
and sometimes it is a safe one, which says,
mind your own business.
Men seldom bring any thing to be concealed into
these deserts, returned the old man, as if willing,
and yet a little ignorant how to apologize for the
liberty
he had been about to take, and I had hoped no
offence, in looking into the place.
They seldom bring themselves, I reckon, the
other roughly answered; this has the look of an old
country, though to my eye it seems not to be overly
peopled.
The land is as aged as the rest of the works of
the Lord, I believe; but you say true, concerning its
inhabitants. Many months have passed since I have
laid eyes on a face of my own colour, before your
own. I say again, friend, I had hoped, no harm; I
didn't know, whether there was not, something
behind
the cloth, that might bring former days to my
thoughts.
As the stranger ended his simple explanation, he
walked meekly away, like one who felt the deepest
sense of the right which every man has to the quiet
enjoyment of his own, without any troublesome
interference
on the part of his neighbour; a
wholesome
and just principle that he had, also, most
probably
imbibed from the habits of his secluded life. As
he passed back, towards the little encampment of the
emigrants, for such the place had now become, he
C 2
heard the voice of the leader calling aloud, in its
hoarse and authoritative tones, the name of
Ellen Wade.
The girl who has been already introduced to the
reader, and who was occupied with others of her sex,
around the fires, sprang willingly forward, at this
summons
,
and passing the stranger with the activity of a
young antelope, she was instantly lost, behind the
forbidden folds of the fent. Neither her sudden
disappearance
,
nor any of the arrangements we have
mentioned, seemed, however, to excite the smallest
surprise, among the remainder of the party. The
young men who had already completed their tasks,
with the axe, were all engaged after their lounging
and listless manner; some in bestowing equitable
portions of the fodder, among the different animals;
others in plying the heavy pestle of a moveable
hommony-mortar
,
and one or two, in wheeling the
remainder
of the wagons aside and arranging them, in
such a manner as to form a sort of outwork for their,
otherwise, defenceless bivouac.
These, several, duties were soon performed, and,
as darkness, now, began to conceal the objects on the
surrounding prairie, the shrill toned termagant, whose
voice since the halt had been diligently exercised
among her idle and drowsy offspring, announced in
tones that might have been heard at a dangerous
distance
,
that the evening meal waited only for the
approach
of those who were to consume it.
Whatever
may be the other qualities of a border man, he
is seldom deficient in the virtue of hospitality. The
emigrant no sooner heard the sharp call of his wife,
than he cast his eyes about him in quest of the
stranger
,
in order to proffer to him the place of distinction,
in the rude entertainment to which they were so
unceremoniously
summoned.
I thank you, friend, the old man replied to the
rough invitation to take a seat nigh the smoking
kettle
;
you have my hearty thanks; but I have eaten
for the day, and I am not one of them, who dig their
graves with their teeth. Well; as you wish it, I will
take a place, for it is long sin' I have seen people of
my colour, eating their daily bread.
You ar' an old settler, in these districts, then,
the emigrant rather remarked than inquired, with a
mouth filled nearly to overflowing with the delicious
hommony, prepared by his skilful, though repulsive
spouse. They told us below, we should find settlers
something thinnish, hereaway, and I must say, the
report
was mainly true; for, unless, we count the
Canada
traders on the big river, you ar' the first white
face I have met, in a good five hundred miles; that
is calculating according to your own reckoning.
Though I have spent some years, in this quarter,
I can hardly be called a settler, seeing that I have no
regular abode, and seldom pass more than a month,
at a time, on the same range.
A hunter, I reckon? the other continued,
glancing
his eyes aside, as if to examine the equipments
of his new acquaintance; your fixen seem none of
the best, for such a calling.
They are old, and nearly ready to be laid aside,
like their master, said the old man, regarding his
rifle, with a look in which affection and regret were
singularly blended; and I may say they are but
little
needed, too. You are mistaken, friend, in calling
me a hunter; I am nothing better than a trapper.
If you ar' much of the one, I'm bold to say you
ar' something of the other; for the two callings, go
mainly together, in these districts.
To the shame of the man who is able to follow
the first be it so said! returned the trapper, whom
in future we shall choose to designate by his pursuit;
for more than fifty years did I carry my rifle in the
wilderness, without so much as setting a snare for
even a bird that flies the heavens;much less, a
beast that has nothing but legs, for its gifts.
I see but little difference whether a man gets his
peltry by the rifle or by the trap, said the ill-looking
companion of the emigrant, in his rough and sullen
manner. The 'arth was made for his comfort; and,
for that matter, so ar' its creatur's.
You seem to have but little plunder, stranger, for
one who is far abroad, bluntly interrupted the
emigrant
,
as if he had a reason for wishing to change the
conversation. I hope you ar' better off for skins.
I make but little use of either, the trapper,
quietly
replied. At my time of life, food and clothing
be all that is needed, and I have little occasion for
what you call plunder, unless it may be, now and
then, to barter for a horn of powder or a bar of lead.
You ar' not, then, of these parts, by natur',
friend! the emigrant continued, having in his mind
the exception which the other had taken to the very
equivocal word, which he himself, according to the
customs of the country, had used for baggage or
effects.
I was born on the sea-shore, though most of my
life has been passed in the woods.
The whole party, now looked up at him, as men
are apt to turn their eyes on some unexpected object
of general interest. One or two of the young men,
repeated the words sea-shore, and the woman
tendered
him one of those civilities, with which,
uncouth
as they were, she was little accustomed to grace
her hospitality, as if in deference to the travelled
dignity
of her guest. After a long, and, seemingly a
meditating silence, the emigrant, who had, however,
seen no apparent necessity to suspend the functions
of his powers of mastication, resumed the discourse.
It is a long road, as I have heard, from the waters
of the west to the shores of the main sea?
It is a weary path, indeed, friend; and much
have I seen, and something have I suffered in
journeying
over it.
A man would see a good deal of hard travel in
going its length!
Seventy and five years have I been upon the
road, and there are not half that number of leagues
in the whole distance, after you leave the Hudson, on
which I have not tasted venison of my own killing.
But this is vain boasting! of what use are former
deeds, when time draws to an end!
I once met a man, that had boated on the river
he names, observed one of the sons, speaking in a low
tone of voice, like one who distrusted his knowledge,
and deemed it prudent to assume a becoming
diffidence
in the presence of a man who had seen so
much; from his tell, it must be a considerable stream,
and deep enough for a keel, from top to bottom.
It is a wide and deep water-course, and many
sightly towns, are there growing on its banks,
returned
the trapper; and yet it is but a brook, to the
waters of the endless river!
I call nothing a stream, that a man can travel
round, exclaimed the ill-looking associate of the
emigrant; a real river must be crossed; not
headed
,
like a bear in a country hunt.
Have you been far towards the sun-down, friend?
again interrupted the emigrant, as if he desired to
keep his rough companion, as much as possible out
of the discourse. I find it is a wide tract of
clearing
,
this, into which I have fallen.
You may travel weeks, and you will see it the
same. I often think the Lord has placed this
barren
belt of prairie, behind the states, to warn men to
what their folly may yet bring the land! Ay! weeks
if not months, may you journey in these open fields,
in which there is neither dwelling, nor habitation for
man or beast. Even the savage animals travel miles
on miles to seek their dens. And yet the wind
seldom
blows from the east, but I conceit the sounds of
axes, and the crash of falling trees are in my ears.
As the old man spoke with the seriousness and
dignity
that age seldom fails to communicate, even, to
less striking sentiments, his auditors were deeply
attentive
,
and as silent as the grave. Indeed, the
trapper
was left to renew the dialogue, himself, which he
soon did by asking a question, in the indirect manner
so much in use by the border inhabitants.
You found it no easy matter to ford the
water-courses
,
and make your way so deep into the prairies,
friend, with teams of horses, and herds of horned
beasts?
I kept the left bank of the main river, the
emigrant
replied, until I found the stream leading too
much to the north, when we rafted ourselves across,
without any great suffering. The woman lost a fleece
or two from the next year's shearing, and the girls
have one cow less to their dairy. Since then, we
have done bravely, by bridging a creek, every day
or two.
It is likely you will continue west, until you come
to land more suitable for a settlement?
Until I see reason to stop, or to turn ag'in, the
emigrant bluntly answered, rising at the same time,
and cutting short the dialogue, by an air of
dissatisfaction
,
no less than by the suddenness of the
movement
.
His example, was followed by the trapper, as
well as the rest of the party, and then, without much
deference to the presence of their guest, the
travellers
proceeded to make their dispositions to pass the
night. Several little bowers, or rather huts, had
already
been formed of the tops of trees, blankets of
coarse country manufacture, and the skins of
buffaloes
,
united without much reference to any other
object
than temporary comfort. Into these covers the
children with their mother soon drew themselves,
and where, it is more than possible, they were all
speedily lost in the oblivion of sleep. Before the
men, however, could seek their rest, they had sundry
little duties to perform; such as completing their
works of defence; carefully concealing the fires;
replenishing
the fodder of their cattle, and setting the
watch that was to protect the party in the
approaching
hours of deeper night.
The former was effected by dragging the trunks of
a few trees, into the intervals left by the wagons, and
along the open space, between the vehicles and the
thicket, on which, in military language, the
encampment
would be said to have rested; thus forming a
sort of chevaux-de-frise on three sides of the
position
.
Within these narrow limits (with the
exception
of what the tent contained,) both man and beast
were now collected; the latter being far too happy
in resting their weary limbs, to give any undue
annoyance
to their scarcely more intelligent associates.
Two of the young men took their rifles, and first
renewing
the priming and examining the flints, with the
utmost care, they proceeded, the one to the extreme
right and the other to the left of the encampment,
where they posted themselves, within the shadows of
the thicket, but in such positions, as enabled each to
overlook his proper portion of the prairie.
The trapper had loitered about the place,
declining
to share the straw of the emigrant, until the
whole arrangement was completed; and then
without
the ceremony of an adieu, he slowly retired from
the spot.
It was now in the first watch of the night, and the
pale, quivering, and deceptive light, from a new
moon, was playing over the endless waves of the
prairie, tipping the swells with gleams of brightness,
and leaving the interval land in deep shadow.
Accustomed
to scenes of solitude like the present, the
old man, as he left the encampment proceeded alone
into the wide waste, like a bold vessel leaving its
haven
to trust itself on the trackless field of the ocean.
He appeared to move for some time, without object,
or indeed, without any apparent consciousness,
whither
his limbs were carrying him. At length, on
reaching
the rise of one of the undulations, he came to a
stand, and for the first time, since leaving the band,
who had caused such a flood of reflections and
recollections
to crowd upon his mind, the old man became
aware of his present situation. Throwing one end
of his rifle to the earth, he stood leaning on the
other, again lost in deep contemplation for several
minutes, during which time his hound came and
crouched close at his feet. It was a deep, menacing,
growl from the faithful animal, that first aroused him
from his musing.
What now, dog? he said, looking down at his
companion, as though he addressed a being of an
intelligence
equal to his own, and speaking in a voice
of great affection. What is it, pup? ha! Hector;
what is it nosing, now? It won't do, dog; it won't
do; the very fa'ns play in open view of us, without
minding two such worn out curs, as you and I.
Instinct
is their gift, Hector; and, they have found out
how little we are to be feared, now; they have!
The dog stretched his head upward, and
responded
to the words of his master by a long and plaintive
whine, which he even continued after he had again
buried his head in the grass as if he held an
intelligent
communication with one who so well knew how
to interpret dumb discourse.
This is a manifest warning, Hector! the
trapper
continued, dropping his voice, to the tones of
caution and looking warily about him. What is it,
pup; what is it?
The hound had, however, already laid his nose to
the earth, and was silent; appearing to slumber. But
the keen quick glances of his master, soon caught a
glimpse of a distant figure, which seemed, through
the deceptive light, floating along the very elevation
on which he had placed himself. Presently its
proportions
became more distinct, and then an airy,
female
form appeared to hesitate, as if considering
whether it would be prudent to advance. Though
the eyes of the dog, were now to be seen glancing in
the rays of the moon, opening and shutting lazily, he
gave no further signs of displeasure.
Come nigher; we are friends, said the trapper,
associating himself with his companion by long use
and, probably, through the strength of the secret tie
that connected them together; we are your friends;
none will harm you.
Encouraged by the mild tones of his voice, and
perhaps led on by the earnestness of her purpose, the
female approached, until, she stood at his side; when
the old man perceived his visiter to be the young
woman, with whom the reader, has already become
acquainted by the name of Ellen Wade.
I had thought you were gone, she said, looking
timidly and anxiously around. They said you were
gone; and that we should never see you again. I
did not think, it was you!
Men are no common objects in these empty
fields, returned the trapper, and I humbly hope,
though I have so long consorted with the beasts of
the wilderness, that I have not yet lost the look of
my kind.
Oh! I knew you to be a man, and I thought I
knew the whine of the hound, too, she answered,
hastily, as if willing to explain she knew not what,
and then checking herself, as though fearful of
having
,
already, said too much.
I saw no dogs, among the teams of your father,
the trapper dryly remarked.
Father! exclaimed the girl, feelingly, I have
no father! I had nearly said no friend. The old
Vol. I. D
man, turned towards her, with a look of kindness
and interest, that was even more conciliating than
the ordinary, upright, and benevolent expression of
his weather-beaten countenance.
Why then do you venture in a place where none
but the strong should come? he demanded. Did
you not know that, when you crossed the big river,
you left a friend behind you that is always bound to
look to the young and feeble, like yourself.
Of whom do you speak?
The law'tis bad to have it, but, I sometimes
think, it is worse, where it is never to be found. Yes
yes, the law is needed, when such as have not the
gifts of strength and wisdom are to be taken care of.
I hope, young woman, if you have no father, you
have at least a brother.
The maiden felt the tacit reproach conveyed in
this covert question, and for a moment remained in
an embarrassed silence. But catching a glimpse of
the mild and serious features of her companion, as
he continued to gaze on her with a look of interest,
she replied, firmly, and in a manner that left no
doubt she comprehended his meaning:
Heaven forbid that any such as you have seen,
should be a brother of mine or any thing else near or
dear to me! But, tell me, do you then actually live
alone, in this desert district, old man; is there really
none here besides yourself?
There are hundreds, nay, thousands of the
rightful
owners of the country, roving about the plains;
but few of our own colour.
And have you then met none who are white, but
us? interrupted the girl, like one too impatient to
await the tardy explanation his age and deliberation
were about to make.
Not in many daysHush, Hector, hush, he
added in reply to a low, and nearly inaudible, growl
from his hound. The dog scents mischief in the
wind! The black bears from the mountains
sometimes
make their way, even lower than this. The
pup is not apt to complain of the harmless game.
I am not so ready and true with the piece as I
used-to-could-be
,
yet I have struck even the fiercest
animals
of the prairie, in my time; so, you have little
reason for fear, young woman.
The girl, raised her eyes, in that peculiar manner
which is so often practised by her sex, when they
commence their glances, by examining the earth at
their feet, and terminate them by noting every thing
within the power of human vision; but she rather
manifested the quality of impatience, than any
feeling
of alarm.
A short bark from the dog, however, soon gave a
new direction to the looks of both, and then the real
object of his second warning became dimly visible.
CHAPTER III.
Come, come, thou art as hot a Jack in thy
mood, as any in Italy; and as soon mov'd to be
moody, and as soon moody to be moved.
Romeo and Juliet
.
Though
the trapper manifested some surprise
when he perceived that another human figure was
approaching
him, and that, too, from a direction
opposite
to the place where the emigrant had made his
encampment, it was with the steadiness of one long
accustomed to scenes of danger.
This is a man, he said; and one who has white
blood in his veins, or his step would be lighter. It
will be well to be ready for the worst, as the
half-and-halfs
,
that one meets, in these distant districts,
are altogether more barbarous than the real savage.
He raised his rifle while he spoke, and assured
himself of the state of its flint, as well as of the
priming
by manual examination. But his arm was
arrested
,
while in the act of throwing forward the
muzzle
of the piece, by the eager and trembling hands
of his companion.
For God's sake, be not too hasty, she said; it
may be a friendan acquaintancea neighbour.
A friend! the old man repeated, deliberately
releasing himself, at the same time, from her grasp.
Friends are rare in any land, and less in this,
perhaps
,
than in another; and the neighbourhood is too
thinly settled, to make it likely, that he who comes
towards us is even an acquaintance.
But though a stranger, you would not seek his
blood!
The trapper earnestly regarded her anxious and
frightened features, a moment, and then he dropped
the butt of his rifle on the ground, again, like one
whose purpose had undergone a sudden change.
No, he said, speaking rather to himself, than to
his timid companion, she is right; blood is not to
be spilt, to save the life of one so useless, and so near
his allotted time. Let him come on; my skins, my
traps, and even my rifle shall be his, if he sees fit to
demand them.
He will ask for neitherHe wants neither,
returned
the girl; if he be an honest man, he will
surely be content with his own, and ask for nothing
that is the property of another.
The trapper had not time to express the surprise
he felt at the incoherent and contradictory language
he heard, for the man who was advancing, was,
already
,
within fifty feet of the place where they stood.
In the mean time, Hector had not been an indifferent
witness of what was passing. At the sound of the
distant footsteps, he had arisen, from his warm bed at
the feet of his master; and now, as the stranger
appeared
in open view he stalked slowly towards him,
crouching to the earth like a panther about to take
his leap.
Call in your dog, said a firm, deep, manly voice,
in tones of friendship, rather than of menace; I
love a hound, and should be sorry to do an injury to
the animal.
You hear what is said about you, pup? the
trapper
answered; come hither, fool. His growl and
his bark are all that is left him now; you may come
on, friend; the hound is toothless.
The stranger instantly profited by the intelligence.
He sprang eagerly forward, and at the next instant
stood at the side of Ellen Wade. After assuring
himself
of the identity of the latter, by a hasty but keen
glance, he turned his attention, with a quickness and
impatience, that proved the interest he took in the
result, to a similar examination of her companion.
From what cloud have you fallen, my good old
man? he said in a careless, off-hand, heedless
manner
that seemed too natural to be assumed. Or do
you actually live, hereaway, in the prairies.
I have been long on earth, and never I hope
nigher
to heaven, than I am at this moment, returned
the trapper; my dwelling, if dwelling I may be said
to have, is not far distant. Now may I take the
liberty
with you, that you are so willing to take with
others? Whence do you come, and where is your
home?
Softly, softly; when I have done with my
catechism
,
it will be time to begin with your's. What
sport is this, you follow by moonlight? You are not
dodging the buffaloes at such an hour!
I am, as you see, going from an encampment of
travellers, which lies over yonder swell in the land,
to my own wigwam; in doing so, I wrong no man.
All fair and true. And you got this young
woman
to show you the way, because she knows it so
well and you know so little about it.
D 2
I met her, as I have met you, by accident. For
ten tiresome years have I dwelt on these open fields,
and never, before to-night, have I found human
beings
with white skins on them, at this hour. If my
presence here gives offence, I am sorry; and will go
my way. It is more than likely that when your young
friend, has told her story, you will be better given to
believe mine.
Friend! said the youth, lifting a cap of skins
from his head, and running his fingers leisurely
through a dense mass of black and shaggy locks, if
I ever laid eyes on the girl before to-night, may I...
You've said enough, Paul, interrupted the
female
,
laying her hand on his mouth, with a
familiarity
,
that gave something very like the lie direct, to his
intended asseveration. Our secret will be safe,
with this honest old man. I know it by his looks,
and kind words.
Our secret! Ellen, have you forgot...
Nothing. I have not forgotten any thing I should
remember. But still I say we are safe with this
honest
trapper.
Trapper! is he then a trapper? Give me your
hand, father; our trades should bring us
acquainted
.
There is little call for handicrafts in this region,
returned the other, examining the athletic and active
form of the youth, as he leaned carelessly and not
ungracefully, on his rifle; the art of taking the
creatur's
of God, in traps and nets, is one that needs
more cunning than manhood; and yet am I brought
to practise it, in my age! But it would be quite as
seemly, in one like you, to follow a pursuit better
becoming
your years and courage.
Me! I never took even a slinking mink or a
paddling
musk-rat in a cage; though I admit having
peppered
a few of the dark-skin'd devils, when I had
much better have kept my powder in the horn and
the lead in its pouch. Not I, old man; nothing that
crawls the earth is for my sport.
What then may you do for a living, friend; for
little profit is to be made in these districts, if a man
denies himself his lawful right in the beasts of the
fields.
I deny myself nothing. If a bear crosses my path,
he is soon no bear. The deer begin to nose me; and
as for the buffaloe, I have kill'd more beef, old
stranger
,
than the largest butcher in all Kentuck.
You can shoot, then! demanded the trapper,
with a glow of latent fire, glimmering about his
small, deep-set, eyes; is your hand true, and your
look quick?
The first is like a steel trap, and the last nimbler
than a buck-shot. I wish it was hot noon, now,
grand'ther; and that there was an acre or two of
your white swans or of black feathered ducks going
south, over our heads; you or Ellen, here, might set
your heart on the finest in the flock, and my
character
against a horn of powder, that the bird would be
hanging head downwards, in five minutes, and that
too, with a single ball. I scorn a shot-gun! No man
can say, he ever knew me carry one, a rod.
The lad has good in him! I see it plainly by his
manner; said the trapper, turning to Ellen with an
openly, encouraging air; I will take it on myself
to say, that you are not unwise in meeting him, as
you do. Tell me, lad; did you ever strike a leaping
buck atwixt the antlers? Hector; quiet, pup; quiet.
The very name of venison, quickens the blood of the
cur;did you ever take an animal in that fashion,
on the long leap?
You might just as well ask me, did you ever eat?
There is no fashion, old stranger, that a deer has not
been touched by my hand, unless it was when asleep.
Ay, ay; you have a long, and a happyay, and
an honest life afore you! I am old, and I suppose I
might also say, worn out and useless; but, if it was
given me to choose my time, and place, again,as
such things are not and ought not ever to be given
to the will of manthough if such a gift was to be
given me, I would say, twenty and the wilderness!
But, tell me; how do you part with the peltry?
With my pelts! I never took a skin from a buck,
nor a quill from a goose, in my life! I knock them
over, now and then, for a meal, and sometimes to
keep my finger true to the touch; but when hunger
is satisfied, the prairie wolves get the remainder. No
noI keep to my calling; which pays me better,
than all the fur I could sell on the other side of the
big river.
The old man appeared to ponder a little; but
shaking his head, he soon musingly continued
I know of but one business that can be followed
here with profit
He was interrupted by the youth, who raised a
small cup of tin, which dangled at his neck before
the other's eyes, and springing its lid, the delicious
odour of the finest flavoured honey, diffused itself
over the organs of the trapper.
A bee hunter! observed the latter, with a
readiness
that proved he understood the nature of the
occupation, though not without some little surprise
at discovering one of the other's spirited mien
engaged
in so humble a pursuit. It pays well in the
skirts of the settlements, but I should call it a
doubtful
trade, in the open districts.
You think a tree is wanting for a swarm to
settle
in! But I know differently; and so I have
stretched
out a few hundred miles farther west, than
common
,
to taste your honey. And, now, I have bated
your curiosity, stranger, you will just move aside,
while I tell the remainder of my story to this young
woman.
It is not necessary, I'm sure it is not necessary
that he should leave us, said Ellen, with a haste
that implied some little consciousness of the
singularity
if not of the impropriety of the request. You
can have nothing to say that the whole world might
not hear.
No! well, may I be stung to death by drones, if
I understand the buzzings of a woman's mind! For
my part, Ellen, I care for nothing nor any body; and
am just as ready to go down to the place where your
uncle, if uncle you can call one, who I'll swear is no
relation, has hoppled his teams, and tell the old man
my mind now, as I shall be a year hence. You have
only to say a single word, and the thing is done; let
him like it or not.
You are ever so hasty and so rash, Paul Hover,
that I seldom know when I am safe with you. How
can you, who know the danger of our being seen
together
,
speak of going before my uncle and his sons!
Has he done that of which he has reason to be
ashamed? demanded the trapper, who had not
moved
an inch from the place he first occupied.
Heaven forbid! But there are reasons, why he
should not be seen, just now, that could do him no
harm if known, but which may not yet be told. And,
so, if you will wait, father, near yonder willow bush,
until I have heard what Paul can possibly have to
say, I shall be sure to come and wish you a good
night, before I return to the camp.
The trapper drew slowly aside, as if satisfied with
the somewhat incoherent reason Ellen had given why
he should retire. When completely out of ear shot
of the earnest and hurried dialogue, that instantly
commenced between the two he had left, the old
man, again paused, and patiently awaited the
moment
when he might renew his conversation with
beings
in whom he felt a growing interest, no less from
the mysterious character of their intercourse, than
from a natural sympathy in the welfare of a pair so
young, and who, as in the simplicity of his heart he
was also fain to believe, were also so deserving. He
was accompanied by his indolent, but attached dog,
who once more made his bed at the feet of his
master
,
and soon lay slumbering as usual, with his head
nearly buried in the dense fog of the prairie grass.
It was a spectacle so unusual to see the human
form amid the solitude in which he dwelt, that the
trapper bent his eyes on the dim figures of his new
acquaintances, with sensations to which he had long
been a stranger. Their presence awakened
recollections
and emotions, to which his sturdy but honest
nature had latterly paid but little homage, and his
thoughts began to wander over the varied scenes of
a life of hardships, that had been strangely blended
with scenes of wild and peculiar enjoyment. The
train taken by his thoughts had, already, conducted
him, in imagination, far into an ideal world, when he
was, once more suddenly, recalled to the reality of
his situation, by the movements of his faithful hound.
The dog, who, in submission to his years and
infirmities
,
had manifested such a decided propensity
to sleep, now, arose, and stalked from out the shadow
cast by the tall person of his master, and looked
abroad into the prairie, as though his instinct
apprised
him of the presence of still another visiter. Then,
seemingly, content with his examination, he returned
to his comfortable post and disposed of his weary
limbs, with the deliberation and care of one who was
no novice in the art of self-preservation.
What; again, Hector! said the trapper in a
soothing voice, which he had the caution, however,
to utter in an under tone; what is it, dog? tell his
master, pup; what is it?
Hector answered with another growl, but was
content
to continue in his lair. These were evidences
of intelligence and distrust, to which one as
practised
as the trapper could not turn an inattentive ear.
He again spoke to the dog, encouraging him to
watchfulness
,
by a low, guarded, whistle. The animal
however
,
as if conscious of having, already, discharged
his duty, obstinately refused to raise his head from
the grass.
A hint from such a friend is far better than man's
advice! muttered the trapper, as he slowly moved
towards the couple who were yet, too earnestly and
abstractedly, engaged in their own discourse, to notice
his approach; and none but a conceited settler
would hear it and not respect it, as he ought.
Children
,
he added, when nigh enough to address his
companions, we are not alone in these dreary fields;
there are others stirring, and, therefore, to the shame
of our kind, be it said, danger is nigh.
If one of them lazy sons of Skirting Ishmael is
prowling out of his camp to-night, said the young
bee-hunter, with great vivacity, and in tones that
might easily have been excited to a menace, he
may have an end put to his journey, sooner than
either he or his father is dreaming!
My life on it, they are all with the teams,
hurriedly
answered the girl. I saw the whole of them
asleep, myself, except the two on watch; and their
natures have greatly changed, if they, too, are not
both dreaming of a turkey hunt or a court-house
fight, at this very moment.
Some beast, with a strong scent, has passed
between
the wind and the hound, father, and it makes
him uneasy; or, perhaps, he too is dreaming. I had,
a pup, of my own in Kentuck, that, would start
upon
a long chase from a deep sleep; and all upon the
fancy of some dream. Go to him, and pinch his ear,
that the beast may feel the life within him.
Not sonot so, returned the trapper, shaking
his head as one who better understood the qualities
of his dog.Youth sleeps, ay, and dreams too; but
age is awake and watchful. The pup is never false
with his nose, and long experience tells me to heed
his warnings.
Did you ever run him upon the trail of carrion?
Why, I must say, that the ravenous beasts have
sometimes tempted me to let him loose, for they are
as greedy as men, after the venison, in its season; but
then I knew the reason of the dog, would tell him
the objectNono, Hector is an animal known in
the ways of man, and will never strike a false trail
when a true one is to be followed!
Ay, ay, the secret is out! you have run the hound
on the track of a wolf, and his nose has a better
memory than his master! said the bee-hunter,
laughing
.
I have seen the creatur' sleep for hours, with
pack after pack, in open view. A wolf might eat
out of his tray without a snarl, unless there was a
scarcity; then, indeed, Hector would be apt to claim
his own.
There are panthers down from the mountains; I
saw one make a leap at a sick deer, as the sun was
setting. Go; go you back to the dog, and tell him
the truth, father; in a minute, I...
He was interrupted by a long, loud and piteous
howl from the hound, which rose on the air of the
evening, like the wailing of some spirit of the place,
and passed off into the prairie, in cadences that rose
and fell, like its own undulating surface. The
trapper
was impressively silent, listening intently. Even
the reckless bee-hunter, was struck with the wailing
wildness of the sounds. After a short pause the
former
whistled the dog to his side, and then turning to
his companions he said with the seriousness, which,
in his opinion, the occasion demanded
They who think man enjoys all the knowledge
of the creaturs of God, will live to be disappointed,
if they reach, as I have done, the age of fourscore
years. I will not take upon myself to say what
mischief
is brewing, nor will I vouch that, even, the
hound himself knows so much; but that evil is nigh,
and that wisdom invites us to avoid it, I have heard
from the mouth of one who never lies. I did think,
the pup had become unused to the footsteps of man,
and that your presence made him uneasy; but his
nose has been on a long scent the whole evening, and
what I mistook as a notice of your coming, has been
intended for something much more serious. If the
advice of an old man, is, then, worth hearkening to,
children, you will quickly, go different ways to your
places of shelter and safety.
If I quit Ellen, at such a moment, exclaimed
the youth, may I never...
You've said enough! the girl interrupted, by
again interposing a hand that might, both by its
delicacy
and colour, have graced a far more elevated
station
in life; my time is out; and we must part,
at all eventsSo good night, PaulFathergood
night.
Hist! said the youth, seizing her arm, as she
was in the very act of tripping from his side
Hist! do you hear nothing? There are buffaloes
playing their pranks, at no great distanceThat sound
beats the earth like a mad herd of the scampering
devils!
His two companions listened, as people in their
situation
would be apt to lend their faculties to discover
the meaning of any doubtful noises, especially, when
heard after so many and such startling warnings. The
unusual sounds were now unequivocally though still
faintly audible. The youth and his female
companion
,
had made several hurried, and vacillating
conjectures
concerning their nature, when a current of the
night air brought the rush of trampling footsteps, too
sensibly, to their ears, to render mistake any longer
possible.
I am right! said the bee-hunter; a panther is
Vol. I. E
driving a herd before him; or may be there is a
battle
among the beasts.
Your ears are cheats; returned the old man,
who, from the moment his own organs had been able
to catch the distant sounds, had stood like a statue
made to represent deep attentionThe leaps are
too long for the buffaloe, and too regular for terror.
Hist! now they are in a bottom where the grass is
high, and the sound is deadened! Ay, there they go
on the hard earth! And now they come up the
swell, dead upon us; they will be here afore you can
find a cover!
Come, Ellen, cried the youth, seizing his
companion
by the hand, let us make a trial for the
encampment
.
Too late! too late! exclaimed the trapper,
for the creaturs are in open view; and a bloody
band of accursed Siouxs they are, by their thieving
look, and the random fashion in which they ride!
Siouxs or devils, they shall find
us
men! said
the bee-hunter, with a mien as fierce as though he
led a party of superior strength, and of a courage
equal to his ownYou have a piece, old man, and
will pull a trigger in behalf of a helpless, christian,
girl!
Down, down into the grassdown with ye both,
whispered the trapper, intimating to them to turn
aside to the tall weeds, which grew, in a denser body
than common, near the place where they stood.
You've not the time to fly, nor the numbers to fight,
foolish boy. Down into the grass, if you prize
the young woman, or value the gift of your own
life!
His remonstrance, seconded, as it was, by a prompt
and energetic action, did not fail to produce the
submission
to his order, which the occasion now seemed,
indeed, so imperiously to require. The moon had
fallen behind a sheet of thin, fleecy, clouds, which
skirted the horizon, leaving just enough of its faint
and fluctuating light, to render objects visible, dimly
revealing their forms and proportions. The trapper,
by exercising that species of influence, over his
companions
,
which experience and decision usually
assert
,
in cases of emergency, had effectually
succeeded
in concealing them in the grass, and by the aid of
the feeble rays of the luminary, he was enabled to
scan the disorderly party which was riding, like so
many madmen, directly upon them.
A band of beings, who resembled demons rather
than men, sporting in their nightly revels across the
bleak plain, was in truth approaching, at a fearful
rate, and in a direction to leave little hope that some
one among them, at least, would not pass over the
spot were the trapper and his companions lay. At
intervals, the clattering of hoofs was borne along by
the night wind, quite audibly in their front, and then,
again, their progress through the fog of the autumnal
grass, was swift and silent; adding to the unearthly
appearance of the spectacle. The trapper, who had
called in his hound, and bidden him crouch at his
side, now kneeled in the cover, also, and, kept a keen
and watchful eye on the route of the band, soothing
the fears of the girl, and restraining the impatience
of the youth, in the same breath.
If there's one, there's thirty of the miscreants!
he said in a sort of episode to his whispered
comments
.
Ay, ay; they are edging towards the river
Peace, puppeaceno, here they come this way
againthe thieves don't seem to know their own er
rand! If there were just six of us, lad, what a
beautiful
ambushment we might make upon them, from
this very spotit wont do, it wont do, boy; keep
yourself closer, or your head will be seenbesides,
I'm not altogether strong in the opinion it would be
lawful, as they have done us no harmThere they
bend ag'in to the riverno; here they come up the
swellnow is the moment to be as still, as if the
breath had done its duty and departed the body.
The figure of the old man sunk into the grass
while he was speaking, as though the final separation
to which he alluded, had, in his own case, actually
occurred, and, at the next instant, a band of wild
horsemen, whirled by them, with the noiseless
rapidity
in which it might be imagined a troop of spectres
would pass. The dark and fleeting forms were
already
vanished, when the trapper ventured, again, to
raise his head to a level with the tops of the bending
herbage, motioning, at the same time to his
companions
,
to maintain their positions and their silence.
They are going down the swell, towards the
encampment
,
he continued, in his former guarded
tones; no, they halt in the bottom, and are
clustering
together like deer, in council. By the Lord, they
are turning, ag'in, and we are not yet done with the
reptiles!
Once more he sought his friendly cover, and at the
next instant, the dark troop were to be seen riding,
in a disorderly manner, on the very summit of the
little elevation. It was now soon apparent that they
had returned to avail themselves of the height of the
ground, in order to examine the dim horizon.
Some dismounted, while others rode to and fro,
like men engaged in a local inquiry of much interest.
Happily, for the hidden party, the grass in which
they were concealed, not only served to skreen them
from the eyes of the savages, but opposed an obstacle
to prevent their horses, which were no less rude and
untrained than their riders, from trampling on them,
in their irregular and wild paces.
At length an athletic and dark looking Indian,
who, by his air of authority, would seem to be the
leader, summoned his chiefs about him, to a
consultation
,
which was held, mounted. This body was
collected on the very margin of that mass of
herbage
in which the trapper and his companions were
hid. As the young man looked up and saw the
threatening and fierce aspect of the groupe, which
was increasing at each instant by the accession of
some countenance and figure, apparently more
forbidding
than any which had preceded it, he drew
his rifle, by a very natural impulse, from beneath
him, and commenced putting it in a state for instant
service. The female, at his side, buried her face in
the grass, by a feeling that was, possibly, quite as
natural to her sex and habits, leaving him to follow
the impulses of his hot blood, but his aged and more
prudent adviser, whispered, sternly, in his ear,
The tick of the lock is as well known to the
knaves, as the blast of a trumpet to a soldier! lay
down the piecelay down the pieceshould the
moon touch the barrel, it could not fail to be seen by
the devils, whose eyes are keener than the blackest
snake's! The smallest motion, now, would be sure to
bring an arrow among us.
The bee-hunter so far obeyed as to continue
immoveable
and silent. But there was still sufficient
light to convince his companion, by the contracted
brow and threatening eye of the young man, that a
discovery would not bestow a bloodless victory on
the savages. Finding his advice disregarded, the
trapper took his measures accordingly, and awaited
the result with a resignation and calmness that were
characteristic of the individual.
In the mean time, the Siouxs (for the sagacity of
the old man was not deceived in the character of his
dangerous visiters) had terminated their council, and
were again dispersed along the ridge of land as if
they sought some hidden object.
The imps have heard the hound! whispered the
trapper, and their ears are too true to be cheated in
the distance. Keep close, lad, keep close; down with
your head to the very earth, like a dog that sleeps.
E 2
Let us rather take to our feet, and trust to
manhood
,
returned his impatient companion
He would have proceeded, but feeling a hand laid
rudely on his shoulder, he turned his eyes upward,
and beheld the dark and savage countenance of an
Indian gleaming full upon him. Notwithstanding the
surprise and the disadvantage of his attitude, the
youth was not disposed to become a captive, so
easily
.
Quicker than the flash of his own gun, he sprang
upon his feet, and was throttling his opponent with a
power that would soon have terminated the contest,
when he felt the arms of the trapper thrown around
his body, confining his exertions by a strength very
little inferior to his own. Before he had time to
reproach
his comrade for this apparent treachery, a
dozen Siouxs, were around them, and the whole
party were compelled to yield themselves as
prisoners
.
CHAPTER IV
With much more dismay,
I view the fight, than those that make the fray.
Merchant of Venice
.
The
unfortunate bee-hunter and his companions
had now become the captives of a people, who might,
without exaggeration, be called the Ishmaelites of the
American deserts. From time immemorial, the hands
of the Siouxs had been turned against their
neighbours
of the prairies, and even at this day, when the
influence and authority of a civilized government are
beginning to be felt around them, they are considered
as a treacherous and dangerous race. At the period
of our tale, the case was far worse; few white men
trusting themselves in the remote and unprotected
regions where so false a tribe was known to dwell.
Notwithstanding the peaceable submission of the
trapper, he was quite aware of the character of the
band, into whose hands he had fallen. It would have
been difficult, however, for the nicest judge to have
determined whether fear, policy or resignation
formed
the secret motive of the old man, in permitting
himself to be plundered as he did, without a
murmur
.
So far from opposing any remonstrance to the
rude and violent manner in which his conquerors
performed the customary office, he even anticipated
their cupidity, by tendering to the chiefs such articles
as he thought might prove the most acceptable. On
the other hand Paul Hover, who had been literally a
conquered man, manifested the strongest repugnance
to submit to the violent liberties that were taken with
his person and property. He even, gave several,
exceedingly
,
unequivocal demonstrations of his
displeasure
during the summary process, and would, more
than once, have broken out, in open and desperate
resistance, but for the admonitions and intreaties of
the trembling girl, who clung to his side, in a manner
so dependant, as to show the youth, that her hopes
were now placed, no less on his discretion, than on
his disposition to serve her.
The Indians had, however, no sooner deprived the
captives of their arms and ammunition, and stript
them of a few articles of dress of little use and
perhaps
of less value, than they appeared disposed to
grant them a respite. Business of greater moment
pressed on their hands, and required their instant
attention
.
Another consultation of the chiefs was con
vened, and it was apparent, by the earnest and
vehement
manner of the few who spoke, that the
warriors
conceived their success as yet to be far from
complete.
It will be well, whispered the trapper, who
knew enough of the language he heard to
comprehend
perfectly the subject of the discussion, if the
travellers who lie near the willow brake are not
awoke out of their sleep by a visit from these
miscreants
.
They are too cunning to believe that a
woman
of the pale-faces is to be found so far from
the settlements, without having a white man's
inventions
and comforts at hand.
If they will carry the tribe of wandering Ishmael
to the Rocky Mountains, said the young bee-hunter,
laughing in his vexation with a sort of bitter
merriment
,
I may forgive the rascals.
Paul! Paul! exclaimed his companion in a tone
of reproach, you forget all! Think of the
dreadful
consequences!
Ay, it was thinking of what you call
consequences
,
Ellen, that prevented me from putting the matter,
at once, to yonder red-devil, and making it a real
knock-down and drag-out! Old trapper, the sin of
this cowardly business lies on your shoulders! But
it is no more than your daily calling, I reckon, to
take men, as well as beasts, in the snares.
I implore you, Paul, to be calmto be patient.
Well, since it is your wish, Ellen, returned the
youth, endeavouring to swallow his spleen, I will
make the trial; though, as you ought to know, it is
part of the religion of a Kentuckian, to fret himself,
a little, at a mischance.
I fear your friends in the other bottom will not
escape the eyes of the imps! continued the
trapper
,
as coolly as though he had not heard a syllable
of the intervening discourseThey scent plunder;
and it would be as hard to drive a hound from his
game as to throw the varmints from its trail.
Is there nothing to be done! asked Ellen, in an
imploring manner which proved the sincerity of her
concern.
It would be an easy matter to call out, in so loud
a voice as to make old Ishmael dream that the wolves
were among his flock, Paul replied; I can make
myself heard a mile in these open fields, and his
camp is but a short quarter from us.
And get knocked on the head for your pains,
returned the trapperNo, no; cunning must match
cunning, or the hounds will murder the whole
family
.
Murder! nono murder. Ishmael loves travel
so well, there would be no harm in his having a look
at the other sea, but the old fellow is in a bad
condition
to take the long journey! I would try a lock
myself before he should be quite murdered.
His party is strong in number, and well armed;
do you think it will fight?
Look here, old trapperFew men love Ishmael
Bush and his seven sledge-hammer sons less than one
Paul Hover; but I scorn to slander even a Tennessee
shot-gun. There is as much of the true stand-up
courage among them, as there is in any family that
was ever raised in Kentuck. They are a long-sided
and a double-jointed breed; and let me tell you, that
he who takes the measure of one of them on the
ground, must be a workman at a hug.
Hist! The savages have done their talk, and are
about to set their accursed devices in motion Let
us be patient; something may yet offer in favour of
your friends.
Friends! call none of the race a friend of mine,
trapper, if you have the smallest regard for my
affection
!
What I say in their favour is less from love
than honesty.
I did not know but the young woman was of the
kin, returned the other, a little drilyBut no
offence
should be taken, where none was intended.
The mouth of Paul was again stopped by the hand
of Ellen, who took on herself to reply, in her gentle
and conciliating tones, We should be all of a
family
,
when it is in our power to serve each other. We
depend entirely on your experience, honest old man,
to discover the means to apprise our friends of their
danger.
There will be a real time of it, muttered the
bee-hunter, laughing, if the boys get at work in
good earnest with these red skins!
He was interrupted by a general movement which
took place among the band. The Indians
dismounted
to a man, giving their horses in charge to three or
four of the party, who were also intrusted with the
safe keeping of the prisoners. They then formed
themselves in a circle around a warrior, who
appeared
to possess the chief authority; and at a given
signal
the whole array moved slowly and cautiously
from the centre in straight and consequently in
diverging
lines. Most of their dark forms were soon
blended with the brown covering of the prairie;
though the captives, who watched the slightest
movement
of their enemies with vigilant eyes, were now
and then enabled to discern a human figure, drawn
against the horizon, as some one, more eager than
the rest, rose to his greatest height in order to extend
the limits of his view. But it was not long before
even these fugitive glimpses of the moving, and
constantly
increasing circle, were lost, and uncertainty
and conjecture were added to apprehension. In this
manner passed many anxious and weary minutes,
during
the close of which the listeners expected at each
moment to hear the whoop of the assailants and the
shrieks of the assailed, rising together on the stillness
of the night. But it would seem, that the search
which was so evidently making, was without a
sufficient
object; for at the expiration of half an hour
the different individuals of the band began to return
singly, gloomy and sullen, like men who were
disappointed
.
Our time is at hand, observed the trapper, who
noted the smallest incident, or the slightest indication
of hostility among the savages; we are now to be
questioned; and if I know any thing of the policy
of our case, I should say it would be wise to choose
one among us to hold the discourse, in order that our
testimony may agree. And furthermore, if an opinion
from one as old and as worthless as a hunter of
fourscore
,
is to be regarded, I would just venture to say,
that man should be the one most skilled in the natur'
of an Indian, and that he should also know
something
of their languageAre you acquainted with the
tongue of the Siouxes, friend?
Swarm your own hive, returned the
discontented
bee-hunter. You are good at buzzing, old
trapper
,
if you are good at nothing else.
'Tis the gift of youth to be rash and heady, the
trapper calmly retorted. The day has been, boy,
when my blood was like your own, too swift and too
hot to run quietly in my veins. But what will it
profit
to talk of silly risks and foolish acts at this time of
life! A grey head should cover a brain of reason,
and not the tongue of a boaster.
True, true, whispered Ellen; and we have
other things to attend to now! Here comes the
Indian
to put his questions.
The girl, whose apprehensions had quickened her
senses, was not deceived. She was yet speaking when
a tall, half naked savage, approached the spot where
they stood, and after examining the whole party as
closely as the dim light permitted, for more than a
minute in perfect stillness, he gave the usual
salutation
in the harsh and guttural tones of his own
language
.
The trapper replied as well as he could,
which it seems was sufficiently well to be understood.
In order to escape the imputation of pedantry we
shall render the substance, and, so far as it is
possible
the form of the dialogue that succeeded, into the
English tongue.
Have the pale-faces eaten their own buffaloes,
and taken the skins from all their own beavers,
continued
the savage, allowing the usual moment of
decorum
to elapse, after his words of greeting, before
he again spoke, that they come to count how many
are left among the Pawnees?
Some of us are here to buy, and some to sell,
returned the trapper; but none will follow, if they
hear it is not safe to come nigh the lodge of a Sioux.
The Siouxes are thieves, and they live among
the snow; why do we talk of a people who are so
far, when we are in the country of the Pawnees?
If the Pawnees are the owners of this land, then
white and red are here by equal right.
Have not the pale-faces stolen enough from the
red men, that you come so far to carry a lie? I have
said that this is a hunting-ground of my tribe.
My right to be here is equal to your own, the
trapper rejoined with undisturbed coolness; I do
not speak as I mightIt is better to be silent. The
Pawnees and the white men are brothers, but a Sioux
dare not show his face in the village of the Loups.
The Dahcotahs are men! exclaimed the
savage
,
fiercely; forgetting in his anger to maintain the
character he had assumed, and using the appellation
of which his nation was most proud; the Dahcotahs
have no fear! Speak; what brings you so far from
the villages of the pale-faces?
I have seen the sun rise and set on many
councils
,
and have heard the words only of wise men.
Let your chiefs come, and my mouth shall not be
shut.
I am a great chief! said the savage, affecting an
air of offended dignity. Do you take me for an
Assiniboine! Weucha is a warrior often named, and
much believed!
Am I a fool not to know a burnt-wood Teton!
demanded the trapper, with a steadiness that did
great credit to his nerves. Go; it is dark, and you
do not see that my head is grey!
The Indian now appeared convinced that he had
adopted too shallow an artifice to deceive one so
practised as the man he addressed, and he was
deliberating
what fiction he should next invent, in order
to obtain his real object, when a slight commotion
among the band put an end at once to all his schemes.
Casting his eyes behind him, as if fearful of a speedy
interruption, he said in tones much less pretending
than those he had first resorted to
Give Weucha the milk of the Long-Knives, and
he will sing your name in the ears of the great men
of his tribe.
Go; said the trapper, motioning him away, with
strong disgust. Your young men are speaking of
MahtoreeMy words are for the ears of a chief.
The savage cast a look on the other, which,
notwithstanding
the dim light, was sufficiently indicative
of implacable hostility. He then stole away among
his fellows, anxious to conceal the counterfeit he had
attempted to practise, no less than the treachery he
had contemplated against a fair division of the spoils,
from the man named by the trapper, whom he now
also knew to be approaching, by the manner in which
his name passed from one to another, in the band.
He had hardly disappeared before a warrior of
powerful
frame advanced out of the dark circle, and
placed
himself before the captives, with that high and
proud bearing for which a distinguished Indian chief
is ever so remarkable. He was followed by all the
party, who arranged themselves around his person,
in a deep and respectful silence.
The earth is very large, the chief commenced,
after a pause of that true dignity which his
counterfeit
had so miserably affectedWhy can the
children
of my great white father never find room on
it?
Some among them have heard that their friends
in the prairies are in want of many things, returned
Vol. I. F
the trapper; and they come to see if it be true.
Some want, in their turns, what the red men are
willing
to sell, and they come to make their friends rich,
with powder and blankets.
Do traders cross the big river with empty hands?
Our hands are empty because your young men
thought we were tired, and they lightened us of our
load. They were mistaken, I am old, but I am
strong.
It cannot be. Your load has fallen in the
prairies
.
Show my young men the place, that they may
pick it up, before the Pawnees find it.
The path to the spot is crooked, and it is now,
night. The hour is come for sleep, said the
trapper
,
with perfect composureBid your warriors
go over yonder hill; there is water and there is wood;
let them light their fires and sleep with warm feet.
When the sun comes again I will speak to you.
A low murmur, but one that was clearly
indicative
of great dissatisfaction, passed among the
attentive
listeners, and served to inform the old man that
he had not been sufficiently wary in proposing a
measure
that he intended should notify the travellers in
the brake of the presence of such dangerous
neighbours
.
Mahtoree, however, without betraying in the
slightest degree, the excitement which was so
strongly
exhibited by his companions, continued the
discourse
in the same lofty manner as before. I know
that my friend is rich, he said; that he has many
warriors not far off, and that horses are plentier with
him, than dogs among the red-skins.
You see my warriors, and my horses.
What! has the woman the feet of a Dahcotah,
that she can walk for thirty nights in the prairies, and
not fall! I know the red men of the woods make
long marches on foot, but we, who live where the
eye cannot see from one lodge to another, love our
horses.
The trapper now hesitated, in his turn. He was
perfectly aware that deception, if detected, might
prove dangerous, and for one of his pursuits and
character, he was strongly troubled with an
unaccommodating
regard to the truth. But, recollecting
that he controlled the fate of others as well as of
himself, he quickly decided to let things take their
course, and to permit the Dahcotah chief to deceive
himself if he would.
The women of the Siouxes and of the white
men are not of the same wigwam, he answered
evasively. Would a Teton warrior make his wife
greater than himself! I know he would not; and
yet my ears have heard that there are lands where
the councils are held by squaws.
Another slight movement in the dark circle
apprised
the trapper that his declaration was not
received
without surprise, if entirely without distrust.
The chief alone seemed unmoved or disposed, in
any degree, to relax from the loftiness and high
dignity
of his air.
My white fathers who live on the great lakes
have declared, he said, that their brothers
towards
the rising sun are not men; and now I know
they did not lie! Gowhat is a nation whose chief
is a squaw! Are you the dog and not the husband
of this woman?
I am neither. Never did I see her face before
this day. She came into the prairies, because they
had told her a great and generous nation called the
Dahcotahs lived there, and she wished to look on
men. The women of the pale-faces, like the women
of the Siouxes, open their eyes to see things that are
new; but she is poor, like myself, and she will want
corn and buffaloes, if you take away the little that
she and her friend still have.
Now do my ears listen to many wicked lies!
exclaimed the Teton warrior, in a voice so stern that
it startled even his red auditors. Am I a woman!
Has not a Dahcotah eyes! Tell me, white hunter;
who are the men of your colour, that sleep near the
fallen trees?
As he spoke, the indignant chief pointed in the
direction of Ishmael's encampment, leaving the
trapper
no reason to doubt, that the superior industry
and sagacity of this man had effected a discovery,
which had eluded the search of the rest of his party.
Notwithstanding his regret at an event that might
prove fatal to the sleepers, and some little vexation
at having been so completely outwitted, in the
dialogue
just related, the old man continued to maintain
his former air of inflexible composure.
It may be true, he answered, that white men
are sleeping in the prairie. If my brother says it, it
is true; but what men are thus trusting to the
generosity
of the Tetons, I cannot tell. If there be
strangers
asleep, send your young men to wake them up,
and let them say why they are here; every pale-face
has a tongue.
The chief shook his head with a wild and fierce
smile, answering abruptly, as he turned away to put
an end to the conference
The Dahcotahs are a wise race, and Mahtoree
is their chief! He will not call to the strangers, that
they may rise and speak to him with their carabines.
He will whisper softly in their ears. Then let the
men of their own colour come and awake them!
As he uttered these words, and turned on his heel,
a low and approving laugh passed around the dark
circle, which instantly broke its order and followed
him to a little distance from the stand of the
captives
,
where those who might presume to mingle
opinions with so great a warrior, again gathered
about him in consultation. Weucha profited by the
occasion to renew his importunities; but the trapper,
who had now discovered how great a counterfeit he
was, shook him off in high displeasure. An end was,
however, more effectually put to the annoyance of
this malignant savage, by a mandate for the whole
party, including men and beasts, to change their
position
.
The movement was made in dead silence, and
with an order that would have done credit to far
more enlightened beings. A halt, however, was soon
made, and when the captives had time to look about
them, they found they were in view of the low, dark
outline of the copse, near which lay the slumbering
party of Ishmael.
Here another short but exceedingly grave and
deliberative
consultation was held.
The beasts, which seemed trained to such covert
and silent attacks, were once more placed under the
care of keepers, who as before were again charged
with the duty of watching the prisoners. The mind
of the trapper was in no degree relieved from the
uneasiness which was, at each instant, getting a
stronger possession of him, when he found Weucha
was placed nearest to his own person, and, as it
appeared
by the air of triumph and authority he
assumed
,
at the head of the guard also. The savage,
however
,
who doubtless had his secret instructions, was
content, for the present, with making a significant
gesture with his tomahawk, which threatened instant
destruction to Ellen. After admonishing in this
expressive
manner his male captives of the fate that
would instantly attend their female companion, on
the slightest alarm proceeding from any of the party,
he was content to maintain during the whole of the
succeeding scene a rigid and deep silence. This
unexpected
forbearance, on the part of Weucha,
enabled
the trapper and his two associates to give their
undivided attention to the little that might be seen
of those interesting movements which were passing
in their front.
Mahtoree took the entire disposition of the
arrangements
F 2
on himself. He pointed out the precise
situation he wished each individual to occupy, like
one intimately acquainted with the qualifications of
his respective followers, and he was obeyed with the
deference and promptitude with which an Indian
warrior is wont to submit to the instructions of his
chief, in moments of trial. Some he despatched to
the right, and others to the left. Each man
departed
with the noiseless and quick step peculiar to the
race, until all had assumed their alloted stations, with
the exception of two chosen warriors, who remained
nigh the person of their leader. When the rest had
disappeared, Mahtoree turned to these select
companions
,
and intimated by a sign that the critical
moment
had now arrived, when the enterprise he
contemplated
was to be put in execution.
Each man laid aside the light fowling-piece which,
under the name of a carabine, he carried in virtue
of his rank, and then divesting himself of every
article
of exterior or heavy clothing, he stood
resembling
a dark and fierce looking statue, in the attitude
and nearly in the garb of nature. Mahtoree assured
himself of the right position of his tomahawk, felt
that his knife was secure in its sheath of skin,
tightened
his girdle of wampum, and saw that the lacing
of his fringed and highly ornamented leggings was
secure
and likely to offer no impediment to his
exertions
.
Thus prepared at all points, and ready for
his desperate undertaking, the Teton chieftain gave
the signal to proceed.
The three advanced in a line with the
encampment
of the travellers, until, in the dim light by
which they were seen, their dusky forms were nearly
lost to the eyes of the prisoners. Here they paused,
looking around them like men who deliberate and
ponder long on the consequences before they take a
desperate leap. Then sinking together, they became
lost in the grass of the prairie.
It is not difficult to imagine the distress and
anxiety
of those different spectators of these threatening
movements, who felt so deep an interest in their
results
.
Whatever might be the reasons of Ellen for
entertaining no strong attachment to the family in
which she has first been seen by the reader, the
feelings
of her sex, and, perhaps, some lingering seeds of
kindness, asserted their existence in her bosom.
More than once she felt tempted to brave the awful
and instant danger that awaited such an offence, and
to raise her feeble and in truth impotent voice in the
notes of warning. So strong, indeed, and so very
natural was the inclination, that she would most
probably have put it in execution, but for the
often-repeated
though whispered remonstrances of Paul
Hover. In the breast of the young bee-hunter
himself
,
there was a singular union of emotions. His
first and chiefest solicitude was certainly in behalf of
his gentle and dependant companion; but the sense
of her danger was mingled in the breast of the
reckless
woods-man with a consciousness of a high and
wild, and by no means unpleasant excitement.
Though united to the emigrants by ties still less
binding than those of Ellen, he longed to hear the
crack of their rifles, and, had occasion offered, he
would gladly have been among the first to rush to
their rescue. There were in truth moments when
he felt in his turn an impulse, that was nearly
resistless
,
to spring forward and awake the unconscious
sleepers; but a glance at Ellen would serve to recall
his tottering prudence, and to admonish him of the
consequences. The trapper, alone, remained calm
and observant, as though nothing that involved his
personal comfort or safety had occurred. His
evermoving
,
vigilant eyes, watched the smallest change
with the composure of one too long inured to scenes
of danger to be easily moved, and with an
expression
of cool determination which denoted the
intention
he actually harboured, of profiting by the
smallest
oversight on the part of the captors.
In the mean time the Teton warriors had not been
idle. Profiting by the high fog which grew in the
bottoms, they had wormed their way through the
matted
grass, like so many treacherous serpents stealing
on their prey, until the point was gained, where an
extraordinary caution became necessary to their
further advance. Mahtoree, alone, had occasionally
elevated his dark, grim countenance above the
herbage
,
straining his eye-balls to penetrate the gloom
which skirted the border of the brake. In these
momentary glances he gained sufficient knowledge,
added to that he had obtained in his former search,
to be the perfect master of the position of his
intended
victims, though he was still profoundly
ignorant
of their numbers, and of their means of defence.
His efforts to possess himself of the requisite
knowledge concerning these two latter and essential
points were, however, completely baffled by the
stillness
of the camp, which lay in a quiet as deep as
though it were literally a place of the dead. Too
wary and distrustful to rely, in circumstances of so
much doubt, on the discretion of any less firm and
crafty than himself, the Dahcotah bade his
companions
remain where they lay, and pursued the
adventure
alone.
The progress of Mahtoree was now slow, and to
one less accustomed to such a species of exercise, it
would have proved painfully laborious. But the
advance
of the wily snake itself is not more certain or
noiseless than was his approach. He drew his form,
foot by foot, through the bending grass, pausing at
each movement to catch the smallest sound that
might betray any knowledge on the part of the
travellers
of his proximity. He succeeded, at length, in
dragging himself out of the sickly light of the moon,
into the shadows of the brake, where not only his
own dark person was much less liable to be seen,
but where the sorrounding objects became more
distinctly
visible to his keen and active glances.
Here the Teton paused long and warily to make
his observations, before he ventured further. His
position enabled him to bring the whole
encampment
,
with its tent, wagons and lodges, into a dark
but clearly marked profile; furnishing a clue by which
the practised warrior was led to a tolerably accurate
estimate of the force he was about to encounter.
Still an unnatural silence pervaded the spot, as
though men suppressed even the quiet breathings of
sleep, in order to render the appearance of their
confidence more evident. The chief bent his head
to the earth, and listened intently. He was about to
raise it again in disappointment, when the long drawn
and trembling respiration of one who slumbered
imperfectly
met his ear. The Indian was too well
skilled in all the means of deception to become
himself
the victim of any common artifice. He knew
the sound to be natural, by its peculiar quivering,
and he hesitated no longer.
A man of nerves less tried than those of the fierce
and conquering Mahtoree would have been keenly
sensible of all the hazard he now so fearlessly
incurred
.
The reputation of those hardy and powerful
white adventurers, who so often penetrated the wilds
inhabited by his people, was well known to him; but
while he drew nigher, with the respect and caution
that a brave enemy never fails to inspire, it was with
the vindictive animosity of a red man, jealous and
resentful of the lawless inroads of the stranger.
Turning from the line of his former route, the
Teton dragged himself directly towards the margin
of the thicket. When this material object was
effected
in safety, he arose to his seat, and took a still
better survey of his situation. A single moment
served
to apprise him of the place where the
unsuspecting
traveller lay. The reader will readily anticipate
that the savage had succeeded in gaining a dangerous
proximity to one of those slothful sons of Ishmael,
who were deputed to watch over the isolated
encampment
of the travellers.
When certain that he was undiscovered, the
Dahcotah
raised his person again, and bending forward,
he moved his dark visage above the face of the
sleeper
,
in that sort of wanton and subtle manner with
which a reptile is often seen to play about its victim
before it strikes the deadly blow. Satisfied at length,
by his scrutiny, not only of the condition but of the
character of the stranger, Mahtoree was in the act
of withdrawing his head when a slight movement on
the part of the sleeper announced the symptoms of
reviving consciousness. The savage seized the knife
which hung at his girdle, and in an instant it was
poised above the breast of the young emigrant.
Then changing his purpose, with an action as rapid
as his own flashing thoughts, he sunk back behind the
trunk of the fallen tree against which the other
reclined
,
and lay in its shadow, as dark, as motionless,
and apparently as insensible as the wood itself.
The slothful sentinel opened his heavy eyes, and
after gazing upward for a moment at the hazy
heavens
,
he made an extraordinary exertion and raised
his powerful frame from the support of the log.
Then he looked about him, with an air of something
like watchfulness, suffering his dull glances to run
over the misty objects of the encampment until they
finally settled on the distant and dim field of the open
prairie. Meeting with nothing more attractive than
the same faint outlines of swell and interval, which
everywhere rose before his drowsy eyes, he changed
his position so as completely to turn his back on his
dangerous neighbour, and suffered his person to sink
sluggishly down into its former recumbent attitude.
A long, and, on the part of the Teton, an anxious and
painful silence succeeded, before the deep breathing
of the traveller again announced that he was
indulging
in his slumbers. The savage was, however, far
too jealous of a counterfeit to trust to the first
appearance
of sleep. But the fatigues of a day of
unusual
toil lay too heavy on the sentinel to leave the
other long in doubt. Still the motion with which
Mahtoree again raised himself to his knees was so
noiseless and guarded, that even a vigilant observer
might have hesitated to believe he stirred. The
change was, however, at length effected, and the
Dahcotah
chief, then bent again over his enemy, without
having produced a noise louder than that of the
cotton-wood
leaf which fluttered at his side in the
currents
of the passing air.
Mahtoree now felt himself master of the sleeper's
fate. At the same time that he scanned the vast
proportions
and athletic limbs of the youth, in that sort
of admiration which physical excellence seldom fails
to excite in the breast of a savage, he very coolly
prepared to extinguish the principle of vitality which
could alone render them formidable. After making
himself sure of the seat of life, by gently removing
the folds of the intervening cloth, he raised his keen
weapon, and was about to unite his strength and skill
in the impending blow, when the young man threw
his brawny arm carelessly backward, exhibiting in
the action the vast volume of its muscles.
The sagacious and wary Teton paused. It struck
his acute faculties that sleep was less dangerous to
him, at that moment, than even death itself might
prove. The smallest noise, the agony of struggling,
with which such a frame would probably relinquish
its hold of life, suggested themselves to his rapid
thoughts, and were all present to his experienced
senses. He looked back into the encampment,
turned
his head into the thicket, and glanced his glowing
eyes abroad into the wild and silent prairies.
Bending
once more over the respited victim, he assured
himself that he was sleeping heavily, and then
abandoned
his immediate purpose in obedience alone to
the suggestions of a more crafty policy.
The retreat of Mahtoree was as still and guarded
as had been his approach. He now took the
direction
of the encampment, stealing along the margin
of the brake, as a cover into which he might easily
plunge at the smallest alarm. The drapery of the
solitary hut attracted his notice in passing. After
examining the whole of its exterior, and listening
with painful intensity, in order to gather counsel from
his ears, the savage ventured to raise the cloth at the
bottom, and to thrust his dark visage beneath. It
might have been a minute before the Teton chief
drew back and seated himself again with the whole
of his form without the linen tenement. Here he
sat, seemingly brooding over his own reflections, for
many moments, in rigid inaction. Then he resumed
his crouching attitude, and once more projected his
visage beyond the covering of the linen dwelling.
His second visit to the interior was longer, and, if
possible, more ominous than the first. But it had,
like every thing else, its termination, and the savage
again withdrew his glaring eyes from the secrets of
the place.
Mahtoree had drawn his person many yards from
the spot, in his slow progress towards the cluster of
objects which pointed out the centre of the position,
before he again stopped. Then he made another
pause, and looked back at the solitary little dwelling
he had left, as if doubtful whether he should not
return
.
But the chevaux-de-frise of branches now lay
within reach of his arm, and the very appearance of
precaution it presented, as it announced the value of
the effects it encircled, tempted his cupidity the
more strongly, and induced him to proceed.
The passage of the savage through the tender and
brittle limbs of the cotton-wood could be likened
only to the sinuous and noiseless winding of the
reptiles
which he imitated no less in sagacity than
in the manner of his approach. When, however, he
had effected his object, and had taken an instant to
become acquainted with the nature of the localities
within the enclosure, the Teton used the precaution
to open a way through which a retreat might be
made with fewer impediments to obstruct its
rapidiity
.
Then raising himself on his feet, he stalked
through the encampment, like the master of evil,
seeking
whom and what he should first devote to his fell
purposes. He had already ascertained the contents
of the lodge in which were collected the woman and
her young children, and had passed several gigantic
frames, stretched on different piles of brush, which
happily for him lay in unconscious helplessness, when
he at last reached the spot occupied by Ishmael in
person. It could not escape the sagacity of one like
Mahtoree, that he had now within his power the
principal man among the travellers. He stood long
hovering above the recumbent and Herculean form
of the emigrant, keenly debating in his own mind the
chances of his enterprise, and the most effectual
means of reaping its richest harvest.
He had sheathed the knife, which, under the hasty
and burning impulse of his thoughts, he had been
tempted to draw, and was passing on, when Ishmael
turned in his lair, and demanded roughly who it was
that he dimly saw moving before his half-opened
eyes. Nothing short of the readiness and cunning
of a savage could now have evaded bringing the
crisis
to an immediate issue. Imitating the gruff tones
and nearly unintelligible sounds he heard, Mahtoree
threw his body heavily on the earth, and appeared
to dispose himself to sleep. Though the whole
movement was seen by Ishmael in a sort of stupid
observation. the artifice was too bold and too
admirably
Vol. I. G
executed to fail of success. The drowsy father
once more closed his eyes, and soon slept heavily,
with this treacherous inmate in the very bosom of
his family.
It was necessary for the Teton to maintain the
position he had taken for many long and weary
minutes
,
in order to make sure that he was no longer
watched. Though his body lay so motionless, his
active mind was not idle. He profited by the delay
to mature a plan which he intended should put the
whole encampment, including both its effects and
their proprietors, entirely at his mercy. The instant
he could do so with safety, the indefatigable savage
was again in motion. He now took his way towards
the slight pen which contained the domestic animals,
worming himself along the ground in his former
subtle
and guarded manner.
The first animal he encountered among the beasts
occasioned a long and hazardous delay. The weary
creature, perhaps conscious through its secret instinct
that in the endless wastes of the prairies its surest
protector was to be found in man, was so exceedingly
docile as quietly to submit to the close examination
it was doomed to undergo. The hand of the
wandering
Teton passed over the downy coat, the meek
countenance and the slender limbs of the gentle
animal
,
with untiring curiosity; but he finally
abandoned
the prize, as useless in his predatory expeditions,
and offering too little temptation to the appetite. As
soon, however, as he found himself among the beasts
of burden, his gratification was extreme, and it was
with difficulty that he restrained the customary
ejaculations
of pleasure that were more than once on the
point of bursting from his lips. Here he lost sight
of the hazards by which he had gained access to his
dangerous position, and the watchfulness of the wary
and long practised warrior was momentarily
forgotten
in the exultation of a savage.
CHAPTER V.
Why, worthy father, what have we to lose?
The law
Protects us not. Then why should we be tender
To let an arrogant piece of flesh threat us!
Play judge and executioner.
Cymbeline
.
While
the Teton warrior thus enacted his subtle
and characteristic part, not a sound broke the
stillness
of the surrounding prairie. The whole band
lay at their several posts, waiting, with the
wellknown
patience of the natives, for the signal which
was to summon them to action. To the eyes of the
anxious and deeply interested spectators who
occupied
the little eminence already described as the
position of the captives, the scene merely presented
the broad, solemn view of a waste, dimly lighted by
the glimmering rays of a clouded moon. The place
of the encampment was marked by a gloom deeper
than that which faintly shadowed out the courses of
the bottoms, and here and there a brighter streak
tinged the rolling summits of the ridges. As for the
rest, it was the deep, imposing, breathing quiet of a
desert.
But to those who so well knew how much was
brooding beneath this mantle of stillness and night,
it was a scene of high and wild excitement. Their
anxiety gradually increased, as minute after minute
passed away, and not the smallest sound of life arose
out of the calm and darkness which enveloped the
brake. The breathing of Paul grew louder and
deeper
,
and more than once Ellen trembled at she knew
not what, as she felt the quivering of his active frame,
while she leaned dependantly on his arm for support.
The shallow honesty, as well as the besetting
infirmity
of Weucha, have already been exhibited.
The reader, therefore, will not be surprised to learn
that he was the first to forget the regulations he had
himself imposed. It was at the precise moment
when we left Mahtoree yielding to his nearly
ungovernable
delight, as he surveyed the number and
quality
of Ishmael's beasts of burden, that the man he
had selected to watch his captives chose to indulge
in the malignant pleasure of tormenting those it was
his duty to protect. Bending his head nigh to the
ears of the trapper, the savage rather muttered than
whispered
If the Tetons lose their great chief by the hands
of the Long-knives, old shall die as well as young!
Life is the gift of the Wahcondah, was the
unmoved
replyThe burnt-wood warrior must
submit
to his laws, as well as his other children. Men
only die when
he
chooses; and no Dahcotah can
change the hour.
Look! returned the savage, thrusting the blade
of his knife before the face of his captive. Weucha
is the Wahcondah of a dog.
The old man raised his eyes to the fierce visage
of his keeper, and, for a moment, a gleam of honest
and powerful disgust shot from their deep cells; but
it instantly passed away, leaving in its place an
expression
of commiseration, if not of sorrow.
Why should one made in the real image of God
suffer his natur' to be provoked by a mere effigy of
reason! he said in English, and in tones much louder
than those in which Weucha had chosen to pitch the
conversation. The latter profited by the
unintentional
offence of his captive, and seizing him by the
thin, grey locks, that fell from beneath his cap, was
on the point of passing the blade of his knife in
malignant
triumph around their roots, when a long,
shrill, yell rent the air, and was instantly echoed
from the surrounding waste, as though a thousand
demons
had opened their throats in common at the
summons. Weucha relinquished his grasp and
uttered
a cry of savage exultation.
Now! shouted Paul, unable to control his
impatience
any longer, now, old Ishmael, is the time
to show the native blood of Kentucky! Fire low,
boysLevel into the swales, for the red skins are
settling to the very earth!
His voice was, however, lost, or rather unheeded,
in the midst of the shrieks, shouts, and yells, that
were by this time, bursting from fifty mouths on
every
side of him. The guards still maintained their
posts at the side of the captives, but it was with
that sort of difficulty with which steeds are
restrained
at the starting-post, when expecting the signal to
commence the trial of their speed. They tossed
their arms wildly in the air, leaping up and down
more like exulting children than sober men, and
continued
to utter the most frantic and savage cries.
In the midst of this tumultuous disorder a rushing
sound was heard, similar to that which might be
expected
to precede the passage of a flight of buffaloes,
and then came the flocks and cattle of Ishmael into
view, in one confused and frightened drove.
They have robbed the squatter of his beasts!
said the attentive trapper. The reptiles have left
him as hoofless as a beaver! He was yet speaking
when the whole body of the terrified animals rose the
little acclivity and swept by the place where he stood,
followed by a band of dusky and demon-like looking
figures, who pressed madly on their rear.
The impulse was communicated to the Teton
horses
,
who were long accustomed to sympathize in the
untutored passions of their owners, and it was with
difficulty that their keepers were enabled to restrain
them. At this moment, when all eyes were directed
to the passing whirlwind of men and beasts, the
trapper
caught the knife from the hands of his
inattentive
keeper, with a power that his age would have
G 2
seemed to contradict, and at a single blow severed
the thong of hide which connected the whole of the
drove. The wild animals snorted with joy and
terror
,
and tearing the earth with their heels, they
dashed
away into the broad prairies, in a dozen different
directions.
Weucha turned upon his assailant with the ferocity
and agility of a tiger. He felt for the weapon of
which he had been so suddenly deprived, fumbled
with impotent haste for the handle of his tomahawk,
and at the same moment glanced his eyes after his
flying cattle, with all the longings of a Western
Indian
.
The struggle between thirst for vengeance and
cupidity was short but severe. The latter quickly
predominated in the bosom of one whose passions
were proverbially grovelling, and scarcely a moment
intervened between the flight of the animals and the
swift pursuit of all the guards. The trapper had
continued
calmly facing his foe, during the instants of
suspense that succeeded his own hardy act, and now
that Weucha was seen following his companions, he
pointed after the dark train, saying, with his deep and
nearly inaudible laugh
Red-natur' is red-natur', let it show itself on a
prairie, or in a forest! A knock on the head would
be the smallest reward to him who should take such
a liberty with a Christian sentinel; but there goes
the Teton after his horses as if he thought two legs
as good as four in such a race! And yet the imps
will have every hoof of them afore the day sets in,
because its reason ag'in instinct. Poor reason, I
allow
;
but still there is a great deal of the man in an
Indian. Ah's me! your Delawares were the red-skins
of which America might boast; but few and
scattered
is that mighty people, now! Well! the traveller
may just make his pitch where he is; he has plenty
of water, though natur' has cheated him of the
pleasure
of stripping the 'arth of its lawful trees. He
has seen the last of his four-footed creatures, or I am
but little skilled in Sioux cunning.
Had we not better join the party of Ishmael,
said the bee-hunter. There will be a regular fight
about this matter, or the old fellow has suddenly
grown chicken-hearted.
Nonono, hastily exclaimed Ellen.
She was stopped by the trapper, who laid his hand
gently on her mouth as he answered
Hist!hist!the sound of voices might bring
us into danger. Is your friend, he added turning to
Paul, a man of spirit enough
Don't call the squatter a friend of mine!
interrupted
the youth. I never yet harboured with one
who could not show hand and seal for the land which
fed him.
Wellwell. Let it then be acquaintance. Is he
a man to maintain his own stoutly by dint of powder
and lead?
His own! ay, and that which is not his own, too!
Can you tell me, old trapper, who held the rifle that
did the deed for the sheriff's deputy, that thought to
rout the unlawful settlers who had gathered nigh the
Buffaloe lick in old Kentucky! I had lined a
beautiful
swarm that very day into the hollow of a dead
beech, and there lay the people's officer at its roots,
with a hole directly through the grace of God;
which he carried in his jacket pocket covering his
heart, as though he thought a bit of sheepskin was a
breastplate against a squatter's bullet! Now, Ellen,
you need'n't, be troubled; for it never strictly was
brought home to him; and there were fifty others
who had pitched in that neighbourhood with just the
same assistance from the law.
The poor girl shuddered, struggling powerfully to
suppress the sigh which arose in spite of her efforts,
as if from the very bottom of her heart.
Thoroughly satisfied that he understood the
character
of the emigrants, by the short but
comprehensive
description conveyed in Paul's reply, the old
man raised no further question concerning the
readiness
of Ishmael to revenge his wrongs, but rather
followed
that train of thoughts which was suggested to
his experience by the occasion.
Each one knows the ties which bind him to his
fellow-creatures best, he answered. Though it is
greatly to be mourned that colour, and property, and
tongue, and l'arning should make so wide a difference
in those who, after all, are but the children of one
father! Howsomever, he continued, by a transition
not a little characteristic of the pursuits and feelings
of the man, as this is a business in which there is
much more likelihood of a fight than need for a
sermon
,
it is best to be prepared for what may follow
Hush! there is a movement below; it is an equal
chance that we are seen.
The family is stirring; cried Ellen with a tremor
in her voice that announced nearly as much terror at
the approach of her friends, as she had before
manifested
at the presence of her enemies. Go, Paul,
leave me.
You,
at least, must not be seen!
If I leave you, Ellen, in this desert before I see
you safe in the care of old Ishmael, at least, may I
never hear the hum of another bee, or, what is
worse, fail in sight to line him to his hive!
You forget this good old man. He will not leave
me. Though I am sure, Paul, we have parted before,
where there has been more of a desert than this.
Never! These Indians may come whooping back,
and then where are you! Half way to the Rocky
Mountains before a man can fairly strike the line of
your flight. What think you, old trapper? How
long may it be before these Tetons, as you call them,
will be coming for the rest of old Ishmael's goods
and chattels?
No fear of them, returned the old man again,
laughing in his own peculiar and silent manner; I
warrant me the devils will be scampering after their
beasts these six hours yet! Listen! you may hear
them in the willow bottoms at this very moment; ay,
your real Sioux cattle will run like so many
long-legged
elks. Hist! crouch again into the grass, down
with ye both; as I'm a miserable piece of clay, I
heard the ticking of a gun-lock!
The trapper did not allow his companions time to
hesitate, but dragging them both after him, he nearly
buried his own person in the fog of the prairie, while
he was speaking. It was fortunate that the senses of
the aged hunter remained so acute, and that he had
lost none of his readiness of action. The three were
scarcely bowed to the ground, when their ears were
saluted with the well-known sharp, short reports of
the western rifle, and instantly, the whizzing of the
ragged lead was heard, buzzing within a dangerous
proximity of their heads.
Well done, young chips! well done, old block!
whispered Paul, whose spirits no danger nor situation
could entirely depress. As pretty a volley, as one
would wish to hear on the wrong end of a rifle!
What say, trapper! here is likely to be a
three-cornered
war. Shall I give'em as good as they send?
Give them nothing, but fair words, returned
the other, hastily, or you are both lost.
I'm not certain it would much mend the matter,
if I were to speak with my tongue instead of the
piece, said Paul in a tone half jocular half bitter.
For the sake of heaven, do not let them hear
you! cried Ellen! Go, Paul, go; you may easily
go!
Several shots in quick succession, each sending its
dangerous messenger, still nearer than the preceding
discharge, cut short her speech, no less in prudence
than in terror.
This must end, said the trapper rising with the
dignity of one bent only on the importance of his
object
.
I know not what need ye may have, children,
to fear those you should both love and honour, but
something must be done to save your lives. A few
hours more or less can never be missed from the time
of one who has already numbered so many days;
therefore I will advance. Here is a clear space
around you. Profit by it as you need, and may God
bless and prosper each of you, as ye deserve!
Without waiting for any reply, the trapper walked
boldly down the declivity in his front, taking the
direction
of the encampment, neither quickening his
pace in trepidation, nor suffering it to be retarded by
fear. The light of the moon fell brighter for a
moment
on his tall, gaunt form, and served to warn the
emigrants of his approach. Indifferent, however,
to this unfavourable circumstance, he held his way,
silently and steadily towards the copse, until a stern,
threatening voice met him with the challenge of
Who comes; friend or foe?
Friend, was the reply; one who has lived too
long to disturb the close of life with quarrels.
But not so long as to forget the tricks of his
youth, said Ishmael, rearing his huge frame from
beneath the slight covering of a low bush, and
meeting
the trapper, face to face; old man, you have
brought this tribe of red devils upon us, and
to-morrow
you will be sharing the booty.
What have you lost? calmly demanded the
trapper.
Eight as good mares as ever travelled in gears,
besides a foal that is worth thirty of the brightest
Mexicans that bear the face of the King of Spain.
Then the woman has not a cloven hoof for her dairy
or her loom, and I believe even the grunters, foot
sore as they be, are ploughing the prairie. And
now, stranger, he added, dropping the butt of his
rifle on the hard earth, with a violence and clatter
that would have intimidated one less firm than the
man he addressed, how many of these creatures,
may fall to your lot?
Horses have I never craved, nor even used;
though few have journeyed over more of the wide
lands of America than myself, old and feeble as I
seem. But little use is there for a horse among the
hills and woods of Yorkthat is, as York was, but
as I greatly fear York is no longeras for woollen
covering and cow's milk, I covet no such womanly
fashions! The beasts of the field give me food and
raiment. No, I crave no cloth better than the skin
of a deer, nor any meat richer than his flesh.
The sincere manner of the trapper, as he uttered
this simple vindication, was not entirely thrown away
on the emigrant, whose dull nature was gradually
quickening into a flame, that might speedily have
burst forth with dangerous violence. He listened
like one who doubted, though not entirely convinced;
and he muttered between his teeth the denunciation,
with which a moment before he intended to precede
the summary vengeance he had certainly meditated.
This is brave talking, he at length grumbled;
but to my judgment, too lawyer-like, for a straight
forward, fair-weather, and foul-weather hunter.
I claim to be no better than a trapper, the other
meekly interrupted.
Hunter or trapperThere is little difference. I
have come, old man, into these districts because I
found the law sitting too tight upon me, and am not
over fond of neighbours who can't settle a dispute
without troubling a justice and twelve men; but I
didn't come to be robb'd of my plunder, and then to
say thank'ee to the man who did it!
He, who ventures far into the prairies, must abide
by the ways of its owners.
Owners! echoed the sullen squatter, I am as
rightful an owner of the land I stand on, as any
governor
in all the states! Can you tell me, stranger,
where the law or the reason is to be found, which
says that one man shall have a section, or a town, or
perhaps a county, to his use, and another have to
beg for earth to make his grave in. This is not
nature, and I deny that it is law. That is, your legal
law.
I cannot say that you are wrong, returned the
trapper, whose opinions on this important topic,
though drawn from very different premises, were in
singular accordance with those of his companion,
and I have often thought and said as much, when
and where I have believed my voice could be heard.
But your beasts are stolen by them who claim to be
masters of all they find in the deserts.
They had better not dispute that matter with a
man who knows better, said the other in a voice of
portentous tones, though it seemed as deep and
sluggish
as he who uttered it. I call myself a fair trader,
and one who gives to his chaps as good as he
receives
.
You saw the Indians?
I didthey held me a prisoner, while they stole
into your camp.
It would have been more like a white-man and
a christian, to have let me known as much in better
season; retorted Ishmael, casting another ominous
side-long glance at the trapper, as if still meditating
evil. I am not much given to call every man I fall
in with, cousin, but colour should be something, when
christians meet in such a place as this. But what is
done, is done, and cannot be mended, by words.
Come out of your ambush boys; here is no one but
the old man: he has eaten of my bread, and should
be a friend; though there is such good reason to
suspect
him of harbouring with my enemies.
The trapper made no reply to the harsh suspicion
which the other did not scruple to utter without the
smallest delicacy, notwithstanding the explanations
and denials to which he had just listened. The
summons
of the unnurtured squatter brought an
immediate
accession to their party. Four or five of his sons
made their appearance from beneath as many covers,
where they had been posted under the impression
that the figures they had seen, on the swell of the
prairie, were a part of the Sioux band. As each
man approached, and dropped his rifle into the
hollow
of his arm, he cast an indolent but inquiring
glance at the form of the stranger, though neither of
them expressed the least curiosity to know whence
he had come or why he was there. This forbearance,
however, proceeded only in part, from the
sluggishness
of their common temper; for long and frequent
experience in scenes of a similar character, had
taught them the virtue of discretion. The trapper
endured their sullen but silent scrutiny with the
steadiness of one as practised as themselves, and with
the entire composure of innocence. Content with
the momentary examination he had made, the eldest
of the groupe, who was in truth the delinquent
sentinel
by whose remissness the wily Mahtoree had so
well profited, turned towards his father and said
bluntly:
If this man is all that is left of the party I saw
on the upland, yonder, we haven't altogether thrown
away our ammunition.
Asa, you are right; said the father, turning
suddenly
on the trapper, as though a lost idea was
recalled
by the hint of his sluggish son. How is it,
stranger; there were three of you, just now, or there
is no virtue in moonlight!
If you had seen the Tetons racing across the
prairies, like so many black-looking evil-ones, on the
heels of your cattle, my friend, it would have been
an easy matter to have fancied them a thousand.
Ay, for a town bred boy or a skeary woman;
though, for that matter, there is old Esther yon; she
Vol. I. H
has no more fear of a red-skin than of a suckling
cub, or of a wolf pup. I'll warrant ye, had your
stealing devils made their push by the light of the
sun, the good woman would have been seen smartly
at work among them, and the Siouxes would have
found she was not given to part with her cheese and
her butter without a price. But there'll come a time,
stranger, right soon, when justice will have its dues,
and that too, without the help of what is called the
law. We ar' of a slow breed, it may be said, and it
is often said of us; but slow is sure; and there ar'
few men, living, who can say they ever struck a
blow, that they did not get one as hard in return,
from Ishmael Bush.
Then has Ishmael Bush followed the instinct of
the beasts rather than the genuine principle which
ought to belong to his kind, returned the stubborn
trapper. I have struck many a blow myself, but
never have I felt the same ease of mind that of right
belongs to a man who follows his reason, after
slaying
even a fawn when there was no call for his meat
or hide, as I have felt at leaving a Mingo unburied in
the woods, when following the trade of open and
honest warfare.
What, you have been a soldier, have you,
trapper
!
I made a forage or two among the Cherokees,
when I was a lad myself; and I followed mad
Anthony
,
one season, through the beeches; but there was
altogether too much tatooing and regulating among
his troops for me; so I left him without calling on
the paymaster to settle my arrearages. Though, as
Esther afterwards boasted, she had made such use
of the pay-ticket, that the States gained no great
sum, by the oversight. You have heard of such a
man as mad Anthony, if you tarried long among the
soldiers.
I fou't my last battle, as I hope, under his orders,
returned the trapper, a gleam of sun-shine shooting
from his dim eyes, as if the event was recollected
with pleasure, and then a sudden shade of sorrow
succeeding, as though he felt a secret admonition
against dwelling on the violent scenes in which he
had so often been an actor. I was passing from
the states on the sea shore into these far regions,
when I cross'd the trail of his party, and I fell in, on
his rear, just as a looker-on; but when they got to
blows, the crack of my rifle was heard among the
rest, though to my shame it may be said, I never
knew the right of the quarrel as well as a man of
threescore and ten should know the reason of his
acts afore he takes mortal life, which is a gift he
never can return!
Come, stranger, said the emigrant, his rugged
nature a good deal softened when he found that they
had fought on the same side in the wild warfare of
the west, it is of small account, what may be the
ground-work of the disturbance, when it's a Christian
ag'in a savage. We shall hear more of this
horse-stealing
to-morrow; to-night we can do no wiser or
safer thing than to sleep.
So saying, Ishmael deliberately led the way back
towards his rifled encampment, and ushered the man,
whose life a few minutes before had been in real
jeopardy through his resentment, into the presence
of his family. Here, with a very few words of
explanation
,
mingled with scarce but ominous
denunciations
against the plunderers, he made his wife
acquainted
with the state of things on the Prairie, and
then announced his own determination to compensate
himself for his broken rest, by devoting the
remainder
of the night to sleep.
The trapper gave his ready assent to the measure,
and adjusted his gaunt form on the pile of brush that
was offered him, with as much composure as a
sovereign
,
could resign himself to sleep in the security of
his capital and surrounded by his armed protectors.
The old man, did not close his eyes, however, until
he had assured himself that Ellen Wade was among
the females of the family, and that her relation or
lover, whichever he might be, had observed the
caution
of keeping himself out of view: after which he
slept, though with the peculiar watchfulness of one
long accustomed to vigilance, even in the hours of
deepest night.
CHAPTER VI.
He is too picked, too spruce, too affected, too odd,
As it were too peregrinate, as I may call it.
Shakspeare
.
The
Anglo-American is apt to boast, and not
without
a show of reason, that his nation may claim a
descent more truly honourable than that of any other
people whose history is to be credited. Whatever
might have been the weaknesses of the original
colonists
,
their virtues have rarely been disputed. If
they were superstitious, they were sincerely pious,
and, consequently, honest. The descendants of these
simple and single-minded provincials have been
content
to reject the ordinary and artificial means by
which honours have been perpetuated in families,
and have substituted a standard which brings the
individual
himself to the ordeal of the public
estimation
,
paying as little deference as may be to those
who have gone before him. This forbearance,
self-denial
,
or common sense, or by whatever term it may
be thought proper to distinguish the measure, has
subjected the nation to the imputation of having an
ignoble origin. Were it worth the enquiry, it would
be found that more than a just proportion of the
renowned
names of the mother country are, at this
hour, to be found in her ci-devant colonies, and it is
a fact well known to the few who have wasted
sufficient
time to become the masters of so unimportant
a subject, that the direct descendants of many a
failing
line, which the policy of England has seen fit to
sustain by collateral supporters, are now discharging
the simple duties of citizens in the bosom of our
republic
.
The hive has remained stationary, and they
who flutter around the venerable straw are wont to
claim the empty distinction of antiquity, regardless
alike of the frailty of their tenement and of the
enjoyments
of the numerous and vigorous swarms that
are culling the fresher sweets of a virgin world. But
as this is a subject which belongs rather to the
politician
and historian than to the humble narrator of the
home-bred incidents we are about to reveal, we must
confine our reflections to such matters as have an
immediate
relation to the subject of the tale.
Although the citizen of the United States may
claim so just an ancestry, he is far from being
exempt
from the penalties of his fallen race. Like
causes are well known to produce like effects. That
tribute, which, it would seem nations must ever pay,
by way of a weary probation, around the shrine of
Ceres before they can be indulged in her fullest
favours
,
is in some measure exacted in America, from
the descendant instead of the ancestor. The march
of civilization with us, has a strong analogy to that of
all coming events, which are known to cast their
shadows before. The gradations of society, from
that state which is called refined to that which
approaches
as near barbarity as connexion with an
intelligent
people will readily allow, are to be traced
from the bosom of the states, where wealth, luxury
and the arts are beginning to seat themselves, to
those distant, and ever-receding borders which mark
the skirts, and announce the approach, of the nation,
as moving mists precede the signs of day.
Here, and here only, is to be found that widely
H 2
spread though far from numerous class which may
be at all likened to those who have paved the way
for the intellectual progress of nations, in the old
world. The resemblance between the American
borderer and his European prototype is singular,
though not always uniform. Both might be called
without restraint; the one being above, the other
beyond the reach of the lawbrave, because they
were inured to dangersproud, because they were
independent, and vindictive, because each was the
avenger of his own wrongs. It would be unjust to
the borderer to pursue the parallel much farther.
He is irreligious, because he has inherited the
knowledge
that religion does not exist in forms, and his
reason rejects a mockery that his conscience does
not approve. He is not a knight, because he has not
the power to bestow distinctions; and he has not the
power, because he is the offspring and not the parent
of a system. In what manner these several qualities
are exhibited, in some of the most strongly marked
of the latter class, will be seen in the course of the
ensuing narrative.
Ishmael Bush had passed the whole of a life of
more than fifty years on the skirts of society. He
boasted that he had never dwelt where he might not
safely fell every tree he could view from his own
threshold; that the law had rarely been known to
enter his clearing, and that his ears had never
willingly
admitted the sound of a church bell. His
exertions
seldom exceeded his wants, which were peculiar
to his class, and rarely failed of being supplied. He
had no respect for any learning except that of the
leech; because he was ignorant of the application
of any other intelligence, than such as met the
senses. His deference to this particular branch of
science had induced him to listen to the application
of a medical man, whose thirst for natural history
had led him to the desire of profiting by the
migratory
propensities of the squatter. This gentleman he
had cordially received into his family, or rather
under
his protection, and they had journeyed together,
thus far through the prairies, in perfect harmony:
Ishmael often felicitating his wife on the possession
of a companion, who would be so serviceable in their
new abode, wherever it might chance to be, until the
family were thoroughly acclimated. The
pursuits
of the naturalist frequently led him, however,
for days at a time, from the direct line of the route
of the squatter, who rarely seemed to have any other
guide than the sun. Most men would have deemed
themselves fortunate to have been absent on the
perilous occasion of the Sioux inroad, as was Obed
Bat, (or as he was fond of hearing himself called,
Battius) M. D. and fellow of several cis-atlantic
learned societiesthe adventurous gentleman in
question.
Although the sluggish nature of Ishmael was not
actually awakened, it was sorely pricked by the
liberties
which had just been taken with his property.
He slept, however, for it was the hour he had
allotted
to that refreshment, and because he knew how
impotent any exertions to recover his effects must
prove in the darkness of midnight. He also knew
the danger of his present situation too well, to
hazard
what was left, in pursuit of that which was lost.
Much as the inhabitants of the prairies were known
to love horses, their attachment to many other
articles
,
still in the possession of the travellers, was
equally well understood. It was a common artifice
to scatter the herds, and profit by the confusion. But,
Mahtoree, had it would seem in this particular,
undervalued
the acuteness of the man he had assailed.
The phlegm with which the squatter learned his loss,
has already been seen, and it now remains to exhibit
the results of his more matured determinations.
Though the encampment contained many an eye
that was long unclosed, and many an ear that listened
greedily to catch the faintest evidence of any new
alarm, it lay in deep quiet during the remainder of
the night. Silence and fatigue finally performed their
accustomed offices, and before the morning all but
the sentinels were again buried in sleep. How well
these indolent watchers performed their duties, after
the assault, has never been known, inasmuch as
nothing occurred to confirm or disprove their
subsequent
vigilance.
Just as day, however, began to dawn, and a gray
light was falling from the heavens, on the dusky
objects
of the plain, the half startled, anxious and yet
blooming countenance of Ellen Wade was reared
above the confused mass of children, among whom
she had clustered on her stolen return to the camp
Arising warily she stepped lightly across the
recumbent
bodies, and proceeded with the same caution to
the utmost limits of the defences of Ishmael. Here,
she listened, as though she doubted the propriety of
venturing further. The pause was only momentary,
however; and long before the drowsy eyes of the
sentinel, who overlooked the spot where she stood,
had time to catch a glimpse of her active form, it
had glided along the bottom and stood on the summit
of the nearest eminence.
Ellen now listened long and intently to hear some
other sound, than the breathing of the morning air,
which faintly rustled the herbage at her feet. She
was about to turn in disappointment from the
inquiry
,
when the sound of human feet making their way
through the matted grass met her ear. Springing
eagerly forward, she soon beheld the outlines of a
figure advancing up the eminence, on the side
opposite
to the camp, as though it had caught the view of
her own person drawn against the heavens. She had
already uttered the name of Paul, and was
beginning
to speak in the hurried and eager voice with
which female affection is apt to greet a friend, when,
drawing back, the disappointed girl closed her
salutation
by coldly adding:
I did not expect, Doctor, to meet you at this
unusual
hour.
All hours and all seasons are alike, my good
Ellen, to the genuine lover of naturereturned a
small, slightly made, but exceedingly active man,
dressed in an odd mixture of cloth and skins, a little
past the middle age, who advanced directly to her
side, with the familiarity of an old acquaintance;
and he who does not know how to find things to
admire by this gray light, is ignorant of a large
portion
of the blessings he enjoys.
Very true, said Ellen, suddenly recollecting the
necessity of accounting for her own appearance
abroad at that unseasonable hour, I know many
who think the earth has a pleasanter look in the
night, than when seen by the brightest sunshine.
Ah! Their organs of sight must be too convex.
But the man who wishes to study the active habits
of the feline race, or the variety, albinos, must be
stirring at this hour. I dare say, there are men who
prefer even looking at objects by twilight, for the
simple reason, that they see better at that time of
the day.
And is this the cause why you are so much
abroad in the night?
I am abroad at night, my good girl, because the
earth in its diurnal revolutions leaves the light of the
sun but half the time on any given meridian, and
because
what I have to do cannot be performed in
twelve or fifteen consecutive hours. Now have I
been off two days from the family, in search of a
plant, that is known to exist on the tributaries of La
Platte, without seeing even a blade of grass that is
not already enumerated and classed.
You have been unfortunate, Doctor, but
Unfortunate! echoed the little man, sideling
nigher to his companion, and producing his tablets
with an air in which exultation struggled, strangely,
with an affectation of self abasement. No, no,
Ellen
,
I am any thing but unfortunate. Unless, indeed
a man may be so called, whose fortune is made,
whose fame may be said to be established for ever,
whose name will go down to posterity with that of
BuffonBuffon! a mere compiler; one who
flourishes
on the foundation of other men's labours. No;
pari passu with Solander, who bought his knowledge
with pain and privations!
Have you discovered a mine, Doctor Bat?
More than a mine; a treasure coined, and fit for
instant use, girlListen! I was making the angle
necessary to intersect the line of your uncle's march,
after my fruitless search, when I heard sounds like
the explosion produced by fire arms
Yes, exclaimed Ellen eagerly, we had an
alarm
And thought I was lost, continued the man of
science, too much bent on his own ideas, to
understand
her interruption. Little danger of that. I
made my own base, knew the length of the
perpendicular
by calculation, and to draw the hypothenuse
had nothing to do but to work my angle. I supposed
the guns were fired for my benefit, and changed my
course for the soundsnot that I think the senses
more accurate, or even as accurate as a
mathematical
calculation, but I feared, that some of the
children
might need my services.
They are all happily
Listen; interrupted the other, already
forgetting
his affected anxiety for his patients, in the
greater
importance of the present subject. I had
crossed
a large tract of prairiefor sound is conveyed far
where there is little obstructionwhen I heard the
trampling of feet, as though bisons were beating the
earth. Then I caught a distant view of a herd of
quadrupeds, rushing up and down the swells
animals
,
which would have still remained unknown and
undescribed, had it not been for a most felicitous
accident
!
One, and he a noble specimen of the whole,
was running a little apart from the rest. The herd
made an inclination in my direction, in which the
solitary animal coincided, and this brought him
within
fifty yards of where I stood. I profited by the
opportunity, and by the aid of my steel and taper, I
wrote his description on the spot. I would have
given a thousand dollars, Ellen, for a single shot from
the rifle of one of the boys!
You carry a pistol, Doctor, why didn't you use
it? said the half inattentive girl, anxiously
examining
the prairie, but still lingering where she stood,
quite willing to be detained.
Ay, but it carries itself nothing but the most
minute particles of lead, adapted to the destruction
of the larger insects and reptiles. No, I did better
than to attempt waging a war, in which I could not be
the victor. I recorded the event; noting each
particular
with the precision necessary to science. You
shall hear, Ellen; for you are a good and improving
girl, and by retaining what you learn in this way,
may yet be of great service to learning, should any
accident occur to me. Indeed, my worthy Ellen,
mine is a pursuit, which has its dangers as well as
that of the warrior. This very night, he continued,
glancing his eye, involuntarily behind him, this
awful
night, has the principle of life, itself, been in
great danger of extinction!
By what?
By the monster I have discovered. It
approached
me often, and ever as I receded, it continued
to advance. I believe nothing but the little lamp, I
carried, was my protector. I kept it between us,
whilst I wrote, making it serve the double purpose
of a luminary and a shield. But you shall hear the
character of the beast, and you may then judge of
the risk we promoters of science run in behalf of
mankind.
The naturalist now raised his tablets to the
heavens
and disposed himself to read as well as he could,
by the dim light they yet shed upon the plain;
premising
with saying
Listen, girl, and you shall hear, with what a
treasure it has been my happy lot to enrich the
pages of natural history!
Is it then a creature of your forming, said
Ellen, turning away from her fruitless examination,
with a sudden lighting of her sprightly blue eyes,
that shewed she knew how to play with the foible of
her learned companion.
Is the power to give life to inanimate matter the
gift of man? I would it were! You should speedily
see a Historia naturalis Americana, that would put
the sneering imitators of the Frenchman de Buffon
to shame! A great improvement might be made in
the formation of all quadrupeds in particular;
especially
those, in which velocity is a virtue. Two of
the inferior limbs should be on the principle of the
lever; wheels, perhaps, as they are now formed;
though I have not yet determined whether the
improvement
might be better applied to the anterior or
posterior members, inasmuch as I am yet to learn
whether dragging or shoving requires the greatest
muscular exertion. A natural exudation of the
animal
might assist in overcoming the friction, and a
powerful momentum be obtained. But all this is
hopelessat least for the present!he added, with
a slight sigh, raising his tablets again to the light and
reading aloud; Oct. 6, 1805, that's merely the
date, which I dare say you know better than Imem.
Quadruped;
seen by star-light, and by the aid of a
pocket-lamp, in the prairies of North Americasee
Journal for Latitude and Meridian.
Genus
unknown
:
therefore named after the discoverer, and
from the happy coincidence of being seen in the
evening
Vespertilio Horribilis, Americanus.
Dimensions
(by estimation)
Greatest length,
eleven feet;
height,
six feet;
head,
erect;
nostrils,
expansive:
eyes,
expressive and fierce;
teeth,
serrated and
abundant
;
tail,
horizontal, waving and slightly feline;
feet,
large and hairy;
talons,
long, curvated, dangerous;
ears,
inconspicuous;
horns,
elongated, diverging and
formidable;
colour,
plumbeous-ashy with fiery spots;
voice,
sonorous, martial and appalling;
habits,
gregarious
,
carnivorous, fierce and fearless. There,
exclaimed
Obed, when he had ended this sententious
but comprehensive description, there is an animal
, which will be likely to dispute with the lion his title
to be called the king of the beasts!
I know not the meaning of all you have said,
Doctor Battius, returned the quick-witted girl, who
understood the weakness of the philosopher, and
often indulged him with a title he loved so well to
hear, but I shall think it dangerous to venture far
from the camp, if such monsters are prowling over
the prairies.
You may well call it prowling, returned the
naturalist, nestling still closer to her side, and
dropping
his voice to such low and perhaps undignified
tones of confidence as possibly conveyed a meaning
still more pointed than he had intended. I have
never before experienced such a trial of the nervous
system; there was a moment I acknowledge, when
the
fortiter in re
faltered before so terrible an enemy;
but the love of natural science bore me up, and
brought me off in triumph!
You speak a language so different from that we
use in Tennessee, said Ellen, struggling to conceal
Vol. I. I
her laughter, that I hardly know whether I
understand
your meaning. If I am right, you wish to say
you were a little chicken-hearted.
An absurd simile drawn from an ignorance of the
formation of the biped. The heart of a chicken has
a just proportion to its other organs, and the
domestic
fowl is, in a state of nature, a gallant bird.
Ellen
,
he added with a countenance so solemn as to
produce an impression on the attentive girl, I was
pursued, hunted, and in a danger that I scorn to
dwell onwhat's that?
Ellen started; for the earnestness and simple
sincerity
of her companion's manner had produced a
certain degree of credulity even on her buoyant
mind. Looking in the direction indicated by the
Doctor, she beheld, in fact, a beast coursing over the
prairie, and making a straight and rapid approach to
the very spot they occupied. The day was not yet
far enough advanced to enable her to distinguish its
form and character, though enough was discernible
to induce her to imagine it a fierce and savage
animal.
It comes, it comes! exclaimed the Doctor,
fumbling, by a sort of instinct, for his tablets, while
he fairly tottered on his feet under the powerful
efforts
he made to maintain his ground. Now, Ellen,
has fortune given me an opportunity to correct the
errors made by star-light,hold,ashy-plumbeous,
no ears,horns, excessive.His quivering voice
and shaking hand were both arrested by a roar, or
rather a shriek from the beast, that was sufficiently
terrific to appal even a stouter heart than that of the
naturalist. The cries of the animal passed over the
prairie in strange and savage cadences, and then
succeeded
a deep and solemn silence, that was only
broken
by a heart-felt and uncontrolled fit of merriment
from the more musical voice of Ellen Wade. In
the mean time the naturalist stood like a statue of
amazement, permitting a well-grown ass, against
whose approach he no longer offered his boasted
shield of light, to smell about his person, without
comment or hindrance.
It is your own ass! cried Ellen, the instant she
found breath for words; your own patient, hard
working, hack!
The Doctor rolled his eyes wildly from the beast
to the speaker, and from the speaker to the beast;
but gave no audible expression of his wonder.
Do you refuse to know an animal that has
laboured
so long in your service! continued the still
laughing girl. A beast, that I have heard you say
a thousand times, has served you well, and whom
you loved like a brother!
Asinus domesticus! ejaculated the Doctor,
drawing his breath like one who had been near
suffocation
.
There is no doubt of the genus; and I
will always maintain that the animal is not of the
species equus. This is undeniably Asinus himself,
Ellen Wade; but this is not the Vespertilio horribilis
of the prairies! Very different animals, I can assure
you, young woman, and differently characterised in
every important particular. That, carnivorous, he
continued, glancing his eye at the open page of his
tablets; this, granivorous;
habits,
fierce,
dangerous
;
habits,
patient, abstemious;
ears,
inconspicuous
;
ears,
elongated;
horns,
diverging, etc.
horns,
none!
He was interrupted by another burst of merriment
from Ellen, which served, in some measure, to recall
him to his recollection.
The image of the Vespertilio was on the retina,
the astounded enquirer into the secrets of nature
observed
,
in a manner that seemed a little apologetic,
and I was silly enough to mistake my own faithful
beast for the monster? Though even now I greatly
marvel to see the animal running at large!
Ellen then proceeded to explain, in detail, the
history
of the attack and its results. She described,
with an accuracy that might have raised suspicions
of her own movements in the mind of one less
simple
than her auditor, the manner in which the beasts
burst out of the encampment and the headlong speed
with which they had dispersed themselves over the
open plain. Although she forbore to say as much in
terms, she so managed as to present before the eyes
of her listener the strong probability of his having
mistaken the frightened drove for savage beasts, and
then terminated her account by a lamentation for
their loss, and some very natural remarks on the
helpless condition in which it had left the family.
The naturalist listened in silent wonder, neither
interrupting
her narrative nor suffering a single
exclamation
of surprise to escape him. The keen-eyed
girl, however, saw that as she proceeded, the
important
leaf was torn from the tablets, in a manner
which shewed that their owner had got rid of his
delusion at the same instant. From that moment
the world has heard no more of the Vespertilio
horribilis
Americanus, and the natural sciences have
irretrievably lost an important link in that great
animated chain which is said to connect earth and
heaven, and in which man is thought to be so
familiarly
complicated with the monkey.
When Dr. Batt was put in full possession of all
the circumstances of the inroad, his concern
immediately
took a different direction. He had left
sundry
folios, and certain boxes well stored with
botanical
specimens and defunct animals, under the good
keeping of Ishmael, and it immediately struck his
acute mind, that marauders as subtle as the Siouxes
would never neglect the opportunity to despoil him
of these treasures. Nothing that Ellen could say to the
contrary served to appease his apprehensions, and,
consequently, they separated; he to relieve his doubts
and fears together, and she to glide, as swiftly and
silently as she had just before passed it, into the still
and solitary tent.
CHAPTER VII.
What, fifty of my followers, at a clap!
Lear
.
The
day had now fairly opened on the seemingly
interminable waste of the prairie. The entrance of
Obed at such a moment into the camp, accompanied
as it was by vociferous lamentations over his
anticipated
loss, did not fail to rouse the drowsy family of
the squatter. Ishmael and his sons, together with the
forbidding-looking brother of his wife, were all
speedily
afoot; and then, as the sun began to shed his
light on the place, they became gradually apprised of
the extent of their loss.
Ishmael looked round upon the motionless and
heavily loaded vehicles with his teeth firmly
compressed
,
cast a glance at the amazed and helpless
groupe of children, which clustered around their
sullen
but despondent mother, and walked out upon the
open land, as if he found the air of the encampment
too confined to breathe in. He was followed by
several
of the men, who were his attentive observers
watching the dark expression of his eye as the index
of their own future movements. The whole
proceeded
in profound and moody silence to the summit
of the nearest swell, whence they could command
an almost boundless view of the naked plains. Here
nothing was visible but a solitary buffaloe, that
gleaned
a meagre subsistence from the decaying herbage,
at no great distance, and the ass of the physician,
who profited by his freedom to enjoy a richer meal
than common.
I 2
Yonder is one of the creatures left by the
villains
to mock us, said Ishmael, glancing his eye
towards the latter, and that the meanest of the
stock. This is a hard country to make a crop in,
boys; and yet food must be found to fill so many
hungry mouths.
The rifle is better than the hoe, in such a place
as this, returned the eldest of his sons, kicking the
hard and thirsty soil on which he stood, with an air
of fierce scorn. It is good for such as they who
make their dinner better on beggars' beans than on
homminy. A crow would shed tears if forced to fly
across the district.
What say you, trapper; returned the father,
showing the slight impression his powerful heel had
made on the compact earth, and laughing with
frightful
ferocity. Is this the quality of land a man
would choose who never troubles the county clerk
with title deeds!
There is richer soil in the bottoms, returned
the old man calmly, and you have passed millions
of acres to get to this dreary spot, where he who
loves to till the 'arth might have received bushels in
return for pints, and that too at the cost of no very
grievous labour. If you have come in search of
land, you have journeyed hundreds of miles too far,
or as many leagues too little.
There is then a better choice towards the other
Ocean? demanded the squatter, pointing in the
direction of the Pacific.
There is, and I have seen it all; was the answer
of the other, who dropped his rifle to the earth, and
stood leaning on its barrel, like one who recalled the
scenes he had witnessed with melancholy pleasure.
I have seen the waters of the two seas! On one
of them was I born, and raised to be a lad like
yonder
tumbling boy. America has grown, my men,
since the days of my youth, to be a country larger
than I once had thought the world itself to be. Near
seventy years I dwelt in York, province and state
togetherYou've been in York, 'tis like?
Not Inot I; I never visited the towns; but
often have heard the place you speak of named.
'Tis a wide clearing there, I reckon
Too wide! too wide! They scourge the very
'arth with their axes. Such hills and hunting-grounds
as I have seen stripped of the gifts of the Lord,
without
remorse or shame! I tarried till the mouths of
my hounds were deafened by the blows of the
chopper
,
and then I came west in search of quiet. It was
a grievous journey that I made; a grievous toil to
pass through falling timber and breathe the thick air
of smoky clearings, week after week, as I did! 'Tis
a far country too, that state of York from this!
It lies ag'in the outer edge of old Kentuck, I
reckon; though what the distance may be I never
knew.
A gull would have to fan a thousand miles of air,
to find the eastern sea. And yet it is no mighty reach
to hunt across, when shade and game are plenty!
The time has been when I followed the deer in the
mountains of the Delaware and Hudson, and took
the beaver on the streams of the upper lakes, in the
same season: but my eye was quick and certain at
that day, and my limbs were like the legs of a moose!
The dam of Hector, he added, dropping his look
kindly to the aged hound that crouched at his feet,
was then a pup, and apt to open on the game the
moment she struck the scent. She gave me a deal
of trouble, that slut, she did.
Your hound is old, stranger, and a rap on the
head would prove a mercy to the beast.
The dog is like his master, returned the
trapper
,
without appearing to heed the brutal advice the
other gave, and will number his days, when his
work amongst the game is over, and not before. To
my eye things seem ordered to meet each other in
this creation. 'Tis not the swiftest running deer that
always throws off the hounds, nor the biggest arm
that holds the truest rifle. Look around you, men;
what will the Yankee Choppers say, when they have
cut their path from the eastern to the western waters,
and find that a hand, which can lay the 'arth bare at
a blow, has been here and swept the country, in very
mockery of their wickedness. They will turn on
their tracks like a fox that doubles, and then the rank
smell of their own footsteps will show them the
madness
of their waste. Howsomever, these are thoughts
that are more likely to rise in him who has seen the
folly of eighty seasons, than to teach wisdom to men
still bent on the pleasures of their kind! You have
need yet, of a stirring time, if you think to escape
the craft and hatred of the burnt-wood Indians.
They claim to be the lawful owners of this country,
and seldom leave a white more than the skin he
boasts of, when once they get the power, as they
always
have the will, to do him harm.
Old man, said Ishmael sternly, to which
people
do you belong? You have the colour and speech
of a Christian, while it seems that your heart is with
the red-skins.
To me there is little difference in nations. The
people I loved most are scattered as the sands of the
dry river beds fly before the fall hurricanes, and life
is too short to make use and custom with strangers,
as one can do with such as he has dwelt amongst for
years. Still am I a man without the cross of Indian
blood; and what is due from a warrior to his nation,
is owing by me to the people of the states; though
little need have they, with their militia and their
armed boats, of help from a single arm of fourscore.
Since you own your kin, I may ask a simple
question. Where are the Siouxes who have stolen
my cattle?
Where is the herd of buffaloes, which was chased
by the panther across this plain, no later than the
morning of yesterday! It is as hard
Friend, said Dr. Battius, who had hitherto been
an attentive listener, but who now felt a sudden
impulse
to mingle in the discourse, I am grieved
when I find a venator or hunter, of your experience
and observation, following the current of vulgar
error
.
The animal you describe is in truth a species
of the bos ferus (or bos sylvestris, as he has been
happily called by the poets), but, though of close
affinity, is altogether distinct from the common
bubulus
.
Bison is the better word, and I would suggest
the necessity of adopting it in future, when you shall
have occasion to allude to the species.
Bison or buffaloe, it makes but little matter.
The creatur' is the same, call it by what name you
will, and
Pardon me, venerable venator; as classification
is the very soul of the natural sciences, the animal
or vegetable must, of necessity, be characterised by
the peculiarities of its species, which is always
indicated
by the name
Friend, said the trapper, a little positively,
would the tail of a beaver make the worse dinner,
for calling it a mink; or could you eat of the wolf
with relish, because some bookish man had given it
the name of venison?
As these questions were put with no little
earnestness
and some spirit, there was every probability that
a hot discussion would have succeeded between the
two, of whom one was so purely practical and the
other so much given to theory, had not Ishmael seen
fit to terminate the dispute, by bringing into view a
subject that was much more important to his own
immediate interests.
Beavers' tails and minks' flesh may do to talk
about before a maple fire and a quiet hearth,
interrupted
the squatter, without the smallest deference
to the interested feelings of the disputants; but
there is something more than foreign words, or
words of any sort, now needed. Tell me, trapper;
where are your Siouxes skulking?
It would be as easy to tell you the colours of
the hawk that is floating beneath yonder white cloud!
When a red-skin strikes his blow, he is not apt to
wait until he is paid for the evil deed in lead.
Will the beggarly savages believe they have
enough when they find themselves master of all the
stock?
Natur' is much the same, let it be covered by
what coloured skin it may. Do you ever find your
longings after riches less when you have made a good
crop, than before you were master of a kernel of
corn? If you do, you differ from what the
experience
of a long life tells me is the common cravings
of man.
Speak plainly, old stranger, said the squatter,
striking the butt of his rifle heavily on the earth, his
dull capacity finding no pleasure in a discourse that
was conducted in such obscure allusions; I have
asked a simple question, and one I know well that
you can answer.
You are right, you are right. I can answer, for
I have too often seen the disposition of my kind to
mistake it, when evil is stirring. When the Siouxes
have gathered in the beasts, and have made sure that
you are not upon their heels, they will be back
nibbling
like hungry wolves to take the bait they have
left: or it may be, they'll shew the temper of the
great bears, that are found at the falls of the Long
River, and strike at once with the paw, without
stopping
to nose their prey.
You have then seen, the animals you mention!
exclaimed Dr. Battius, who had now been thrown
out of the conversation quite as long as his
impatience
could well brook, and who approached the
subject with his tablets ready opened, as a book of
reference. Can you tell me if what you
encountered
was of the species, ursus horribiliswith the
ears,
rounded
front,
arquated
eyes
destitute of
the remarkable supplemental lidwith six incisores,
one false, and four perfect molares
Trapper, go on, interrupted Ishmael; you
believe
we shall see more of the robbers.
NaynayI do not call them robbers, for it is
the usage of their people, and what may be called
the prairie law.
I have come five hundred miles to find a place
where no man can ding the words of the law in my
ears, said Ishmael, fiercely, and I am not in a
humour to stand quietly at a bar, while a red-skin
sits in judgment. I tell you, trapper, if another
Sioux is seen prowling around my camp, wherever
it may be, he shall feel the contents of old Kentuck,
slapping his rifle, in a manner that could not be easily
misconstrued, though he wore the medal of
Washington
,
himself; I call the man a robber who takes
that which is not his own.
The Teton, and the Pawnee, and the Konza,
and men of a dozen other tribes, claim to own these
naked fields.
Natur' gives them the lie in their teeth. The
air, the water and the ground, are all free gifts to
man, and no one has the power to portion them out
in parcels. Man must drink, and breathe, and walk
and therefore each has a right to his perfect share
of 'arth. Why do not the surveyors of the states
set their compasses and run their lines over our
heads as well as beneath our feet? Why do they
not cover their shining sheep-skins with big words,
giving to the land-holder, or perhaps he should be
called air-holder, so many rods of heaven, with the
use of such a star for a boundary-mark, and such a
cloud to turn a mill!
As the squatter uttered his wild conceit, he
laughed
from the very bottom of his chest in scorn. The
deriding but
frightful
merriment passed from the
mouth of one of his ponderous sons to that of the
other, until it had made the circuit of the whole
family.
Come, trapper, continued Ishmael in a tone of
better humour, like a man who feels that he has
triumphed
,
neither of us, I reckon, has ever had much
to do with title-deeds, or county clerks, or blazed
trees; therefore we will not waste words on
fooleries
.
You ar' a man that has tarried long in this
clearing, and now I ask your opinion, face to face,
without fear or favour, if you had the lead in my
business, what would you do?
The old man hesitated, and seemed to give the
required
advice with deep reluctance. As every eye,
however, was fastened on him, and whichever way
he turned his face, he encountered a look riveted on
the lineaments of his own working countenance, he
answered in a low, melancholy tone
I have seen too much mortal blood poured out
in empty quarrels, to wish ever to hear an angry rifle
again. Ten weary years have I sojourned alone on
these naked plains, waiting for my hour to come, and
not a blow have I struck, ag'in an enemy more
humanized
than the grizzly bear.
Ursus horribilis, muttered the Doctor.
The speaker paused at the sound of the other's
voice, but perceiving it was no more than a sort of
mental ejaculation, he continued in the same strain
More humanized than the grizzly bear, or the
panther of the Rocky Mountains; unless the beaver,
which is a wise and knowing animal, may be so
reckoned. What would I advise? Even the female
buffaloe will fight for her young!
It never then shall be said, that Ishmael Bush
has less kindness for his children than the bear for
her cubs!
And yet this is but a naked spot for a dozen men
to make head in, ag'in five hundred.
Ay, it is so, returned the squatter, glancing his
eye towards his humble camp; but something
might be done, with the wagons and the
cotton-wood
.
The trapper shook his head incredulously, and
pointed across the rolling plain in the direction of the
west, as he answered
A rifle would send a bullet from these hills into
your very sleeping-cabins; nay, arrows from the
thicket in your rear would keep you all burrowed,
like so many prairie dogs: it wouldn't do, it wouldn't
do. Three long miles from this spot is a place, where
as I have often thought in passing across the desert,
a stand might be made for days and weeks together,
if there were hearts and hands ready to engage in
the bloody work.
Another low, deriding laugh passed among the
young men, announcing, in a manner sufficiently
intelligible
,
their readiness to undertake a task even
more arduous. The squatter himself eagerly seized
the hint which had been so reluctantly extorted
from the trapper, who by some singular process
of reasoning had evidently persuaded himself that it
was his duty to be strictly neutral. A few direct
and pertinent inquiries served to obtain the little
additional
information that was necessary, in order to
make the contemplated movement, and then
Ishmael
,
who was, on emergencies, as terrifically
energetic
,
as he was sluggish in common, set about
effecting
his object without delay.
Vol. I. K
Notwithstanding the industry and zeal of all
engaged
,
the task however, was one of great labour and
difficulty. The loaded vehicles were to be drawn,
by hand, across a wide distance of plain, without
track or guide of any sort, except that which the
trapper furnished by communicating his knowledge
of the cardinal points of the compass. In
accomplishing
this object, the gigantic strength of the men
was taxed to the utmost, nor were the females or the
children spared a heavy proportion of the toil.
While the sons distributed themselves about the
heavily loaded wagons, and drew them by main
strength up the neighbouring swell, their mother and
Ellen, surrounded by the amazed groupe of little
ones, followed slowly in the rear, bending under the
weight of such different articles as were suited to
their several strengths.
Ishmael himself superintended and directed the
whole, occasionally applying his colossal shoulder to
some lagging vehicle, until he saw that the chief
difficulty
,
that of gaining the level of their intended
route, was accomplished. Then he pointed out the
required course, cautioning his sons to proceed in
such a manner that they should not lose the
advantage
they had with so much labour obtained, and
beckoning to the brother of his wife, they returned
together to the empty camp.
Throughout the whole of this movement, which
occupied an hour of time, the trapper had stood
apart, leaning on his rifle, with the aged hound
slumbering
at his feet, a silent but attentive observer of
all that passed. Occasionally, a smile lighted his
hard, muscular, but wasted features, like a gleam of
sunshine flitting across a naked ragged ruin, and
betrayed
the momentary pleasure he found in
witnessing
from time to time the vast power the youths
discovered. Then, as the train drew slowly up the
ascent, a cloud of thought and sorrow threw all into
the shade again, leaving the expression of his
countenance
in its usual state of quiet melancholy gravity.
As vehicle after vehicle left the place of the
encampment
,
he noted the change, with increasing
attention
;
seldom failing to cast an inquiring look at the
little neglected tent, which with its proper wagon,
still remained, as before, solitary and apparently
forgotten
.
The summons of Ishmael to his gloomy
associate, had however, as it would now seem, this
hitherto neglected portion of his effects for its
object
.
First casting a cautious and suspicious glance on
every side of him, the squatter and his companion
advanced to the little wagon, and caused it to enter
within the folds of the cloth, much in the same
manner
that it had been extricated the preceding
evening
.
They both then disappeared behind the drapery,
and many moments of suspense succeeded, during
which the old man, secretly urged by a burning desire
to know the meaning of so much mystery, insensibly
drew nigher to the place, until he stood within a few
yards of the proscribed spot. The agitation of the
cloth betrayed the nature of the occupation of those
whom it concealed, though their work was conducted
in the most rigid silence. It would appear that long
practice had made each of the two acquainted with
his particular duty, for neither sign nor direction of
any sort was necessary from Ishmael, in order to
apprise
his surly associate of the manner in which he
was to proceed. In less time than has been
consumed
in relating it, the interior portion of the
arrangement
was completed, when the men re-appeared
without the tent. Too busy with his occupation to
heed the presence of the trapper, Ishmael began to
release the folds of the cloth from the ground, and to
dispose of them in such a manner around the
vehicle
as to form a sweeping train to the new form the
little pavilion had now assumed. The arched roof
trembled with the occasional movement of the light
vehicle, which, it was now apparent, once more
supported
its secret burden. Just as the work was
ended
the scowling eye of Ishmael's assistant caught a
glimpse of the figure of the attentive observer of
their movements. Dropping the shaft, which he had
already lifted from the ground preparatory to
occupying
the place that was usually filled by an animal
less reasoning and perhaps less dangerous than
himself
,
he bluntly exclaimed
I am a fool, as you often say! But look for
yourself: if that man is not an enemy, I will
disgrace
father and mother, call myself an Indian, and
go hunt with the Siouxes!
The cloud as it is about to discharge the subtle
lightning is not more dark nor threatening, than was
the look with which Ishmael greeted the intruder.
He turned his head on every side of him, as if
seeking
some engine sufficiently terrible to annihilate the
offending trapper at a blow; and then, possibly
recollecting
the further occasion he might have for his
counsel, he forced himself to say, with an appearance
of moderation that nearly choked him
Stranger, I did believe this prying into the
concerns
of others was the business of women in the
towns and settlements, and not the manner in which
men, who are used to live where each has room for
himself, deal with the secrets of their neighbours.
To what lawyer or sheriff do you calculate to sell
your news?
I hold but little discourse except with one; and
then chiefly of my own affairs, returned the old
man, without the least observable apprehension, and
pointing imposingly upward; a judge; and judge
of all. Little does he need knowledge from my
hands, and but little will your wish to keep any thing
secret from him profit you, even in this desert.
The mounting tempers of his unnurtured listeners
were rebuked by the simple, solemn manner of the
trapper. Ishmael stood sullen and thoughtful; while
his companion stole a furtive and involuntary glance
at the placid sky, which spread so wide and blue
above his head, as if he expected to see the Almighty
eye itself beaming from the heavenly vault. But
impressions of a serious character are seldom lasting
on minds long indulged in forgetfulness. The
hesitation
of the squatter was consequently of very short
duration. The language, however, as well as the
firm and collected air of the speaker, were the
means of preventing much subsequent abuse, if not
violence.
It would be shewing more of the kindness of a
friend and comrade, Ishmael returned, in a tone
sufficiently sullen to betray his humour, though it
was no longer threatening, had your shoulder been
put to the wheel of one of yonder wagons, instead
of edging itself in here, where none are wanted but
such as are invited.
I can put the little strength that is left me,
returned
the trapper, to this, as well as to another of
your loads.
Do you take us for boys! exclaimed Ishmael,
laughing, half in ferocity and half in derision,
applying
his powerful strength at the same time to the
little
vehicle, which rolled over the grass with as much
seeming facility as though it were drawn by its usual
team.
The trapper paused, and followed the departing
wagon with his eye, marvelling greatly as to the
nature
of its concealed contents, until it had also
gained
the summit of the eminence, and in its turn
disappeared
behind the swell of the land. Then he
turned to gaze at the desolation of the scene around
him. The absence of human forms would have
scarce created a sensation in the bosom of one so
long accustomed to solitude, had not the site of the
K 2
deserted camp furnished such strong memorials of
its recent visiters, and as the old man was quick to
detect, of their waste also. He cast his eye upwards,
with a significant shake of the head, at the vacant
spot in the heavens, which had so lately been filled
by the branches of those trees that now lay stripped
of their verdure, worthless and deserted logs, at his
feet.
Ay! he muttered to himself, I might have
know'd it! I might have know'd it! often have I seen
the same before, and yet I brought them to the spot
myself, and have now sent them to the only
neighbourhood
of their kind, within many long leagues of
the spot where I stand. This is man's wish, and
pride, and waste, and sinfulness! He tames the
beasts of the field to feed his idle wants, and having
robbed the brutes of their natural food, he teaches
them to strip the 'arth of its trees to quiet their
hunger
.
A rustling in the low bushes that still grew for
some distance, along the swale, that formed the
thicket
on which the camp of Ishmael had rested, caught
his ear at the moment and cut short the soliloquy.
The habits of so many years spent in the wilderness,
caused the old man to bring his rifle to a poise, with
something like the activity and promptitude of his
youth; but suddenly recovering his recollection, he
dropped it into the hollow of his arm again, and
resumed
his air of melancholy resignation.
Come forth, come forth! he said aloud; be ye
bird or be ye beastye are safe from these old
hands. I have eaten and I have drunk; why should
I take life, when my wants call for no such sacrifice.
It will not be long afore the birds will peck at eyes
that shall not see them, and perhaps light on my very
bones; for if things like these are only made to
perish
,
why am I to expect to live for ever! Come forth
come forth; ye are safe from harm, at these weak
hands.
Thank you for the good word, old trapper, cried
Paul Hover, springing actively forward from his
place of concealment. There was an air about you,
when you threw forward the muzzle of the piece,
that I did not like; for it seemed to say that you
were master of all the rest of the motions.
You are right! you are right! cried the
trapper
,
laughing with inward self complacency, at the
recollection of his former skill. The day has been,
when few men knew the virtues of a long rifle, like
this I carry, better than myself, old and useless as I
now seem. You are right, young man; and the time
was, when it was dangerous to move a leaf, within
ear-shot of my stand, or, he added, dropping his
voice and looking serious, for a Red Mingo to show
even an eyeball from his ambushment. You have
heard of the Red Mingos?
I have heard of minks, said Paul, taking the old
man by the arm, and gently urging him towards the
thicket as he spoke, while at the same time he cast
quick and uneasy glances behind him, in order to
make sure he was not observed. Of your common
black minks; but of none of any other colour.
Lord! lord! continued the trapper, shaking his
head, and still laughing in his deep but quiet
mannan
;
the boy mistakes a brute for a man! Though,
a Mingo is little better than a beast; or, for that
matter, he is worse, when rum and opportunity are
placed before his eyes. There was that accursed
Huron from the upper lakes, that I knocked from
his perch, among the rocks in the hills, back of the
Hori
His voice was lost in the thicket, into which he
had suffered himself to be led by Paul, while
speaking
;
too much occupied by thoughts which dwelt on
scenes and acts that had taken place half a century
earlier in the history of the country, to offer the
smallest resistance.
CHAPTER VIII.
Now they are clapper-clawing one another; I'll go look on. That
dissembling abominable varlet, Diomed, has got that same scurvy,
doting, foolish young knave in his helm.
Troilus and Cressida
.
It
is necessary, in order that the thread of the
narrative should not be spun to a length which might
fatigue the reader, that he should imagine a week to
have intervened between the scene with which the
preceding chapter closed, and the events with which
it is our intention to resume its relation in this. The
season was on the point of changing its character;
the verdure of summer giving place more rapidly to
the brown and party-coloured livery of the fall. The
heavens were clothed in driving clouds, piled in vast
masses one above the other, which whirled violently
in the gusts; opening, occasionally, to admit
transient
glimpses of the bright and glorious sight of the
heavens dwelling in a magnificence, by far too grand
and durable to be disturbed by the fitful efforts of the
lower world. Beneath, the wind swept across the
wild and naked prairies, with a violence that is
seldom
witnessed in any section of the continent less
open. It would have been easy to have imagined,
in the ages of fable, that the god of the winds had
permitted his subordinate agents to escape from their
den, and that they now rioted, in wantonness, across
wastes, where neither tree, nor work of man, nor
mountain, nor obstacle of any sort opposed itself to
their gambols.
Though nakedness might, as usual, be given as the
pervading character of the spot, whither it is now
necessary to transfer the scene of the tale, it was
not entirely without the signs of human life. Amid
the monotonous rolling of the prairie, a single naked
and ragged rock arose on the margin of a little
water-course
,
which found its way, after winding a vast
distance through the plains, into one of the
numerous
tributaries of the Father of Rivers. A swale of
low land lay near the base of the eminence, and as it
was still fringed with a thicket of alders and sumack,
it bore the signs of having once nurtured a feeble
growth of wood. The trees themselves had been
transferred, however, to the summit and crags of the
neighbouring rocks. It was on this little elevation
that the signs of man were to be found, to which the
allusion just made applies.
Seen from beneath, they presented no more than
a breast-work of logs and stones, intermingled in
such a manner as to save all unnecessary labour; of
a few low roofs made of bark and boughs of trees;
of an occasional barrier, constructed like the defences
on the summit, and placed on such points of the
acclivity
as were easier of approach than the general
face of the eminence, and of a little dwelling of
cloth, perched on the apex of a small pyramid, that
shot up on one angle of the rock, the white covering
of which glimmered from a distance like a spot of
snowor to make the simile more suitable to the
rest of the subject, like a spotless and carefully
guarded standard, which was to be protected by the
dearest blood of those who defended the citadel
beneath
.
It is hardly necessary to add, that this rude
and characteristic fortress was the place where
Ishmael
Bush had taken refuge, after the robbery of his
flocks and herds.
On the day to which the narrative is advanced;
the squatter was to be seen standing near the base of
these very rocks, leaning on his rifle, and regarding
the sterile soil that supported him with a look in
which contempt and disappointment were strongly
blended.
'Tis time to change our natur's, he observed
to the brother of his wife, who was rarely far from
his elbow; and to become ruminators, instead of
people used to the fare of Christians and free men.
I reckon, Abiram, you could glean a living among
the grasshoppers; you ar' an active man, and might
outrun the nimblest skipper of them all.
The country will never do, returned the other,
who relished but little the forced humour of his
kinsman
;
and it is well to remember that a lazy
traveller
makes a long journey.
Would you have me draw a cart at my heels,
across this desert, for weeks; ay, months! retorted
Ishmael, who, like all of his class, could labour with
incredible efforts on emergencies, but who too
seldom
exerted continued industry, on any occasion, to
brook a proposal that offered so little repose. It
may do for your people, who live in settlements, to
hasten on to their houses. But, thank Heaven, my
farm is too big for its owner ever to want a
resting-place
!
Since you like the plantation, then, you have
only to make your crop!
That is easier said than done, on this corner of
the estate. I tell you, Abiram, there is need of
moving
for more reasons than one. You know I'm a man
that very seldom enters into a bargain; but who
always
fulfils his agreements better than your dealers
in wordy contracts written on rags of paper. If
there's one mile, there ar' a hundred still needed
to make up the distance for which you have my
honour.
As he spoke, the squatter glanced his eye upward
at the little tenement of cloth which crowned the
summit of his ragged fortress. The look was
understood
and answered by the other, and by some secret
influence, which operated either through their
interests
or feelings, it served to re-establish that harmony
between them, which had just been threatened with
something very like a momentary breach.
I know it, and feel it in every bone of my body.
But I remember the reason, why I have set myself on
this accursed journey too well, to forget the distance
between me and the end. Neither you nor I will
ever be the better for what we have done, unless we
thoroughly finish what is so well begun. Ay; that is
the doctrine of the whole world, I judge: I heard a
travelling preacher, who was skirting it down the
Ohio, a time since, say, if a man should live up to
the faith for a hundred years and then fall from his
work a single day, he would find the settlement was
to be made for the finishing blow that he had put to
his job, and that all the bad and none of the good
would come into the final account.
And you believed what the hungry hypocrite
preached!
Who said that I believed it! retorted Abiram
with a bullying look, that betrayed how much his
fears had dwelt on the subject he affected to despise.
Is it believing to tell what a roguishAnd yet,
Ishmael
,
the man might have been honest after all! He
told us that the world was, in truth, no better than a
desert, and that there was but one hand that could
lead the most learned man through all its windings
of good and evil. Now, if this be true of the whole
world, it may be true of a part.
Abiram, out with your grievances like a man,
interrupted the squatter, with a hoarse, taunting
laugh. You want to pray. But of what use will
it be, according to your own doctrine, to serve God
five minutes and the devil an hour. Harkee, friend;
I'm not much of a husbandman, but this I know to
my cost; that to make a right good crop, even on
the richest bottom, there must be hard labour; and
your snufflers often liken the 'arth to a field of corn,
and the men, who live on it, to its yield. Now I tell
you, Abiram, that you are no better than a thistle or
a mullin; yea, ye ar' wood of too open a pore to be
good even to burn!
The malign glance which shot from the scowling
eye of Abiram, announced the angry character of his
feelings, but as the furtive look quailed, almost
immediately
,
before the unmoved, steady countenance
of the squatter, it also betrayed how much the bolder
spirit of the latter had obtained the mastery over his
craven nature.
Content with his ascendency, which was too
apparent
,
and had been too often exerted on similar
occasions, to leave him in any doubt of its extent,
Ishmael coolly continued the discourse, by adverting
more directly to his future plans.
You will own the justice at any rate of paying
every one in kind, he said; I have been robbed
of my stock, and I have a scheme to make myself as
good as before, by taking hoof for hoof; or for that
matter, when a man is put to the trouble of
bargaining
for both sides, he is a fool if he dont pay himself
something in the way of commission.
As the squatter made this declaration in a loud
and decided tone, which was a little excited by the
humour of the moment, four or five of his lounging
sons, who had been leaning against the foot of the
rock, came forward with the indolent step so
common
to the whole family.
I have been calling Ellen Wade, who is on the
rock keeping the look-out, to know if there is any
thing to be seen, observed the eldest of the young
men; and she shakes her head for an answer.
Ellen
is sparing of her words, for a woman; and might
be taught manners, at least, without spoiling any of
her uncommon good looks.
Ishmael cast his eye upward to the place, where
the offending, but unconscious girl was holding her
anxious watch. She was seated at the edge of the
uppermost crag, by the side of the little tent, and at
least a hundred feet above the level of the plain.
Little else was to be distinguished, at that distance,
but the outline of her form, her fair hair streaming
in the gusts beyond her shoulders, and the steady
and seemingly unchangeable look that she had
riveted
on some remote point of the prairie.
What is it, Nell? cried Ishmael, lifting his
powerful
voice a little above the rushing of the element.
Have you got a glimpse of any thing bigger than
one of them burrowing barkers?
The lips of the attentive Ellen parted; she rose
to the utmost height her small stature admitted,
seeming
still to regard the unknown object; but her voice,
if she spoke at all, was not sufficiently loud to be
heard amid the roaring of the wind.
It ar' a fact that the child sees something more
uncommon than a buffaloe or a prairie dog!
continued
Ishmael. Why, Nell, girl, ar' ye deaf? Nell,
I say;I hope it is an army of red-skins she has in
her eye; for I should mightily relish the chance to
pay them for their kindness, under the favour of these
logs and rocks!
As the squatter had accompanied his vaunt with
corresponding gestures, and directed his eyes to the
circle of his equally confident sons while speaking,
he had drawn their gaze from Ellen to himself; but
now, when they turned together to note the
succeeding
movements of their female sentinel, the place
which had so lately been occupied by her form was
vacant.
As I am a sinner, exclaimed Asa, usually one
Vol. I. L
of the most phlegmatic of the youths, in a tone of
extraordinary excitement, the girl is blown away
by the wind!
Something like a sensation was exhibited among
them, which might have denoted that the influence
of the laughing blue eyes, flaxen hair, and glowing
cheeks of Ellen, had not been lost on the dull
natures
of the young men, and looks of dull
amazement
,
mingled slightly with concern, passed from one
to the other, as they gazed, in stupid wonder, at the
point of the naked rock.
It might well be! added another; she sat on
a slivered stone, and I have been thinking of telling
her she was in danger for more than an hour.
Is that a riband of the child, dangling from the
corner of the hill below! cried Ishmael; ha!
who is moving about the tent; have I not told you
all
Ellen! 'tis Ellen! interrupted the whole body
of his sons in a breath; and at that instant she
re-appeared
to put an end to their different surmises, and,
to relieve more than one sluggish nature from its
unwonted
excitement. As Ellen issued from beneath
the folds of the tent, she advanced with a light and
fearless step to her former giddy stand, and pointed
toward the prairie, appearing to speak in an eager
and rapid voice to some invisible auditor.
Nell is mad! said Asa, half in contempt and
yet not a little in concern. The girl is dreaming
with her eyes open; and thinks she sees some of
them fierce creatur's, with hard names, with which
the Doctor fills her ears.
Can it be, the child has found a scout of the
Siouxes, said Ishmael, bending his look toward the
plain; but a low, significant whisper from Abiram
drew his eyes quickly upward again, where they
were turned just in time to perceive that the cloth
of the tent was agitated by a motion very evidently
different from the quivering occasioned by the wind.
Let her, if she dare! the squatter muttered in his
teeth. Abiram; they know my temper too well to
play the prank with me!
Look for yourself! if the curtain is not lifted, I
can see no better than an owl by daylight.
Ishmael struck the breech of his rifle violently on
the earth, and shouted in a voice that might easily
have been heard by Ellen, had not her attention still
continued rapt on the object which so unaccountably
attracted her eyes in the distance.
Nell! continued the squatter; away with
you, fool! will you bring down punishment on your
own head. Why Nell!she has forgotten her
native
speech; let us see if she can understand another
language.
Ishmael threw his rifle to his shoulder, and at the
next moment it was pointed upward at the summit
of the rock. Before time was given for a word of
remonstrance, it had sent forth its contents, in its
usual streak of bright flame. Ellen started like the
frightened chamois, and uttering a piercing scream,
she darted into the tent, with a swiftness that left it
uncertain whether terror or actual injury had been
the penalty of her slight offence.
The action of the squatter was too sudden and
unexpected to admit of prevention, but the instant it
was done, his sons manifested, in an unequivocal
manner, the temper with which they witnessed the
desperate measure. Angry and fierce glances were
interchanged, and a murmur of disapprobation was
uttered by the whole in common.
What has Ellen done, father, said Asa, with a
degree of spirit, which was the more striking from
being unusual, that she should be shot at like a
straggling deer or a hungry wolf!
Mischief; deliberately returned the squatter,
but with a cool expression of defiance in his eye
that showed how little he was moved by the
ill-concealed
humour of his children. Mischief, boy;
mischief! take you care that the disorder don't
spread.
It would need a different treatment in a man,
than in you screaming girl!
Asa, you ar' a man, as you have often boasted;
but remember I am your father, and your better.
I know it well; and what sort of a father!
Harkee, boy: I more than half believe that your
drowsy head let in the Siouxes. Be modest in your
speech, my watchful son, or you may have to answer
yet for the mischief your own bad conduct has
brought upon us.
I'll stay no longer to be hectored like a child in
petticoats. You talk of law, as if you knew of none,
and yet you keep me down, as though I had not life
and wants of my own to provide for. I'll stay no
longer to be treated like one of your meanest cattle.
The world is wide, my gallant boy, and there's
many a noble plantation on it, without a tenant.
Go; you have title deeds sign'd and seal'd to your
hand. Few fathers portion their children better than
Ishmael Bush; you will say that for me at least,
when you get to the end of your journey.
Look! father, look! exclaimed several voices
at once, as though they seized, with avidity an
opportunity
to interrupt a dialogue which threatened
to become still more violent.
Look! repeated Abiram, in a voice which
sounded hollow and warning; If you have time for
any thing but quarrels, Ishmael, look!
The squatter turned slowly from his offending son,
and cast an eye upward that still lowered with deep
resentment, but which, the instant it caught a view
of the object that now attracted the attention of all
around him, changed its expression to one of
astonishment
and dismay.
A female stood on the spot, from which Ellen had
been so fearfully expelled. Her person was of the
smallest size that is believed to comport with beauty,
and which poets and artists have chosen as the beau
idal of feminine loveliness. Her dress was of a
dark and glossy silk, and fluttered like gossamer
around her form. Long, flowing, and curling tresses
of hair, still blacker and more shining than her robe,
fell at times about her shoulders, completely
enveloping
the whole of her delicate bust in their ringlets;
or at others streaming long and waving in the wind.
The elevation at which she stood prevented a close
examination of the lineaments of a countenance
which, however, it might be seen was youthful,
speaking
,
and, at the moment of her unlooked-for
appearance
,
chanrged with powerful emotion. So young,
indeed
,
did this fair and fragile being appear, that it
might be doubted whether the age of childhood was
entirely passed. One small and exquisitely moulded
hand was pressed on her heart, while with the other
she made an impressive gesture, which seemed to
invite
Ishmael, if any further violence was meditated,
to direct it against her bosom.
The silent wonder, with which the groupe of
borderers
gazed upward at so extraordinary a spectacle,
was only interrupted as the person of Ellen was seen
emerging with marked timidity from the tent, as if
equally urged, by apprehensions in behalf of herself
and the fears which she felt on account of her
companion
,
to remain concealed and to advance. She
spoke, but her words were unheard by those below,
and unheeded by her to whom they were addressed.
The latter, however, as if content with the offer she
had made of herself as the most proper victim to
the resentment of Ishmael, now calmly retired, and
the spot she had so lately occupied became vacant,
leaving a sort of stupid impression on the spectators
beneath, not unlike that which it might be supposed
L 2
would have been created had they just been gazing
at some supernatural vision.
More than a minute of profound silence
succeeded
,
during which the sons of Ishmael still continued
gazing at the naked rock in stupid wonder. Then,
as eye met eye, an expression of novel intelligence
passed from one to the other, indicating that to them,
at least, the appearance of this extraordinary tenant
of the pavilion was as unexpected as it was
incomprehensible
.
At length Asa, in right of his years,
and moved by the still rankling impulse of his recent
quarrel, took on himself the office of interrogator.
Instead, however, of braving the resentment of his
father, of whose fierce nature, when aroused, he had
had too frequent evidence to excite it wantonly, he
turned upon the cowering person of Abiram,
observing
with a sneer
This then is the beast you were bringing into the
prairies for a decoy! I know you to be a man who
seldom troubles truth, when any thing worse may
answer, but I never knew you to outdo yourself so
thoroughly before. The newspapers of Kentuck
have called you a dealer in black flesh a hundred
times, but little did they reckon that you drove the
trade into white families.
Who is a kidnapper! demanded Abiram with a
blustering show of resentment. Am I to be called
to account for every lie they put in print throughout
the states! Look to your own family, boy; look to
yourselves. The very stumps of Kentucky and
Tennessee
cry out ag'in ye! Ay, my tonguey gentleman,
I have seen father and mother and three children,
yourself for one, published on the logs and stubs of
the settlements, with dollars enough for reward to
have made an honest man rich, for
He was interrupted by a back-handed but violent
blow on the mouth, that caused him to totter, and
which left the impression of its weight in the starting
blood and swelling lips.
Asa, said the father, advancing with a portion
of that dignity with which the hand of Nature seems
to have invested the parental character, you have
struck the brother of your mother!
I have struck the abuser of the whole family,
returned the angry youth; and, unless he teaches
his tongue a wiser language, he had better part with
it altogether as the unruly member. I'm no great
performer with the knife, but, on an occasion, could
make out, myself, to cut off a slande
Boy, twice have you forgotten yourself to-day.
Be careful that it does not happen the third time.
When the law of the land is weak, it is right the law of
nature should be strong. You understand me, Asa;
and you know me. As for you, Abiram, the child has
done you wrong, and it is my place to see you
righted
.
Remember; I tell you justice shall be done; it
is enough. But you have said hard things ag'in me
and my family. If the hounds of the law have put
their bills on the trees and stumps of the clearings,
it was for no act of dishonesty as you know, but
because
we maintain the rule that the 'arth is common
property. No, Abiram; could I wash my hands of
things done by your advice, as easily as I can of the
things done by the whisperings of the devil, my
sleep would be quieter at night, and none who bear
my name need blush to hear it mentioned. Peace,
Asa, and you too man; enough has been said. Let
us all think well before any thing is added, that may
make what is already so bad still more bitter.
Ishmael waved his hand with authority as he
ended
,
and turned away with the air of one who felt
assured
,
that those he had addressed would not have
the temerity to dispute his commands. Asa
evidently
struggled with himself to compel the required
obedience, but his heavy nature quietly sunk into its
ordinary repose, and he soon appeared again the
being
he really was; dangerous, only, at moments, and
one whose passions were too sluggish to be long
maintained at the point of ferocity. Not so with
Abiram. While there was an appearance of a
personal
conflict, between him and his colossal nephew,
his mien had expressed the infallible evidences of
engrossing apprehension, but now, that the authority
as well as gigantic strength of the father were
interposed
between him and his assailant, his countenance
changed from paleness to a livid hue, that bespoke
how deeply the injury he had received rankled in his
breast. Like Asa, however, he acquiesced in the
decision of the squatter, and the appearance, at
least, of harmony was restored again among a set of
beings, who were restrained by no obligations more
powerful than the frail web of authority with which
Ishmael had been able to envelope his restless
children.
One effect of the quarrel had been to divert the
thoughts of the young men from their recent visiter.
With the dispute that succeeded the disappearance
of the fair stranger, all recollection of her existence
appeared to have vanished. A few ominous and
secret conferences it is true were held apart, during
which the direction of the eyes of the different
speakers betrayed their subject; but these
threatening
symptoms soon disappeared, and the whole party
was again seen broken into its usual, listless, silent
and lounging groupes.
I will go upon the rock, boys, and look abroad
for the savages, said Ishmael shortly after,
advancing
towards them with a mien which he intended
should be conciliating at the same time that it was
absolute. If there is nothing to fear, we will go
out on the plain; the day is too good to be lost in
words, like women in the towns wrangling over their
tea and sugared cakes.
Without waiting for approbation or dissent, the
squatter then advanced to the base of the rock, which
formed a sort of perpendicular wall near twenty feet
high around the whole acclivity. Ishmael, however,
directed his footsteps to a point where an ascent
might be made through a narrow cleft, which he had
taken the precaution to fortify with a breast-work of
cotton-wood logs, and which, in its turn, was
defended
by a chevaux-de-frise of the branches of the same
tree. Here an armed man was usually kept, as at the
key of the whole position, and here one of the young
men now stood, indolently leaning against the rock,
ready to protect the pass, if it should prove
necessary
,
until the whole party could be mustered at the
several points of defence.
From this place the squatter found the ascent still
difficult, partly by nature and partly by artificial
impediments
,
until he reached a sort of terrace, or to
speak more properly the plain of the elevation,
where he had established the huts in which the whole
family dwelt. These tenements were, as already
mentioned, of that class which are so often seen on
the borders, and such as belonged to the infancy of
architecture; being simply formed of logs, bark, and
poles. The area on which they stood contained
several
hundred square feet, and was sufficiently
elevated
above the plain greatly to lessen if not to remove
all danger from Indian missiles. Here Ishmael
believed
he might leave his infants in comparative
security, under the protection of their spirited
mother
,
and here he now found Esther engaged at her
ordinary
domestic employments, surrounded by her
daughters, and lifting her voice, in the tones of
declamatory
censure, as one or another of the idle fry
incurred her displeasure, and far too much engrossed
with the tempest of her own conversation to know
any thing of the violent scene which had been
passing
among the party below.
A fine windy place you have chosen for the
camp, Ishmael! she commenced or rather
continued
,
by merely diverting the attack from a sobbing
girl of ten, at her elbow, to her husband. My
word! if I haven't to count the young ones every
ten minutes, to see they are not flying away among
the buzzards or the ducks. Why do ye all keep
hovering
round the rock, like lolloping reptiles in the
spring, when the heavens are beginning to be alive
with birds, man! D'ye think mouths can be filled,
and hunger satisfied, by laziness and sleep!
You'll have your say, Eester; said the husband,
using the provincial pronunciation of America for the
name, and regarding his noisy companions, with a look
of habitual tolerance rather than of affection. But
the birds you shall have, if your own tongue don't
frighten them to take too high a flight. Ay, woman,
he continued, standing on the very spot whence he
had so rudely banished Ellen, which he had by this
time gained, and buffaloe too, if my eye can tell
the animal at the distance of a Spanish league.
Come down; come down, and be doing, instead
of talking. A talking man is no better than a
barking
dog. Nell shall hang out the cloth, if any of the
red-skins show themselves, in time to give you
notice
.
But, Ishmael, what have you been killing, my
man; for it was your rifle I heard a few minutes
agone, unless I have lost my skill in sounds.
Poh! 'twas to frighten the hawk you see sailing
above the rock.
Hawk, indeed! at your time of day to be shooting
at hawks and buzzards, with eighteen open mouths
to feed. Look at the bee, and at the beaver, my
good man, and learn to be a provider. Why,
Ishmael
!
I believe my soul, she continued, dropping
the tow she was twisting on a distaff, the man is in
that tent ag'in! More than half his time is spent
about the worthless, good-for-nothing
The sudden re-appearance of her husband closed
the mouth of the wife; and, as the former
descended
to the place where Esther had resumed her
employment
,
she was content to grumble forth her
dissatisfaction
,
instead of expressing it in more audible
terms.
The dialogue that now took place between the
affectionate pair was sufficiently succinct and
expressive
.
The woman was at first a little brief and
sullen in her answers, but care for her family soon
rendered her more complaisant. As the purport of
the conversation was merely an engagement to hunt
during the remainder of the day, in order to provide
the chief necessary of life, we shall not stop to
record
it.
With this resolution, then, the squatter descended
to the plain and divided his force into two parts, one
of which was to remain as a guard with the fortress,
and the other to accompany him to the field. He
warily included Asa and Abiram in his own party,
well knowing that no authority, short of his own,
was competent to repress the fierce disposition of
his headlong son, if fairly awakened. When these
arrangements were completed, the hunters sallied
forth, separating at no great distance from the rock,
in order to form a circle about the distant herd of
buffaloes.
CHAPTER IX.
Priscian a little scratch'd;
'Twill serve.
Love's Labour Lost
.
Having
made the reader acquainted with the
manner
in which Ishmael Bush had disposed of his
family
,
under circumstances that might have proved so
embarrassing to most other men, we shall again shift
the scene a few short miles from the place last
described
,
preserving, however, the due and natural
succession of time. At the very moment that the
squatter and his sons departed in the manner
mentioned
in the preceding chapter, two men were
intently
occupied in a swale that lay along the borders
of a little run, just out of cannon-shot from the
encampment
,
discussing the merits of a savoury bison's
hump, that had been prepared for their palates with
the utmost attention to the particular merits of that
description of food. The choice morsel had been
judiciously separated from the adjoining and less
worthy parts of the beast, and, enveloped in the
hairy coating provided by nature, it had duly
undergone
the heat of the customary subterraneous oven,
and was now laid before its proprietors in all the
culinary glory of the prairies. So far as richness,
delicacy and wildness of flavour, and substantial
nourishment were concerned, the viand might well
have claimed a decided superiority over the
meretricious
cookery and laboured compounds of the most
renowned restaurateur; though the service of the
dainty was certainly achieved in a manner far from
artificial. It would appear that the two fortunate
mortals, to whose happy lot it fell to enjoy a meal in
which health and appetite lent so keen a relish to the
exquisite food of the American deserts, were far
from being insensible of the advantage they
possessed
.
The one to whose knowledge in the culinary art
the other was indebted for his banquet, seemed the
least disposed of the two to profit by his own skill.
He eat, it is true, and with a relish; but it was
always
with the moderation with which age is apt to
temper the appetite. No such restraint, however,
was imposed on the inclination of his companion.
In the very flower of his days and in the fullest vigour
of manhood, the homage that he paid to the work of
his more aged friend's hands was of the most
profound
and engrossing character. As one delicious
morsel succeeded another he rolled his eyes towards
his companion, and seemed to express that gratitude
which he had not speech to utter, in looks of the
most benignant nature.
Cut more into the heart of it, lad, said the
trapper, for it was the venerable inhabitant of those
vast wastes, who had served the bee-hunter with the
banquet in question; cut more into the centre of
the piece; there you will find the genuine riches of
natur'; and that without need from spices, or any of
your biting mustard to give it a foreign relish.
If I had but a cup of metheglin, said Paul,
stopping to perform the necessary operation of
breathing, I should swear this was the strongest
meal that was ever placed before the mouth of
man!
Ay, ay, well you may call it strong! returned
the other laughing after his peculiar manner, in pure
satisfaction at witnessing the infinite contentment of
his companion; strong it is, and strong it makes
him who eats it! Here, Hector, tossing his patient
hound, who was watching his eye with a wistful
look, a portion of the meat, you have need of
strength, my friend, in your old days as well as your
master. Now, lad, there is a dog that has eaten and
Vol. I. M
slept wiser and better, ay, and that of richer food,
than any king of them all! and why? because he
has used and not abused the gifts of his Maker. He
was made a hound; and like a hound has he feasted.
Them did He create men; but they have eaten like
famished wolves! A good and prudent dog has
Hector
proved, and never have I found one of his breed
false in nose or friendship. Do you know the
difference
between the cookery of the wilderness and that
which is found in the settlements? No; I see
plainly
you don't, by your appetite; then I will tell you.
The one follows man, the other natur'. One thinks
he can add to the gifts of the Creator, while the
other is humble enough to enjoy them; therein lies
the secret.
I tell you, trapper, said Paul, who was very
little
edified by the morality with which his associate
saw fit to season their repast, that, every day while
we are in this place, and they are likely to be many,
I will shoot a buffaloe and you shall cook his hump!
I cannot say that, I cannot say that. The beast
is good, take him in what part you will, and it was to
be food for man that he was fashioned; but I cannot
say that I will be a witness and a helper to the waste
of killing one daily.
The devil a bit of waste shall there be, old man.
If they all turn out as good as this, I will engage to
eat them clean myself, even to the hoofshow now,
who comes here! some one with a long nose I will
answer; and one that has led him on a true scent, if
he is following the trail of a dinner.
The individual who had interrupted the
conversation
,
and who had elicited the foregoing remark
of Paul, was seen advancing along the margin of the
run, with a deliberate pace, in a direct line for the
two revellers. As there was nothing formidable nor
hostile in his appearance, the bee-hunter, instead of
suspending his operations, rather increased his efforts,
in a manner which would seem to imply that he
doubted whether the hump would suffice for the
proper entertainment of all who were now likely to
partake of the delicious morsel. With the trapper,
however, the case was different. His more
tempered
appetite was already satisfied, and he faced the
new comer with a look of cordiality, that plainly
evinced how very opportune he considered his
arrival
.
Come on, friend, he said waving his hand, as he
observed the stranger to pause a moment,
apparently
in doubt. Come on, I say: if hunger be your
guide, it has led you to a fitting place. Here is meat,
and this youth can give you corn, parch'd till it be
whiter than the upland snow; come on, without fear.
We are not ravenous beasts, eating of each other,
but Christian men, receiving thankfully that which
the Lord hath seen fit to give.
Venerable hunter, returned the Doctor, for it
was no other than the naturalist on one of his daily
exploring expeditions, who approached, I rejoice
greatly at this happy meeting; we are lovers of the
same pursuits, and should be friends.
Lord, lord! said the old man laughing, without
much deference to the rules of decorum, in the
philosopher's very face, it is the man who wanted
to make me believe that a name could change the
natur' of a beast! Come, friend; you are welcome,
though your notions are a little blinded with reading
too many books. Sit ye down, and after eating of
this morsel, tell me, if you can, the name of the
creatur' that has bestowed on you its flesh for a
meal?
The eyes of Doctor Battius (for we deem it
decorous
to give the good man the appellation he most
preferred) the eyes of Dr. Battius sufficiently
denoted
the satisfaction with which he listened to this
proposal. The exercise he had taken, and the
sharpness
of the wind, had proved excellent stimulants,
and Paul himself had hardly been in better plight to
do credit to the trapper's cookery, than was the lover
of nature, when the grateful sounds of the invitation
met his ears. Indulging in a small laugh, which his
exertions to repress reduced nearly to a simper, he
took the indicated seat by the old man's side, and
made the customary dispositions to commence his
meal without further ceremony.
I should be ashamed of my profession, he said,
swallowing a morsel of the hump with evident
delight
,
slily endeavouring at the same time to
distinguish
the peculiarities of the singed and defaced
skin, I ought to be ashamed of my profession were
there beast or bird on the continent of America that
I could not tell by some one of the many evidences
which science has enlisted in her cause. Thisthen
the food is nutritious and savourya mouthful of
your corn, friend, if you please?
Paul, who continued eating with increasing
industry
,
looking askaunt not unlike a dog when engaged
in the same agreeable pursuit, threw him his pouch,
without deeming it at all necessary to suspend his
own labours.
You were saying, friend, that you have many
ways of telling the creatur'?observed the
attentive
trapper.
Many; very many and infallible. Now, the
animals
that are carnivorous are known by their
incisores
.
Their what! demanded the trapper.
The teeth with which nature has furnished them
for defence, and in order to tear their food. Again
Look you then for the teeth of this creatur',
interrupted the trapper, who was bent on convincing
a man who had presumed to enter into competition
with himself, in matters pertaining to the wilds, of
gross ignorance; turn the piece round and find
your inside-overs.
The Doctor complied, and of course without
success
;
though he profited by the occasion to take
another fruitless glance at the wrinkled hide.
Well, friend, do you find the things you need,
before you can pronounce the creatur' a duck or a
salmon?
I apprehend the entire animal is not here?
You may well say as much, cried Paul, who
was now compelled to pause from pure repletion;
I will answer for some pounds of the fellow,
weighed
by the truest steel-yards west of the Alleghanies.
Still you may make out to keep soul and body
together
,
with what is left, reluctantly eyeing a piece
large enough to dine twenty men, which he felt
compelled
to abandon from satiety; cut in nigher to
the heart, as the old man says, and you will find the
riches of the piece.
The heart! exclaimed the Doctor, inwardly
delighted
to learn there was a distinct part to be
submitted
to his inspection. Ay, let me see the organ
it will at once determine the character of the
animal
certes
this is not the coray, sure enough it
isthe animal must be of the order bellu, from its
obese habits!
He was interrupted by a long and hearty, but still
noiseless fit of merriment, from the trapper, which
was considered so ill-timed by the offended
naturalist
,
as to produce an instant cessation of speech, if
not a stagnation in his ideas.
Listen to his beasts' habits and belly orders,
said the old man, delighted, with the evident
embarrassment
of his rival; and then he says it is not
the core! Why, man, you are farther from the truth
than you are from the settlements, with all your
bookish larning and hard words; which I have once
M 2
for all, said cannot be understood by any tribe or
nation east of the Rocky Mountains. Beastly habits
or no beastly habits, the creatur's are to be seen
cropping the prairies, by tens of thousands, and the
piece in your hand is the core of as juicy a
buffaloe-hump
as stomach need ever crave!
My aged companion, said Obed, struggling to
keep down a rising irascibility, that he conceived
would ill comport with the dignity of his character,
your system is erroneous from the premises to the
conclusion, and your classification so faulty, as
utterly
to confound the distinctions of science. The
buffaloe
is not gifted with a hump at all. Nor is his
flesh savoury and wholesome, as I must acknowledge
it would seem the subject before us may well be
characterized
There I'm dead against you, and clearly with
the trapper, interrupted Paul Hover. The man
who denies that buffaloe beef is good, should scorn
to eat it!
The Doctor, whose observation of the bee-hunter
had hitherto been exceedingly cursory, stared at the
new speaker with a look which denoted something
like recognition.
The principal characteristics of your
countenance
,
friend, he said, are familiar; either you,
or some other specimen of your class, is known to
me.
I am the man you met in the woods east of the
big river, and whom you tried to persuade to line a
yellow hornet to his nest: as if my eye was not too
true to mistake any other animal for a honey-bee, in
a clear day! we tarried together a week, as you may
remember; you at your toads and lizards, and I at
my high-holes and hollow trees. And a good job we
made of it, between us! I filled my tubs with the
sweetest honey I ever sent to the settlements, besides
housing a dozen hives; and your bag was near
bursting
with a crawling museum. I never was bold
enough to put the question to your face, stranger,
but I reckon you are a keeper of curiosities?
Ay! that is another of their wanton
wickednesses
!
exclaimed the trapper. They slay the
buck, and the moose, and the wild cat and all the
beasts that range the woods, and after stuffing them
with worthless rags, and placing eyes of glass into
their heads, they set them up to be stared at, and
call them the creatur's of the Lord; as if any
mortal
effigy could equal the works of his hand!
I know you well, returned the Doctor, on whom
the plaint of the old man produced no visible
impression
.
I know you, offering his hand cordially
to Paul; it was a prolific week, as my herbal and
catalogues shall one day prove to the world. Ay, I
remember you well, young man. You are of the
class
, mammalia;
order
, primates;
genus
, homo;
species
, Kentucky. Then, after pausing an instant
to smile complacently at his own humour, the
naturalist
proceeded. Since our separation, I have
journeyed far, having entered into a compactum or
agreement with a certain man, named Ishmael
Bush! interrupted the impatient and reckless
Paul. By the Lord, trapper, this is the very
blood-letter
that Ellen told me of!
Then Nelly has not done me credit for what I
trust I deserve; returned the single-minded Doctor,
for I am not of the phlebotomizing school at all;
greatly preferring the practice which purifies the
blood instead of abstracting it.
It was a blunder of mine, good stranger; the
girl called you a skilful man.
Therein she may have exceeded my merits,
Dr. Battius continued, bowing with sufficient
meekness
.
But Ellen is a good, and a kind, and a
spirited
girl, too. A kind and a sweet girl I have ever
found Nelly Wade to be!
The devil you have! cried Paul, dropping the
morsel he was sucking, from sheer reluctance to
abandon the grateful hump, and casting a fierce and
direct look into the very teeth of the unconscious
physician. I reckon, stranger, you have a mind to
bag Ellen too!
The riches of the whole vegetable and animal
world united, would not tempt me to harm a hair of
her head! I love the child, with what may be called
amor naturalisor rather paternusThe affection
of a father.
Aythat indeed is more befitting the difference
in your years, Paul coolly rejoined, stretching forth
his hand to regain the rejected morsel. You would
be no better than a drone at your time of day, with a
young hive to feed and swarm.
Yes, there is reason, because there is natur', in
what he says, observed the trapper: But, friend,
you have said you were a dweller in the camp of one
Ishmael Bush?
True; it is, as you know, in virtue of a
compactum
I know but little of the virtue of packing, though
I follow trapping, in my old age, for a livelihood.
They tell me that skins are well kept, in the new
fashion, but it is long since I have left off killing
more than I need for food and garments. I was an
eye-witness, myself, of the manner in which the
Siouxes broke into your encampment, and drove off
the cattle; stripping the poor man you call Ishmael
of his smallest hoofs, counting even the cloven feet.
Asinus excepted; muttered the Doctor, who
by this time was very coolly discussing his portion of
the hump, in utter forgetfulness of all its scientific
attributes. Asinus domesticus Americanus
excepted
.
I am glad to hear that so many of them are
saved
,
though I know not the value of the animals you
name; which is nothing uncommon, seeing how long
it is that I have been out of the settlements. But
can you tell me, friend, what the traveller carries
under the white cloth, he guards with teeth as sharp
as a wolf that quarrels for the carcass the hunter
has left?
You've heard of it! exclaimed the other,
dropping
the morsel he was conveying to his mouth, in
manifest surprise.
Nay, I have heard nothing; but I have seen the
cloth, and had like to have been bitten for no greater
crime than wishing to know what it covered.
Bitten! then after all the animal must be
carnivorous
!
It is too tranquil for the ursus horridus; if
it were the canis latrans, the voice would betray it.
Nor would Nelly Wade be so familiar with any of
the
genus
, fer. Venerable hunter! the solitary
animal
confined in that wagon by day, and in the tent at
night, has occasioned me more perplexity of mind
than the whole catalogue of quadrupeds besides:
and for this plain reason; I did not know how to class
it.
You think it a ravenous beast?
I know it to be a quadruped: your own danger
proves it to be carnivorous.
During this broken explanation, Paul Hover had
sat silent and thoughtful, regarding each speaker with
eyes of deep attention. But, as if suddenly moved
by the confident manner of the Doctor, the latter
had scarcely time to utter his positive assertion,
before
the young man bluntly demanded
And pray, friend, what may you call a
quadruped
?
A vagary of nature, wherein she has displayed
less of her infinite wisdom than is usual. Could
rotary levers be substituted for two of the limbs,
agreeably to the improvement in my new order of
phalangacrura, which might be rendered into the
vernacular as lever-legged, there would be a
delightful
perfection and harmony in the construction. But,
as the quadruped is now formed, I call it a mere
vagary of nature; no other than a vagary.
Harkee, stranger! in Kentucky we are but small
dealers in dictionaries. Vagary is as hard a word to
turn into English as quadruped.
A quadruped is an animal with four legsa
beast.
A beast! Do you then reckon that Ishmael Bush
travels with a beast caged in that little wagon?
I know it, and lend me your earnot literally,
friend, observing Paul to start and look surprised,
but figuratively through its functions, and you shall
hear. I have already made known that in virtue of
a compactum, I journey with the aforesaid Ishmael
Bush; but though I am bound to perform certain
duties while the journey lasts, there is no condition
which says that the said journey shall be
sempiternum
,
or eternal. Now, though this region may
scarcely
be said to be wedded to science, being to all
intents
a virgin territory as respects the inquirer into
natural history, still it is greatly destitute of the
treasures
of the vegetable kingdom. I should therefore
have tarried some hundreds of miles more to the
eastward, were it not for the inward propensity that
I feel to have the beast in question inspected and
suitably described and classed. For that matter,
he continued, dropping his voice, like one who
imparts
an important secret, I am not without hopes
of persuading Ishmael to let me dissect it.
You have seen the creature?
Not with the organs of sight; but with much
more infallible instruments of vision: the
conclusions
of reason, and the deductions of scientific
premises
.
I have watched the habits of the animal,
young man; and can fearlessly pronounce, by
evidence
that would be thrown away on ordinary
observers
,
that it is of vast dimensions, inactive,
possibly
torpid, of voracious appetite, and, as it now
appears
by the direct testimony of this venerable
hunter
,
ferocious and carnivorous!
I should be better pleased, stranger, said Paul,
on whom the Doctor's description was making a very
sensible impression, to be sure the creature was
a beast at all.
As to that, if I wanted evidence of a fact, which
is abundantly apparent by the habits of the animal,
I have the word of Ishmael, himself. A reason can
be given for my smallest deductions. I am not
troubled
,
young man, with a vulgar and idle curiosity,
but all my aspirations after knowledge, as I humbly
believe, are, first, for the advancement of learning,
and secondly, for the benefit of my fellow-creatures.
I pined greatly in secret to know the contents of the
tent, which Ishmael guarded so carefully, and which
he had covenanted that I should swear, (jurare per
deos) not to approach nigher than a defined number
of cubits, for a definite period of time. Your
jusjurandum
,
or oath, is a serious matter, and not to be
dealt in lightly; but, as my expedition depended on
complying, I consented to the act, reserving to
myself
at all times the power of distant observation. It
is now some ten days since Ishmael, pitying the state
in which he saw me, a humble lover of science,
imparted
the fact that the vehicle contained a beast,
which he was carrying into the prairies as a decoy,
by which he intends to entrap others of the same
genus, or perhaps species. Since then, my task has
been reduced simply to watch the habits of the
animal
,
and to record the results. When we reach a
certain distance where these beasts are said to abound,
I am to have the liberal examination of the
specimen
.
Paul continued to listen, in the most profound
silence, until the Doctor concluded his singular but
characteristic explanation; then the incredulous
bee-hunter
shook his head, and saw fit to reply, by
saying
Stranger, old Ishmael has burrowed you in the
very bottom of a hollow tree, where your eyes will
be of no more use than the sting of a drone. I, too,
know something of that very wagon, and I may say
that I have lined the squatter down into a flat lie.
Harkee, friend; do you think a girl, like Ellen Wade,
would become the companion of a wild beast?
Why not! why not! repeated the naturalist;
Nelly has a taste for learning, and often listens with
pleasure to the treasures that I am sometimes
compelled
to scatter in this desert. Why should she not
study the habits of any animal, even though it were
a rhinoceros!
Softly, softly, returned the equally positive, and,
though less scientific, certainly, on this subject,
better
instructed bee-hunter; Ellen is a girl of spirit,
and one too that knows her own mind, or I'm much
mistaken; but with all her courage and brave looks,
she is no better than a woman after all. Haven't I
often had the girl, crying
You are an acquaintance, then, of Nelly's?
The devil a bit. But I know a woman is a
woman
;
and all the books in Kentucky couldn't make
Ellen Wade go into a tent alone with a ravenous
beast!
It seems to me, the trapper calmly observed,
that there is something dark and hidden in this
matter. I am a witness that the traveller likes none
to look into the tent, and I have a proof more sure
than what either of you can lay claim to, that the
wagon does not carry the cage of a beast. Here is
Hector, come of a breed with noses as true and
faithful as a hand that is all-powerful has made any
of their kind, and had there been a beas in the
place, the hound would long since have told it to his
master.
Do you pretend to oppose a dog to a man!
brutality
to learning! instinct to reason! exclaimed
the Doctor in some heat. In what manner, pray,
can a hound distinguish the habits, species, or even
the genus of an animal, like reasoning, learned,
scientific
,
triumphant man!
In what manner? coolly repeated the veteran
woodsman. Listen; and if you believe that a
schoolmaster can make a quicker wit than the Lord,
you shall be made to see how much you're mistaken.
Do you not hear something move in the brake? it
has been cracking the twigs these five minutes. Now
tell me what the creatur' is?
I hope nothing ferocious! exclaimed the
Doctor
,
starting, for he still retained a lively impression
of his rencounter with the vespertilio horribilis.
You have rifles, friends; would it not be prudent
to prime them, for my fowling-piece is little to be
depended on.
There may be reason in what he says, returned
the trapper, smiling, and so far complying as to take
his piece from the place where it had lain during the
repast, and raising its muzzle in the air. Now tell
me the name of the creatur'?
It exceeds the limits of earthly knowledge!
Buffon
himself could not tell whether the animal was a
quadruped, or of the
order
, serpens! a sheep, or a
tiger!
Then was your buffoon a fool to my Hector!
Here; pup! What is it, dog? Shall we run it down,
pupor shall we let it pass?
The hound, which had already manifested to the
experienced trapper, by the tremulous motion of his
ears, his consciousness of the proximity of a strange
animal, now lifted his head from his fore paws and
Vol. I. N
slightly parted his lips, as if about to shew the
remnants
of his teeth. But, suddenly abandoning his
hostile purpose, he snuffed the air a moment, gaped
heavily, shook himself, and then peaceably resumed
his former recumbent attitude.
Now Doctor, cried the trapper, triumphantly,
I am well convinced there is neither game nor
ravenous
beast in the thicket; and that I call substantial
knowledge to a man who is too old to be a
spendthrift
of his strength, and yet who would not wish to
be a meal for a panther!
The dog interrupted his master by a loud growl,
but still kept his head crouched to the earth.
It is a man! exclaimed the trapper, rising. It
is a man, if I am a judge of the creatur's ways.
There is but little said atwixt the hound and me, but
we seldom make a blunder!
Paul Hover sprang to his feet like lightning, and,
throwing forward his rifle, he cried in a voice of
menace
Come forward, if a friend; if an enemy, stand
ready for the worst!
A friend, a white man, and I hope a Christian,
returned a voice from the thicket; which opened at
the same instant, and at the next, the speaker
himself
made his appearance.
CHAPTER X.
Go apart, Adam, and thou shalt hear
How he will shake me up.
As you like it
.
It
is well known, that even long before the
immense
regions of Louisiana changed their masters
for the second, and, as it is to be hoped for the last
time, its unguarded territory was by no means safe
from the inroads of white adventurers. The
semibarbarous
hunters from the Canadas, the same
description
of population, a little more enlightened,
from the States, and the metiffs or half-breeds, who
claimed to be ranked in the class of white men, were
scattered among the different Indian tribes, or
gleaned
a scanty livelihood in solitude, amid the haunts of
the beaver and the bison; or, to adopt the popular
nomenclature of the countryof the buffaloe.*
It was, therefore, no unusual thing for strangers to
encounter each other in the endless wastes of the
west. By signs, which an unpractised eye would
pass unobserved, these borderers knew when one of
his fellows was in his vicinity, and he avoided or
approached
the intruder as best comported with his
feelings or his interests. Generally, these interviews
were pacific; for the whites had a common enemy to
dread, in the ancient and perhaps more lawful
occupants
of the country; but instances were not rare,
in which jealousy and cupidity had caused them to
terminate in scenes of the most violent and ruthless
treachery. The meeting of two hunters on the
American desert, as we find it convenient sometimes
to call this region, was consequently, somewhat in
the suspicious and wary manner in which two vessels
draw together in a sea that is known to be infested
with pirates. While neither party is willing to betray
its weakness, by exhibiting distrust, neither is
disposed
to commit itself by any acts of confidence, from
which it may be difficult to recede.
Such was, in some degree, the character of the
present interview. The stranger drew nigh,
deliberately
;
keeping his eyes steadily fastened on the
movements of the other party, while he purposely
created little difficulties to impede an approach
which might prove too hasty. On the other hand,
Paul stood playing with the lock of his rifle, too
proud to let it appear that three men could manifest
any apprehension of a solitary individual, and yet
too prudent to omit, entirely, the customary
precautions
.
The principal reason of the marked
difference
,
which the two legitimate proprietors of the
banquet made in the receptions of their guests, was
to be explained by the entire difference which
existed
in their respective appearances.
While the exterior of the naturalist was decidedly
pacific, not to say abstracted, that of the new comer,
was distinguished by an air of vigour, and a front
and step which it would not have been difficult to
have at once pronounced to be military.
He wore a forage-cap of fine blue cloth, from
which depended a soiled tassel in gold, and which
was nearly buried in a mass of exuberant, curling,
jet-black hair. Around his throat he had negligently
fastened a stock of black silk. His body was
enveloped
in a hunting-shirt of dark green, trimmed
with the yellow fringes and ornaments that were
sometimes seen among the border-troops of the
Confederacy
.
Beneath this, however, were visible the
collar and lappells of a jacket, similar in colour and
cloth to the cap. His lower limbs were protected
by buckskin leggings, and his feet by the ordinary
Indian moccasins. A richly ornamented, and
exceedingly
dangerous straight dirk, was stuck in a sash
of red silk-net work; another girdle or rather belt
of uncoloured leather contained a pair of the
smallest
sized pistols, in holsters nicely made to fit, and
across his shoulder was thrown a short, heavy,
military
rifle; its horn and pouch occupying the usual
places beneath his arms. At his back he bore a
knapsack
,
which was marked by the well known initials
that have since gained for the government of the
United States, the good-humoured and quaint
appellation
of Uncle Sam.
I come in amity, the stranger said, like one too
much accustomed to the sight of arms to be startled
at the ludicrously belligerent attitude which Dr.
Battius
had seen fit to assume. I come as a friend;
and am one whose pursuits and wishes will not at all
interfere with your own.
Harkee, stranger, said Paul Hover, bluntly;
do you understand lining a bee from this open
place into a wood, distant, perhaps, a dozen miles.
The bee is a bird I have never been compelled
to seek, returned the other, laughing; though I
have, too, been something of a fowler in my time.
I thought as much, exclaimed Paul, thrusting
forth his hand frankly, and with the true freedom of
manner that marks an American borderer. Let us
cross fingers. You and I will never quarrel about the
comb, since you set such little store by the honey.
And, now, if your stomach has an empty corner, and
you know how to relish a genuine dew-drop when it
falls into your very mouth, there lies the exact
morsel
to put into it. Try it, stranger; and having tried
it, if you dont call it as snug a fit as you have made
sinceHow long ar' you from the settlements,
pray?
'Tis many weeks, and I fear it may be as many
more, before I can return. I will, however, gladly
profit by your invitation, for I have fasted since the
rising of yesterday's sun, and I know too well the
merits of a bison's hump to reject the food.
Ah! you're acquainted with the dish! Well,
therein you have the advantage of me, in setting out,
though I think, I may say we could now, start on
equal ground. I should be the happiest fellow,
between
Kentucky and the Rocky Mountains, if I had
a snug cabin, near some old wood that was filled
N 2
with hollow trees, just such a hump every day as
that for dinner, a load of fresh straw for hives, and
little El
Little what? demanded the stranger, evidently
amused with the communicative and frank
disposition
of the bee-hunter.
Something that I shall have one day, and which
concerns nobody so much as myself; returned Paul,
picking the flint of his rifle, and beginning very
cavalierly to whistle an air well known on the
waters
of the Mississippi.
During this preliminary discourse the stranger had
taken his seat by the side of the hump, and was
already
making a serious inroad on its relics. Dr.
Battius, however, watched his movements with a
jealousy, still more striking than the cordial
reception
which the open-hearted Paul had just exhibited.
But the doubts or rather apprehensions of the
naturalist were of a character altogether different
from the confidence of the bee-hunter. He had been
struck with the stranger's using the legitimate,
instead
of the perverted name of the animal off which
he was making his repast; and as he had been
among the foremost himself to profit by the removal
of the impediments which the policy of Spain had
placed in the way of all explorers of her
Trans-Atlantic
dominions, whether bent on the purposes of
commerce, or, like himself, on the more laudable
pursuits of science, he had a sufficiency of every-day
philosophy to feel that the same motives, which had
so powerfully urged himself to his present
undertaking
,
might produce a like result on the mind of
some other student of nature. Here, then, was the
prospect of an alarming rivalry, which bade fair to
strip him of at least a moiety of the just rewards of
all his labours, privations and dangers. Under these
views of his character, therefore, it is not at all
surprising
that the native meekness of the naturalist's
disposition was a little disturbed, and that he
watched
the proceedings of the other with such a degree
of vigilance as he believed best suited to detect his
sinister designs.
This is truly a delicious repast, observed the
unconscious young stranger, for both young and
handsome he was fairly entitled to be considered;
either hunger has given a peculiar relish to the
viand, or the bison may lay claim to be the finest of
the ox family!
Naturalists, sir, are apt, when they speak
familiarly
,
to give the cow the credit of the genus,
said Dr. Battius, swelling with his secret distrust, and
clearing his throat, before speaking, much in the
manner that a duellist examines the point of the
weapon he is about to plunge into the body of his
foe. The figure is more perfect; as the bos,
meaning
the ox, is unable to perpetuate his kind; and the
bos, in its most extended meaning, or vacca, is
altogether
the nobler animal of the two.
The Doctor uttered this opinion with a certain
air, which he intended should express his readiness
to come, at once, to any of the numerous points of
difference which he doubted not existed between
them; and he now awaited the blow of his
antagonist
,
intending that his next thrust should be still
more vigorous. But the young stranger appeared
much better disposed to partake of the good cheer,
with which he had been so providentially provided,
than to take up the cudgels of argument on this, or
on any other of the knotty points which are so apt
to furnish the lovers of science with the materials of
a mental joust.
I dare say you are very right, sir, he replied,
with a most provoking indifference to the importance
of the points he conceded. I dare say you are
quite right; and that vacca would have been the
better word.
Pardon me, sir; you are giving a very wrong
construction to my language, if you suppose I
include
,
without many and particular qualifications,
the bibulus Americanus, in the family of the vacca.
For, as you well know, siror, as I presume I should
say, Doctoryou have the medical diploma, no
doubt?
You give me credit for an honour I can lay
no claim to, interrupted the other.
An under-graduate!or perhaps your degrees
have been taken in some other of the liberal
sciences
?
Still wrong, I do assure you.
Surely, young man, you have not entered on this
importantI may say, this awful service, without
some evidence of your fitness for the task! Some
commission by which you can assert an authority to
proceed, or by which you may claim an affinity and
a communion with your fellow-workers in the same
beneficent pursuits!
I know not by what means, or for what
purposes
,
you have made yourself master of my
objects
!
exclaimed the youth, reddening and rising
with a quickness which manifested how little he
regarded
the grosser appetites, when a subject nearer
his heart was approached. Still, sir, your language
is incomprehensible. That pursuit, which in another
might perhaps be justly called beneficent, is, in me,
a dear and cherished duty; though why a
commission
should be demanded or needed is, I confess, no
less a subject of surprise.
It is customary to be provided with such a
document
,
returned the Doctor, gravely; and, on all
suitable occasions to produce it, in order that
congenial
and friendly minds may, at once, reject
unworthy
suspicions, and stepping over, what may be called
the elements of discourse, come at once to those
points which are desiderata to both.
It is a strange request! the youth muttered,
turning his dark, frowning eye from one to the other,
as if examining the characters of his companions,
with a view to weigh their physical powers. Then,
putting his hand into his bosom, he drew forth a
small box, and extending it with an air of dignity
towards
the Doctor, he continuedYou will find
by this, sir, that I have some right to travel in a
country which is now the property of the American
States.
What have we here! exclaimed the naturalist,
opening the folds of a large parchment. Why,
this is the sign-manual of the philosopher, Jefferson!
The seal of state! Countersigned by the minister
of war! Why this is a commission creating Duncan
Uncas Middleton a captain of artillery!
Of whom? of whom? repeated the trapper, who
had sat regarding the stranger, during the whole
discourse
,
with eyes that seemed greedily to devour
each lineament. How is the name? did you call
him Uncas?Uncas! Was it Uncas?
Such is my name, returned the youth, a little
naughtily. It is the appellation of a native chief,
that both my uncle and myself bear with pride; for
it is the memorial of an important service done my
family by a warrior in the old wars of the
provinces
.
Uncas! did ye call him Uncas? repeated the
trapper, approaching the youth and parting the dark
curls which clustered over his broad brow, without
the slightest resistance on the part of their
wondering
owner. Ah! my eyes are old, and not so keen
as when I was a warrior myself; but I can see the
look of the father in the son! I saw it when he first
came nigh; but so many things have since passed
before my failing sight, that I could not name the
place where I had met his likeness! Tell me, lad;
by what name is your father known?
He was an officer of the States in the war of the
revolution, of my own name of course; my mother's
brother was called Duncan Uncas Heyward.
Still Uncas! still Uncas! echoed the other,
trembling with eagerness. And
his
father?
Was called the same, without the appellation of
the native chief. It was to him, and to my
grandmother
,
that the service of which I have just spoken
was rendered.
I know'd it! I know'd it! shouted the old man,
in his tremulous voice, his rigid features working
powerfully, as if the names the other mentioned
awakened some long dormant emotions, connected
with the events of an anterior age. I know'd it!
son or grandson, it is all the same; it is the blood,
and 'tis the look! Tell me, is he they call'd Duncan,
without the Uncasis he living!
The young man shook his head sorrowfully, as he
replied in the negative.
He died full of days and of honours. Beloved,
happy and bestowing happiness?
Full of days! repeated the trapper, looking
down at his own meagre, but still muscular hands.
Ah! he liv'd in the settlements, and was wise only
after their fashions. But you have often seen him;
and you have heard him discourse of Uncas, and of
the wilderness?
Often! he was then an officer of the king; but
when the war took place between the crown and her
colonies, my grandfather did not forget his
birth-place
,
but threw off the empty allegiance of names,
and was true to his proper country; he fought on
the side of liberty.
There was reason in it; and what is better, there
was natur'! Come, sit ye down beside me lad; sit
ye down, and tell me of what your grand'ther used
to speak, when his mind dwelt on the wonders of the
wilderness.
The youth smiled, no less at the importunity than
at the interest manifested by the old man; but as he
found there was no longer the least appearance of
any violence being contemplated, he unhesitatingly
complied.
Give it all to the trapper by rule, and by figures
of speech; said Paul, very coolly taking his seat on
the other side of the young soldier. It is the fashion
of old age to relish these ancient traditions, and, for
that matter, I can say that I don't dislike to listen to
them myself.
Middleton smiled again, and perhaps with a slight
air of derision; but good-naturedly turning to the
trapper, he continued
It is a long, and might prove a painful story
Bloodshed and all the horrors of Indian cruelty and
of Indian warfare, are fearfully mingled in the
narrative
.
Ay, give it all to us, stranger, continued Paul;
we are used to these matters in Kentuck, and, I
must say, I think a story none the worse for having a
few scalps in it!
But he told you of Uncas, did he! resumed the
trapper, without regarding the slight interruptions of
the bee-hunter, which amounted to no more than a
sort of by-play. And, what thought he and said
ne of the lad, in his parlour, with the comforts and
ease of the settlements at his elbow?
I doubt not he used a language similar to that he
would have adopted in the woods, and had he stood
face to face, with his friend
Did he call the savage his friend; the poor,
naked
,
painted warrior? he was not too proud then to
call the Indian his friend?
He even boasted of the connexion; and as you
have already heard, bestowed a name on his
firstborn
,
which is likely to be handed down as an heir
loom among the rest of his descendants.
It was well done! like a man: ay! and like a
Christian, too! He used to say the Delaware was
swift of footdid he remember that?
As the antelope! Indeed, he often spoke of him
by the appellation of Le Cerf Agile, a name he had
obtained by his activity.
And bold, and fearless, lad! continued the
trapper
looking up into the eyes of his companion, with
a wistfulness that bespoke the delight he received in
listening to the praises of one, whom it was so very
evident, he had once tenderly loved.
Brave as a blooded hound! Without fear! He
always quoted Uncas and his father, who from his
wisdom was called the Great Serpent, as models of
heroism and constancy.
He did them justice! he did them justice! Truer
men, were not to be found in any tribe or nation,
be their skins of what colour they might. I see your
grand'ther was just, and did his duty, too, by his
offspring
!
'Twas a perilous time he had of it, among
them hills, and nobly did he play his own part! Tell
me lad, or officer, I should say,since officer you be
was this all?
Certainly not; it was, as I have said, a fearful
tale, full of moving incidents, and the memories both
of my grandfather and of my grandmother
Ah! exclaimed the trapper, tossing a hand into
the air as his whole countenance lighted with the
recollections the name revived. They called her
Alice! Elsie or Alice; 'tis all the same. A laughing,
playful child she was, when happy; and tender and
weeping in her misery! Her hair was shining and
yellow, as the coat of the young fawn, and her skin
clearer than the purest water that drips from the
rock. Well do I remember her! I remember her
right well!
The lip of the youth slightly curled, and he
regarded
the old man with an expression, which might
easily have been construed into a declaration that
such were not his own recollections of his venerable
and revered ancestor, though it would seem he did
not think it necessary to say as much in words. He
was content to answer:
They both retained impressions of the dangers
they had passed, by far too vivid easily to lose the
recollection of any of their fellow-actors.
The trapper looked aside, and seemed to struggle
with some deeply innate feeling; then, turning again
towards his companion, though his honest eyes no
longer dwelt with the same open interest, as before,
on the countenance of the other, he continued
Did he tell you of them
all?
Were they
all
red-skins, but himself and the daughters of Munro?
No. There was a white man associated with the
Delawares. A scout of the English army, but a
native
of the provinces.
A drunken, worthless vagabond, like most of his
colour who harbour with the savages, I warrant
you!
Old man, your gray hairs should caution you
against slander. The man, I speak of, was of great
simplicity of mind, but of sterling worth. Unlike
most of those who live a border life, he united the
better, instead of the worst qualities, of the two
people
.
He was a man endowed with the choicest and
perhaps rarest gift of nature; that of distinguishing
good from evil. His virtues were those of simplicity,
because such were the fruits of his habits, as were
indeed his very prejudices. In courage he was the
equal of his red associates; in warlike skill, being
better instructed, their superior. `In short, he was
a noble shoot from the stock of human nature, which
never could attain its proper elevation and
importance
,
for no other reason, than because it grew in
Vol. I. O
the forest:' such, old hunter, were the very words
of my grandfather, when speaking of the man you
imagine so worthless!
The eyes of the trapper had sunk to the earth, as
the stranger delivered this character of the subject
of their discourse in the ardent tones of generous
youth. He played with the ears of his hound;
fingered his own rustic garment, and opened and shut
the pan of his rifle, with hands that trembled in a
manner that would have implied their total unfitness
to wield the weapon. When the other had
concluded
he hoarsely added
Your grand'ther didn't then entirely forget the
white man!
So far from that, there are already three among
us, who have also names derived from that scout.
A name, did you say? exclaimed the old man,
starting; what, the name of the solitary, unl'arned
hunter? Do the great, and the rich, and the
honoured
,
and, what is better still, the just, do they bear
his very, actual, name?
It is borne by my brother, and by two of my
cousins, whatever may be their titles to be described
by the terms you have mentioned.
Do you mean the actual name itself; spelt with
the very same letters, beginning with an N and
ending
with an L?
Exactly the same, the youth smilingly replied.
No, no, we have forgotten nothing that was his. I
have at this moment a dog brushing a deer, not far
from this, who is come of a hound that very scout
sent as a present after his friends, and which was of
the stock he always used himself: a truer breed, in
nose and foot, is not to be found in the wide Union.
Hector! said the old man, struggling to conquer
an emotion that nearly suffocated him, and speaking
to his hound in the sort of tones he would have used
to a child, do ye hear that, pup! your kin and
blood are in the prairie! A nameit is wonderful
it is very wonderful!
Nature could endure no more. Overcome by a
flood of unusual and extraordinary sensations, and
stimulated by tender and long dormant recollections,
strangely and unexpectedly revived, the old man had
just self-command enough to add, in a voice that
was hollow and unnatural, through the efforts he
made to command it
Boy, I am that scout; a warrior once, a
miserable
trapper now! when the tears broke, over his
wasted cheeks, out of fountains that had long been
dried, and, sinking his face between his knees, he
covered it decently with his buckskin garment, and
sobbed aloud.
The spectacle produced correspondent emotions
in his companions. Paul Hover had actually
swallowed
each syllable of the discourse as they fell
alternately
from the different speakers, his feelings
keeping equal pace with the increasing interest of
the scene. Unused to such strange sensations, he
was turning his face on every side of him, to avoid
he knew not what, until he saw the tears and heard
the sobs of the old man, when he sprang to his feet,
end grappling his guest fiercely by the throat, he
demanded
by what authority he had made his aged
companion weep. A flash of recollection crossing
his brain at the same instant, he released his hold,
and stretching forth an arm in the very wantonness
of his gratification, he seized the Doctor by the hair,
which instantly revealed its artificial formation, by
cleaving to his hand, leaving the white and shining
poll of the naturalist with a covering no warmer than
the skin.
What think you of that, Mr. Bug-gatherer! he
rather shouted than cried; is not this a strange bee
to line into his hole!
'Tis remarkable! wonderful! edifying!
returned
the lover of nature, good-humouredly recovering
his wig, with twinkling eyes and a husky voice.
'Tis rare and commendable! Though I doubt not
in the exact order of causes and effects.
With this sudden outbreaking, however, the
commotion
instantly subsided; the three spectators
clustering
around the trapper with a species of awe, at
beholding the tears of one so aged.
It must be so, or how could he be so familiar
with a history that is little known beyond my own
family; at length the youth observed, not ashamed
to acknowledge how much he had been affected, by
unequivocally drying his own eyes.
True! echoed Paul; if you want any more
evidence I will swear to it! I know every word of
it myself to be true as the gospel!
And yet we had long supposed him dead!
continued
the soldier. My grandfather had filled his
days with honour, and he had believed him the
junior
of the two.
It is not often that youth has an opportunity of
thus looking down on the weakness of age! the
trapper observed, raising his head, and looking around
him with composure and dignity. That I am still
here, young man, is the pleasure of the Lord, who
has spared me until I have seen fourscore long and
laborious years, for his own secret ends. That I am
the man I say, you need not doubt; for why should
I go to my grave with so cheap a lie in my mouth?
I do not hesitate to believe; I only marvel that
it should be so! But why do I find you, venerable
and excellent friend of my parents, in these wastes,
so far from the comforts and safety of the lower
country?
I have come into these plains to escape the
sound of the axe; for here surely the chopper can
never follow! But I may put the like question to
yourself. Are you of the party which the States
have sent into their new purchase, to look after the
natur' of the bargain they have made?
I am not, Lewis is making his way up the river,
some hundreds of miles from this. I come on a
private
adventure.
Though it is no cause of wonder, that a man
whose strength and eyes have failed him as a hunter,
should be seen nigh the haunts of the beaver, using
a trap instead of a rifle, it is strange that one so
young and prosperous, and bearing the commission
of the Great Father, should be moving among the
prairies, without even a camp-colourman to do his
biddings!
You would think my reasons sufficient did you
know them, as know them you shall if you are
disposed
to listen to my story. I think you all honest,
and men who would rather aid than betray one bent
on a worthy object.
Come, then, and tell us at your leisure, said the
trapper, seating himself, and beckoning to the youth
to follow his example. The latter willingly
complied
,
and after Paul and the Doctor had disposed of
themselves to their several likings, the new comer
entered into a narrative of the singular reasons which
had led him so far into the deserts.
CHAPTER XI.
So foul a sky clears not without a storm.
King John
.
In
the mean time the industrious and
irreclaimable
hours continued their labours. The sun, which
had been struggling through such masses of vapour
throughout the day, fell slowly into a streak of clear
sky, and thence sunk gloriously into the gloomy
O 2
wastes, as he is wont to settle into the waters of the
ocean. The vast herds which had been grazing
among the wild pastures of the prairies, gradually
disappeared, and the endless flocks of aquatic birds,
that were pursuing their customary annual journey
from the virgin lakes of the north towards the gulf
of Mexico, ceased to fan that air, which had now
become
loaded with dew and vapour. In short, the
shadows of night fell upon the rock, adding the
mantle
of darkness to the other dreary accompaniments
of the place.
As the light began to fail, Esther collected her
younger children at her side, and placing herself on
a projecting point of her insulated fortress, she sat
patiently awaiting the return of the hunters. Ellen
Wade was at no great distance, seeming to keep a
little aloof from the anxious circle, as if willing to
mark the distinction which existed in their
characters
.
Your uncle is, and always will be a dull
calculator
,
Nell, observed the mother, after a long pause
in a conversation that had turned on the labours of
the day; a lazy hand at figures and foreknowledge
is that said Ishmael Bush! Here he sat lolloping
about the rock from light till noon, doing nothing
but schemeschemeschemewith seven as noble
boys at his elbows as woman ever gave to man; and
what's the upshot! why, night is setting in, and his
needful work not yet ended.
It is not prudent, certainly, aunt, Ellen replied,
with a vacancy in her air, that proved how little she
knew what she was saying; and it is setting a very
bad example to his sons.
Hoity, toity, girl! who has reared you up as a
judge over your elders, ay, and your betters, too!
I should like to see the man on the whole frontier
who sets a more honest example to his children than
this same Ishmael Bush! Show me, if you can, Miss
Fault-finder, but not fault-mender, a set of boys
who will, on occasion, sooner chop a piece of
logging
and dress it for the crop, than my own children;
though I say it myself, who, perhaps, should be
silent
;
or a cradler that knows better how to lead a
gang of hands through a field of wheat, leaving a
cleaner stubble in his track, than my own good man!
Then, as a father, he is as generous as a lord; for
his sons have only to name the spot where they
would like to pitch, and he gives 'em a deed of the
plantation, and no charge for papers is ever made!
As the wife of the squatter concluded, she raised
a hollow, taunting laugh, that was echoed from the
mouths of several juvenile imitators, whom she was
training to a life as shiftless and lawless as her own;
but which, notwithstanding its uncertainty was not
without its secret charms.
Holloa! old Eester; shouted the well-known
voice of her husband, from the plain beneath; 'ar
you keeping your junketts, while we are finding you
in venison and buffaloe beef! Come downcome
down, old girl, with all your young; and lend us a
hand to carry up the meatwhy, what a frolic you
ar' in, woman! Come down, come down, for the
boys are at hand, and we have work here for double
your number.
Ishmael might have spared his lungs more than a
moiety of the effort they were compelled to make in
order that he should be heard. He had hardly
uttered
the name of his wife, before the whole of the
crouching circle rose in a body, and tumbling over
each other, they precipitated themselves down the
dangerous passes of the rock with ungovernable
impatience
.
Esther followed the young fry with a more
measured gait; nor did Ellen deem it wise, or rather
discreet, to remain behind. Consequently the whole
were soon assembled at the base of their citadel, on
the open plain.
Here the squatter was found, staggering under the
weight of a fine fat buck, attended by one or two of
his younger sons. Abiram quickly appeared, and
before many minutes had elapsed most of the
hunters
dropped in, singly and in pairs, each man
bringing
with him some fruits of his prowess in the field.
The plain is free from red-skins, to-night at
least, said Ishmael, after the bustle of reception had
a little subsided; for I have scoured the prairie for
many long miles, on my own feet, and I call myself
a judge of the print of an Indian moccasin. So, old
woman, you can give us a few steaks of the venison,
and then we will sleep on the day's work.
I'll not swear there are no savages near us, said
Abiram. I too, know something of the trail of a
red-skin, and unless my eyes have lost some of their
sight, I would swear, boldly, that there ar' Indians at
hand. But wait till Asa comes in. He pass'd the
spot where I found the marks, and the boy knows
something of such matters too.
Ay, the boy knows too much of many things,
returned Ishmael, gloomily. It will be better for
him when he thinks he knows less. But what
matters
it, Hetty, if all the Sioux tribes, west of the big
river, are within a mile of us; they will find it no
easy matter to scale this rock, in the teeth of ten
bold men.
Call 'em twelve, at once, Ishmael; call'em
twelve! cried his termagant assistant. For if
your moth-gathering, bug-hunting friend, can be
counted a man, I beg you will set me down as two.
I will not turn my back to him, with the rifle or the
shot-gun, and for courage!the yearling heifer, that
them skulking devils the Tetons stole, was the
biggest
coward among us all; and after her came your
drivelling Doctor. Ah! Ishmael, you rarely attempt
a regular trade but you come out the loser; and this
man, I reckon, is the hardest bargain among them
all! Would you think it, the fellow ordered me a
blister around my mouth, because I complained of a
pain in the foot!
It is a pity, Eester, her husband coolly
answered
,
that you did not take it; I reckon it would
have done you considerable good. But, boys, if it
should turn out as Abiram thinks, that there are
Indians
near us, we may have to scamper up the rock,
and lose our suppers after all. Therefore we will
make sure of the game, and talk over the
performances
of the Doctor when we have nothing better
to do.
The hint was taken, and in a few minutes, the
exposed
situation in which the family was collected,
was exchanged for the more secure elevation of the
rock. Here Esther busied herself, working and
scolding, with equal industry, until the repast was
prepared, when she summoned her husband to his
meal in a voice as sonorous as that with which the
Imaun reminds the Faithful of a more important
duty.
When each had assumed his proper and
customary
place around the smoking viands, the squatter set
the example by beginning to partake of a delicious
venison steak, prepared like the hump of the bison,
with a skill that rather increased than concealed its
natural properties. A painter would gladly have
seized the moment, to transfer the wild and
characteristic
scene to the canvass.
The reader will remember that the citadel of
Ishmael
stood insulated, lofty, ragged, and nearly
inaccessible
.
A bright flashing fire that was burning on
the centre of its summit, and around which the busy
groupe was clustered, lent it the appearance of some
tall Pharos placed in the centre of the deserts, to
light such adventurers as wandered through their
broad wastes. The flashing flame gleamed from one
sun-burnt countenance to another, exhibiting every
variety of expression, from the juvenile simplicity
of the children, mingled as it was with a shade of
the wildness peculiar to their semi-barbarous lives,
to the dull and immovable apathy that dwelt on the
features of the squatter, when unexcited.
Occasionally
a gust of wind would fan the embers, and, as a
brighter light shot upwards, the little solitary tent
was seen as it were suspended in the gloom of the
upper air. All beyond was enveloped, as usual at
that hour, in an impenetrable body of darkness.
It is unaccountable that Asa should choose to be
out of the way at such a time as this, Esther
pettishly
observed. When all is finished and to-rights,
we shall have the boy coming up, grumbling for his
meal, and hungry as a bear after his winter's nap.
His stomach is as true as the best clock in Kentucky,
and seldom wants winding up to tell the time,
whether
of day or night. A desperate eater is Asa, when
a-hungered, by a little work!
Ishmael looked sternly around the circle of his
silent sons, as if to see whether any among them
would presume to say aught in favour of the absent
delinquent. But now, when no exciting causes
existed
to arouse their slumbering tempers, it seemed
to be too great an effort to enter on the defence of
their rebellious brother. Abiram, however, who
since the pacification, either felt, or affected to feel,
a more generous interest in his late adversary, saw fit
to express an anxiety, to which the others were
strangers
It will be well if the boy has escaped the
Tetons
!
he muttered. I should be sorry to have
Asa, who is one of the stoutest of our party, both
in heart and hand, fall into the power of the
red-devils
.
Look to yourself, Abriam; and spare your
breath, if you can use it only to frighten the woman
and her huddling girls. You have whitened the face
of Ellen Wade, already; who looks as pale as if she
was staring to-day at the very Indians you name,
when I was forced to speak to her through the rifle,
because I couldn't reach her ears with my tongue.
How was it, Nell! you have never given the reason
of your deafness?
The colour of Ellen's cheek changed as suddenly
as the squatter's piece had flashed on the occasion to
which he alluded, the burning glow suffusing her
features, until it even mantled her throat with its fine
healthful tinge. She hung her head abashed, but did
not seem to think it necessary to reply.
Ishmael, too sluggish to pursue the subject, or
content
with the pointed allusion he had just made, rose
from his seat on the rock, and stretching his heavy
frame, like a well-fed and fattened ox, he announced
his intention to sleep. Among a race who lived
chiefly
for the indulgence of the natural wants, such a
declaration
could not fail of meeting with sympathetic
dispositions. One after another disappeared, each
seeking his or her rude dormitory, and, before many
minutes, Esther, who by this time had scolded the
younger fry to sleep, found herself, if we except the
usual watchman below, in solitary possession of the
naked rock.
Whatever less valuable fruits had been produced,
in this uneducated woman by her migratory habits,
the great principle of female nature was too deeply
rooted ever to be entirely eradicated. Of a
powerful
,
not to say fierce temperament, her passions were
violent and difficult to be smothered. But, however
she might and did abuse the accidental prerogatives
of her situation, her love for her offspring, while it
often slumbered, could never be said to become
extinct
.
She liked not the protracted absence of Asa.
Too fearless herself to have hesitated an instant on
her own account about crossing the dark abyss, into
which she now sat looking with longing eyes, her
busy imagination, in obedience to this
inextinguishable
sentiment, began to conjure nameless evils on
account of her son. It might be true, as Abiram had
hinted, that he had become a captive to some of the
tribes who were hunting the buffaloe in that vicinity,
or even a still more dreadful calamity might have
befallen. So thought the mother, while silence and
darkness lent their aid to the secret impulses of
nature
.
Agitated by these reflections, which put sleep at
defiance, Esther continued at her post, listening with
that sort of acuteness which is termed instinct, in the
animals a few degrees below her in the scale of
intelligence
,
for any of those noises which might indicate
the approach of footsteps. At length, her wishes had
an appearance of being realized, for the long desired
sounds were distinctly audible, and presently she
distinguished the dim form of a man, at the base of
the rock.
Now, Asa, richly do you deserve to be left with
an earthen bed this blessed night! the woman
began
to mutter, with a revolution in her feelings, that
will not be surprising to those who have made the
contradictions that give variety to the human
character
a study. And a hard one I've a mind it shall
be! Why Abner; Abner; you Abner, do you sleep?
Let me not see you dare to open the hole, till I get
down. I will know who it is that wishes to disturb
a peaceable, ay, and an honest family too, at such
a time in the night as this!
Woman! exclaimed a voice, that intended to
bluster, while the speaker was manifestly a little
apprehensive
of the consequences; Woman, I forbid
you on pain of the law to project any of your
infernal
missiles. I am a citizen and a freeholder, and, a
graduate of two universities; and I stand upon my
rights! Beware of malice prepense, of chance
medley
and of manslaughter. It is Iyour amicus; a
friend and inmate. IDr. Obed Battius.
Who! demanded Esther, in a voice that nearly
refused to convey her words to the ears of the
anxious
listener beneath. Did you say it was not Asa?
Nay, I am neither Asa, nor Absalom, nor any of
the Hebrew princes; but Obed, the root and stock
of them all. Have I not said, woman, that you keep
one in attendance who is entitled to a peaceable as
well as an honourable admission. Do you take me
for an animal of the class amphibia, and that I can
play with my lungs as a blacksmith does with his
bellows!
The naturalist might have expended his breath
much longer, without producing any desirable result,
had Esther been his only auditor. Disappointed and
alarmed, the woman had already sought her pallet,
and was preparing, with a sort of desperate
indifference
,
to compose herself to sleep. Abner, the
sentinel
below, however, had been aroused from an
exceedingly
equivocal situation, by the outcry; and as
he had now regained sufficient consciousness to
recognize
the voice of the physician, the latter was
admitted
,
with the least possible delay. Dr. Battius
bustled through the narrow entrance, with an air of
singular impatience, and was already beginning to
mount the difficult ascent, when catching a view of
the porter, he paused, to observe with an air that he
intended should be impressively admonitory
Abner, there are dangerous symptoms of
somnolency
about thee! It is sufficiently exhibited in the
tendency to hiation, and may prove dangerous not
only to yourself, but to all thy father's family!
You never made a greater mistake, Doctor,
returned
the youth, gaping like an indolent lion, I
haven't a symptom, as you call it, about any part of
me; and as to father and the children, I reckon the
Vol. I. P
small-pox and the measles have been thoroughly
through the breed these many months ago.
Content with his brief admonition, the naturalist
had surmounted half the difficulties of the ascent
before the deliberate Abner had ended his
justification
.
On the summit, Obed fully expected to
encounter
Esther, of whose linguacious powers, he had
too often been furnished with the most sinister proofs,
and of which he stood in an awe too salutary to
covet a repetition of her attacks. The reader can
foresee that he was to be agreeably disappointed.
Treading lightly, and looking timidly over his
shoulder
,
as if he apprehended a shower of something,
even more formidable than words, the Doctor
proceeded
to the place which had been allotted to
himself
in the general disposition of the dormitories.
Instead of sleeping, the worthy naturalist sat
ruminating
over what he had both seen and heard that
day, until the tossing and mutterings which
proceeded
from the cabin of Esther, who was his nearest
neighbour, advertised him of the wakeful situation
of its inmate. Perceiving the necessity of doing
something to disarm this female Cerberus, before his
own purpose could be accomplished, the Doctor,
reluctant as he was to encounter her tongue, found
himself compelled to invite a colloquial
communication
.
You appear not to sleep, my very kind and
worthy
Mrs. Bush, he said, determined to commence
his applications with a plaster that was usually found
to adhere; you appear to rest badly, my excellent
hostess; can I administer to your ailings?
What would you give me, man, grumbled
Esther
.
A blister to make me sleep?
Say rather a cataplasm. But if you are in pain,
here are some cordial drops, which taken in a glass
of my own cogniac will give you rest, if I know
aught of the materia medica.
The Doctor, as he very well knew, had assailed
Esther on her weak side; and, as he doubted not of
the acceptability of his prescription, he sat himself
at work, without unnecessary delay, to prepare it.
When he made his offering, it was received in a
snappish and threatening manner, but swallowed
with a facility that sufficiently proclaimed how much
it was relished by the patient. The woman
muttered
her thanks, and her leech reseated himself in
silence
,
to await the operation of the dose. In less
than half an hour the breathing of Esther became so
profound, and as the Doctor himself might have
termed it, so very abstracted, that had he not known
how easy it was to ascribe this new instance of
somnolency
to the powerful dose of opium with which
he had garnished the brandy, he might have seen
reason to distrust his own prescription. With the
sleep of the restless woman, the stillness became
profound and general.
Then it was that Dr. Battius saw fit to arise, with
the silence and caution of the midnight robber, and
to steal out of his own cabin, or rather kennel, for it
deserved no better name, towards the adjoining
dormitories
.
Here he took time to assure himself that
all his neighbours were buried in deep sleep. Once
advised of this important fact, he hesitated no
longer
,
but commenced the difficult ascent which led to
the upper pinnacle of the rock. His advance, though
abundantly guarded, was not entirely noiseless; but
while he was felicitating himself on having
successfully
effected his object, and he was in the very act
of placing his foot on the highest ledge, a hand was
laid upon the skirts of his coat, which as effectually
put an end to his advance, as though the gigantic
strength of Ishmael himself had pinned him to the
earth.
Is there sickness in the tent, whispered a soft
voice in his very ear, that Dr. Battius is called to
visit it at such an hour?
So soon as the heart of the naturalist had returned
from its hasty expedition into his throat, as one less
skilled than Dr. Battius in the formation of the
animal
would have been apt to have accounted for the
extraordinary sensation with which he received this
unlooked-for interruption, he found resolution to
reply
;
using, as much in terror as in prudence, the
same precaution in the indulgence of his voice.
My worthy Nelly! I am greatly rejoiced to find
it is no other than thee! Hist! child, hist! Should
Ishmael gain a knowledge of our plans, he would
not hesitate to cast us both from off this rock, upon
the plain beneath. Hist! Nelly, hist!
As the Doctor delivered his injunctions between
the intervals of his ascent, by the time they were
concluded, both he and his auditor had gained the
upper level.
And now, Dr. Battius, the girl gravely
demanded
,
may I know the reason why you have run so
great a risk of flying from this place, without wings,
and at the certain expense of your neck?
Nothing shall be concealed from thee, my worthy
and trusty Nellybut are you certain that Ishmael
will not awake?
No fear of him; he will sleep until the sun
scorches his eye-lids. The danger is from my
aunt.
Esther sleepeth! the Doctor sententiously
replied
.
Ellen, you have been watching on this rock
to-day?
I was ordered to do so.
And you have seen the bison, and the antelope,
and the wolf, and the deer, as usual; animals of the
orders,
pecora, bellu and fer.
I have seen the creatures you named in English;
but I know nothing of the Indian languages.
There is still an
order
that I have not named,
which you have also seen. The primatesis it not
true?
I cannot say. I know no animal by that name.
Nay, Ellen, you confer with a friend. Of the
genus,
homo, child?
Whatever else I may have had in view, I have
not seen the vespertilio horribi
Hush, Nelly, thy vivacity will betray us! Tell
me, girl, have you not seen certain
bipeds,
called
men,
wandering about the prairies?
Surely. My uncle and his sons have been
hunting
the buffaloe, since the sun began to fall.
I must speak in the vernacular, to be
comprehended
!
Ellen, I would say of the
species,
Kentucky.
Though Ellen reddened like the rose, her blushes
were happily concealed by the darkness. She
hesitated
an instant, and then summoned sufficient spirit,
to say, decidedly
If you wish to speak in parables, Doctor
Battius
,
you must find another listener. Put your
questions
plainly in English, and I will answer them
honestly
in the same tongue.
I have been journeying in this desert, as thou
knowest, Nelly, in quest of animals that have been
hidden from the eyes of science, until now. Among
others, I have discovered a primates, of the
genus,
homo;
species,
Kentucky; which I term, Paul
Hist, for the sake of mercy! said Ellen
speak lower, Doctor; or we shall be heard.
Hover; by profession a collector of the apes or
bee, continued the other. Do I use the vernacular
now,am I understood?
Perfectly, perfectly, returned the agitated girl,
breathing with difficulty, in her surprise. But
what of him? did he tell you to mount this rockhe
knows nothing, himself; for the oath I gave my
uncle
,
has shut my mouth.
P 2
Ay, but there is one, that has taken no oath,
who has revealed all. I would that the mantle which
is wrapped around the mysteries of nature, were as
effectually withdrawn from its hidden treasures!
Ellen! Ellen! the man with whom I have
unwittingly
formed a compactum or agreement is sadly
forgetful
of the obligations of honesty! Thy uncle, child.
You mean Ishmael Bush, my father's brother's
widow's husband, returned the offended girl, a little
proudly.Indeed, indeed, it is cruel to reproach
me with a tie that chance has formed, and which I
would rejoice so much to break for ever!
The humbled Ellen could utter no more, but
sinking
on a projection of the rock, she began to sob in
a manner that rendered their situation doubly
critical
.
The Doctor muttered a few words, which he
intended as an apologetic explanation, but before he
had time to complete his laboured vindication, she
arose and said with great decision
I did not come here to pass my time in foolish
tears, nor you to try to stop them. What then has
brought you hither?
I must see the inmate of that tent.
You know what it contains?
I am taught to believe I do; and I bear a letter,
which I must deliver with my own hands. If the
animal prove a quadruped, Ishmael is a true man
if a biped, fledged or unfledged, I care not, he is false,
and our compactum at an end!
Ellen made a sign for the Doctor to remain where
he was, and to be silent. She then glided into the
tent, where she continued many minutes, that proved
exceedingly weary and anxious to the expectant
without, but the instant she returned, she took him
by the arm, and together they entered beneath the
folds of the mysterious cloth.
CHAPTER XII.
Pray God the Duke of York excuse himself!
King Henry VI.
The
mustering of the borderers on the following
morning was silent, sullen, and gloomy. The repast
of that hour was wanting in the inharmonious
accompaniment
with which Esther ordinarily enlivened
their meals; for the effects of the powerful opiate
the Doctor had administered, still muddled her
usually
quick intellects. The young men brooded over
the absence of their elder brother, and the brows
of Ishmael himself were sternly knit, as he cast his
scowling eyes from one to the other, like a man
who was preparing to meet and to repel an expected
assault on his authority. In the midst of this family
distrust, Ellen and her midnight confederate, the
naturalist
,
took their usual places among the children,
without awakening suspicion or exciting comment.
The only apparent fruits of the adventure in which
they had been engaged, were occasional upliftings of
the eyes, on the part of the Doctor, which were
mistaken by the observers for some of his scientific
contemplations of the heavens, but which, in reality,
were no other than furtive glances at the fluttering
walls of the proscribed tent.
At length the squatter, who had waited in vain for
some more decided manifestation of the expected
rising among his sons, resolved to make a
demonstration
of his own intentions.
Asa shall account to me for this undutiful
conduct
!
he coolly observed. Here has the live-long
night gone by, and he out-lying on the prairie, when
his hand and his rifle might both have been wanted
in a brush with the Siouxes, for any right he had to
know the contrary.
Spare your breath, good man; retorted his
wife, be saving of your breath; for you may have
to call long enough for the boy before he will
answer
!
It ar' a fact, that some men be so womanish, as
to let the young master the old! But, you, old
Esther
,
should know better than to think such will ever
be the nature of things in the family of Ishmael
Bush.
Ah! you are a hectorer with the boys, when
need calls! I know it well, Ishmael; and one of
your sons have you driven from you, by your
temper
;
and that, too, at a time when he is most
wanted.
Father, said Abner, whose sluggish nature had
gradually been stimulating itself to the exertion of
taking so bold a stand, the boys and I have pretty
generally concluded to go out on the search of Asa.
We are disagreeable about his 'camping on the
prairie
,
instead of coming in to his own bed, as we all
know he would like to do
Pshaw! muttered Abiram; the boy has killed
a buck; or perhaps a buffaloe; and he is sleeping
by the carcass to keep off the wolves, till day; we
shall soon see him, or hear him bawling for help to
bring in his load.
'Tis little help that a son of mine will call for,
to shoulder a buck or to quarter your wild-beef!
returned the mother, And you, Abiram, to say
such an uncertain thing! you, who said yourself that
the red-skins had been prowling around this place no
later than the yesterday
I! exclaimed her brother, hastily, as if anxious
to retract an error; I said it then, and I say it now;
and so you will find it to be. The Tetons are in our
neighbourhood, and happy will it prove for the boy
if he is well shut of them.
It seems to me, said Dr. Battius, speaking with
the sort of deliberation and dignity one is apt to use
after having thoroughly ripened his opinions by
sufficient
reflection, it seems to me, a man but little
skilled
in the signs and tokens of Indian warfare,
especially
as practised in these remote plains, but one, who I
may say without vanity has some insight into the
mysteries of natureit seems, then, to me, thus
humbly
qualified, that when doubts exist in a matter of
such moment, it would always be the wisest course
to appease them.
No more of your doctoring for me! cried the
grum Esther; no more of your quiddities in a
healthy family, say I! Here was I doing well, only
a little out of sorts with over instructing the young,
and you dos'd me with a drug that still hangs about
my tongue, like a pound weight on a humming-bird's
wing?
Is the medicine out? drily demanded Ishmael:
it must be a rare doser that, if it gives a heavy feel
to the tongue of old Eester!
Friend, continued the Doctor, waving his hand
for the angry wife to maintain the peace, that it
cannot perform all that is said of it, the very charge
of good Mrs. Bush is a sufficient proof. But to speak
of the absent Asa. There is doubt as to his fate,
and there is a proposition to solve it. Now, in the
natural sciences truth is always a desideratum; and
I confess it would seem to be equally so in the
present
case, which may be called a vacuum where,
according
to the laws of physic, there should exist some
pretty palpable proofs of materiality.
Dont mind him, dont mind him, cried Esther,
observing that the rest of his auditors listened with
an attention, which might proceed, equally, from
acquiescence
in his proposal or ignorance of its
meaning
.
There is a drug in every word he utters.
Dr. Battius wishes to say, Ellen modestly
interposed
,
that as some of us think Asa is in danger,
and some think otherwise, the whole family might
pass an hour or two in looking for him.
Does he? interrupted the woman, then Dr.
Battius has more sense in him that I believed! She
is right, Ishmael; and what she says, shall be done.
I will shoulder a rifle myself; and woe betide the
red-skin that crosses my path! I have pulled a
trigger
before to-day; ay, and heard an Indian yell, too,
to my sorrow.
The spirit of Esther diffused itself, like the
stimulus
which attends a victorious war-cry, among her
indolent sons. They arose in a body, and declared
their determination to second so bold a resolution.
Ishmael prudently yielded to an impulse he could
not resist, and in a few minutes the woman appeared,
shouldering her arms, prepared to lead forth, in
person
,
such of her descendants as chose to follow in
her train.
Let them stay with the children that please,
she said, and them follow me, who ar' not
chicken-hearted
!
Abiram, it will not do to leave the huts without
some guard, Ishmael whispered, glancing his eye
upward.
The man whom he addressed started, and
betrayed
extraordinary eagerness in his reply.
I will tarry and watch the camp.
A dozen voices were instantly raised in objections
to this proposal. He was wanted to point out the
places where the hostile tracks had been seen, and
his termagant sister openly scouted at the idea, as
unworthy of his manhood. The reluctant Abiram
was compelled to yield, and Ishmael made a new
disposition
for the defence of the place; which was
admitted
,
by every one, to be all-important to their
security and comfort.
He offered the post of commandant to Dr.
Battius
,
who, however, peremptorily and somewhat
haughtily, declined the doubtful honour; exchanging
looks of singular intelligence with Ellen, as he did
so. In this dilemma the squatter was obliged to
constitute the girl herself castellain; taking care,
however, in deputing this important trust, to omit no
words of caution and instruction. When this
preliminary
point was settled, the young men proceeded
to arrange certain means of defence, and signals of
alarm, that were adapted to the weakness and
character
of the garrison. Several masses of rock were
drawn to the edge of the upper level, and so placed
as to leave it at the discretion of the feeble Ellen
and her associates, to cast them or not, as they might
choose, on the heads of any invaders, who would, of
necessity, be obliged to mount the eminence by the
difficult and narrow passage already so often
mentioned
.
In addition to this formidable obstruction,
the barriers were strengthened and rendered nearly
impassable. Smaller missiles, that might be hurled
even by the hands of the younger children, but
which would prove, from the elevation of the place,
exceedingly dangerous, were provided in profusion.
A pile of dried leaves and splinters were placed, as a
beacon, on the upper rock, and then, even in the
jealous judgment of the squatter, the post was
deemed
competent to maintain a creditable siege.
The moment the rock was thought to be in a state
of sufficient security, the party who composed what
might be called the sortie, sallied forth on their
anxious
expedition. The advance was led by Esther in
person, who, attired in a dress half masculine, and
bearing a weapon like the rest, seemed no unfit
leader
for the groupe of wildly clad frontier-men, that
followed leisurely in her rear.
Now, Abiram! cried the Amazon, in a voice
that was cracked and harsh, for the simple reason of
being used too often on a strained and unnatural key,
Now, Abiram, run with your nose low; show
yourself
a hound of the true breed, and do some credit
to your training. You it was that saw the prints of
the Indian moccasin, and it behoves you, to let others
be as wise as yourself. Come; come to the front,
man; and give us a bold lead.
The brother, who appeared at all times to stand
in salutary awe of his sister's authority, complied;
though it was with a reluctance so evident, as to
excite
sneers, even among the unobservant and indolent
sons of the squatter. Ishmael, himself, moved among
his tall children, like one who expected nothing from
the search, and who was indifferent alike to its
success
or failure. In this manner the party proceeded
until their distant fortress had sunk so low, as to
present
an object no larger nor more distinct than a
hazy point, on the margin of the prairie. Hitherto
their progress had been silent and somewhat rapid,
for as swell after swell was mounted and passed,
without varying, or discovering a living object to
enliven
the monotony of the view, even the tongue of
Esther was hushed in increasing anxiety. Here,
however, Ishmael chose to pause, and casting the
butt of his rifle from his shoulder to the ground, he
observed
This is enough. Buffaloe signs, and deer signs,
ar' plenty; but where ar' the Indian footsteps that
you have seen, Abiram?
Still farther to the west, returned the other,
pointing in the direction he named. This was the
spot, where I struck the tracks of the buck, I killed;
it was after I took the deer, that I fell upon the
Teton trail.
And a bloody piece of work you made of it,
man; cried the squatter, pointing tauntingly to the
soiled garments of his kinsman, and then directing
the attention of the spectators to his own, by the
way of a triumphant contrast. Here have I cut
the throat of two lively does, and a scampering fawn,
without spot or stain; while you, blundering dog as
you ar', you have made as much work for Eester and
her girls, as though butchering was your regular
calling
.
Come boys; I say it is enough. I am too old
not to know the signs of the frontiers, and no Indian
has been here, since the last fall of water. Follow
me; and I will make a turn that shall give us at least
the beef of a fallow cow for our trouble.
Follow
me!
echoed Esther, stepping
undauntedly
forward. I am leader to-day, and I
will
be
followed. For who so proper, let me know, as a
mother, to head a search for her lost child?
Ishmael regarded his intractable mate with a smile
of indulgent pity. Observing that she had already
struck out a path for herself, different both from that
of Abiram and the one he had seen fit to choose, and
being unwilling to draw the cord of authority too
tight, just at that moment, he again sullenly
submitted
to her will. But Dr. Battius, who had hitherto
been a silent and thoughtful attendant on the woman,
now saw fit to raise his feeble voice in the way of
remonstrance.
I agree with thy partner in life, worthy and
gentle
Mrs. Bush, he said, in believing that some ignis
fatuus of the imagination has deceived Abiram, in
the signs or symptoms of which he has spoken.
Symptoms, yourself! interrupted the termagant.
This is no time for bookish words, nor is this a
place to stop and swallow medicines. If you are
a-leg-weary, say so, as a plain-speaking man should;
then seat yourself on the prairie, like a hound that
is foot-sore, and take your natural rest.
I accord in the opinion, the naturalist calmly
replied, complying, literally, with the opinion of the
deriding Esther, by taking his seat, very coolly, by
the side of an indigenous shrub; the examination of
which he commenced, on the instant, in order that
science might not lose any of its just and important
Vol. I. Q
dues. I honour your excellent advice, Mistress
Esther, as you may perceive. Go thou in quest of
thy offspring; while I tarry here, in pursuit of that
which is better; viz. an insight into the arcana of
nature's volume.
The woman answered with a hollow, unnatural,
and scornful laugh, and even her heavy sons, as they
slowly passed the seat of the already abstracted
naturalist
,
did not disdain to manifest their contempt in
significant smiles. In a few minutes the train had
mounted the nearest eminence, and, as it turned the
rounded acclivity, the Doctor was left to pursue his
profitable investigations in entire solitude.
Another half-hour passed, during which Esther
continued to advance, on her seemingly fruitless
search. Her pauses, however, were becoming
frequent
,
and her looks wandering and uncertain, when
footsteps were heard clattering through the bottom,
and at the next instant a buck was seen to bound up
the ascent, and to dart from before their eyes, in the
direction of the naturalist. So sudden and unlooked
for had been the passage of the animal, and so much
had he been favoured by the shape of the ground,
that before any one of the foresters had time to bring
his rifle to his shoulder, it was already far beyond the
range of a bullet.
Look out for the wolf! shouted Abner, shaking
his head in vexation, at being a single moment too
late. A wolf's skin will be no bad gift in a
winter's
night; ay, yonder the hungry devil comes!
Hold! cried Ishmael, knocking up the levelled
weapon of his too eager son.  'Tis not a wolf; but
a hound of thorough blood and bottom. Ha! we
have hunters nigh: there ar' two of them!
He was still speaking when the animals in question
came leaping on the track of the deer, striving with
noble ardour to outdo each other. One was an aged
dog, whose strength seemed to be sustained purely
by his generous emulation, and the other a pup, that
gambolled even while he pressed most warmly on
the chase. They both ran, however, with clean and
powerful leaps, carrying their noses high, like animals
of the most keen and subtle scent. They had
passed
;
and in another minute they would have been
running open-mouthed with the deer in view, had
not the younger dog suddenly bounded from the
course and uttered a cry of surprise. His aged
companion
stopped also, and returned panting and
exhausted
to the place, where the other was whirling
around in swift, and apparently in mad evolutions,
circling the spot in his own footsteps, and continuing
his outcry, in a short, snappish barking. But, when
the elder hound had reached the spot, he seated
himself
,
and lifting his nose high into the air, he raised a
long, loud, and wailing howl.
It must be a strong scent, said Abner, who had
been, with the rest of the family, an admiring
observer
of the movements of the dogs, that can break
off two such creaturs' so suddenly from their trail.
Murder them! cried Abiram; I'll swear to
the old hound; 'tis the dog of the trapper, whom we
now know to be our mortal enemy.
Though the brother of Esther gave such hostile
advice, he appeared in no way ready to put it in
execution
himself. The surprise, which had taken
possession
of the whole party, exhibited itself in his
own vacant, wondering stare, as strongly as in any of
the admiring visages by whom he was surrounded.
His denunciation, therefore, notwithstanding its dire
import, was disregarded; and the dogs were left to
obey the impulses of their mysterious instinct,
without
let or hindrance.
It was long before any of the spectators broke the
silence; but the squatter, at length, so far recollected
his authority, as to take on himself the right to
control
the movements of his children.
Come away, boys; come away, and leave the
hounds to sing their tunes for their own amusement,
Ishmael said, in his coldest manner. I scorn to
take the life of a beast, because its master has pitch'd
himself too nigh my clearing; come away, boys,
come away; we have enough of our own work
before
us, without turning aside to do that of the whole
neighbourhood.
Come
not
away! cried Esther, in tones that
sounded like the admonitions of some Sybil. I say,
come
not
away, my children. There is a meaning
and a warning in this; and as I am a woman and a
mother, will I know the truth of it all!
So saying, the awakened wife of the squatter
brandished her weapon, with an air that was not
without
its wild and secret influence, and led the way
towards the spot where the dogs still remained, filling
the air with their long-drawn and piteous complaints.
The whole party followed in her steps, some too
indolent
to oppose, others obedient to her will, and all
more or less excited by the uncommon character of
the scene.
Tell me, you AbnerAbiramIshmael! the
woman cried, standing over a spot where the earth
was trampled and beaten, and plainly sprinkled with
blood; tell me, you who ar' hunters! what sort of
animal has here met his death? Speak! Ye ar' men,
and used to the signs of the plains, all of ye; is it
the blood of wolf or panther?
A buffaloeand a noble and powerful creatur'
has it been! returned the squatter, who looked down
calmly on the fatal signs which so strangely affected
his wife. Here are the marks of the spot where
he has struck his hoofs into the earth, in the
death-struggle
;
and yonder he has plunged and torn the
ground with his horns. Ay, a buffaloe bull of
wonderful
strength and courage has he been!
And who has slain him? continued Esther,
man! where, then, are the offals? Wolves! They
devour not the hide! Tell me, ye men and hunters,
is this the blood of a beast?
The creatur' has plunged over the hillock, said
Abner, who had proceeded a short distance beyond
the rest of the party. Ah! there you will find it,
in yon swale of alders. Look! a thousand carrion
birds, ar' hovering, this very moment, above the
carcass
.
The animal has still life in him, returned the
squatter, or the buzzards would settle upon their
prey! By the action of the dogs it must be
something
ravenous; I reckon it is the white bear from
the upper falls. They are said to cling desperately
to life!
Ay, let us go back, said Abiram; there may
be danger, and there can be no good in attacking a
ravenous beast. Remember, Ishmael, 'twill be a risky
job, and one of small profit!
The young men smiled at this new proof of the
well known pusillanimity of their too sensitive uncle.
The oldest even proceeded so far as to express his
contempt, by bluntly saying
It will do to cage with the other animal we carry;
then we may go back double-handed into the
settlements
,
and set up for showmen, around the
court-houses
and gaols of Kentucky.
The dark, threatening frown, which gathered on
the brow of his father, admonished the young man
to forbear. Exchanging looks that were half
rebellious
with his brethren, he saw fit to be silent. But
instead of observing the caution recommended by
Abiram, they proceeded in a body, until they again
came to a halt within a few yards of the matted
cover of the thicket.
The scene had now, indeed, become wild and
striking enough to have produced a powerful effect
on minds better prepared, than those of the
unnurtured
Q 2
family of the squatter, to resist the impressions
of such an exciting spectacle. The heavens were,
as usual at the season, covered with dark, driving
clouds, beneath which interminable flocks of aquatic
birds were again on the wing, holding their toilsome
and heavy way towards the distant waters of the
south. The wind had risen, and was once more
sweeping over the prairie in gusts, which it was often
vain to oppose; and then again the blasts would seem
to mount into the upper air, as if to sport with the
drifting vapour, whirling and rolling vast masses of
the dusky and ragged volumes over each other, in a
terrific and yet grand disorder. Above the little
brake, the flocks of birds still held their flight,
circling
with heavy wings about the spot, struggling at
times against the torrent of wind, and then favoured
by their position and height, making bold swoops
upon the thicket, away from which, however, they
never failed to sail, screaming in terror, as if
apprised
,
either by sight or instinct, that the hour of their
voracious dominion had not yet fully arrived.
Ishmael stood for many minutes, with his wife and
children clustered together, in an amazement, with
which awe was singularly mingled, gazing in
death-like
stillness on the imposing sight. The voice of
Esther at length broke the charm, and reminded the
spectators of the necessity of resolving their doubts
in some manner more worthy of their manhood, than
by a dull and inactive observation.
Call in the dogs! she said; call in the hounds,
and put them into the thicket; there ar' men enough
of ye, if ye have not lost the spirit with which I
know ye were born, to tame the tempers of all the
bears west of the big river. Call in the dogs, I say,
you Enoch! Abner! Gabriel! has wonder made ye
deaf as well as dumb?
One of the young men complied; and having
succeeded
in detaching the hounds from the place,
around which, until then, they had not ceased to
hover, he led them down to the margin of the thicket.
Put them in, boy; put them in, continued the
woman; and you, Ishmael and Abiram, if anything
wicked or hurtful comes forth, show them the use of
your rifles, like frontier-men. If ye ar' wanting in
spirit, before the eyes of my children will I put ye
both to shame!
The youths who, until now, had detained the
hounds, let slip the thongs of skin, by which they had
been held, and urged them to the attack by their
voices. But, it would seem, that the elder dog was
restrained by some extraordinary sensation, or that
he was much too experienced to attempt the rash
adventure
.
After proceeding a few yards to the very
verge of the brake, he made a sudden pause, and
stood trembling in all his aged limbs, apparently as
unable to recede as to advance. The encouraging
calls of the young men were disregarded, or only
answered by a low and plaintive whining. For a
minute the pup also was similarly affected; but less
sage, or more easily excited, he was induced at length
to leap forward, and finally to dash into the cover.
An alarmed and startling howl was heard, and, at the
next minute, he broke out of the thicket, and
commenced
circling the spot, in the same wild and
unsteady
manner as before.
Have I a man among my children! demanded
the aroused Esther. Give me a truer piece than a
childish shot-gun, and I will show ye what the
courage
of a frontier-woman can do.
Stay mother, exclaimed Abner and Enoch;
if you
will
see the creatur', let
us
drive it into
view.
This was quite as much as the youths were
accustomed
to utter, even on more important occasions,
but having thus given a pledge of their intentions,
they were far from being backward in redeeming it.
Preparing their arms with the utmost care, they
advanced
with steadiness to the brake. Nerves less
often tried than those of the young borderers might
easily have shrunk before the dangers of so
uncertain
an undertaking. As they proceeded, the howls
of the dogs became more shrill and plaintive. The
vultures and buzzards settled so low as to flap the
bushes with their heavy wings, and the wind came
hoarsely sweeping along the naked prairie, as if the
spirits of the air had also descended to witness the
approaching development.
There was a breathless moment when the blood
of the usually undaunted Esther flowed backward to
her heart, as she saw her sons push aside the matted
branches of the thicket and bury themselves in its
labyrinth. A deep and solemn pause succeeded.
Then arose two loud and piercing cries, in quick
succession
,
which were followed by a quiet still more
awful and appalling.
Come back, come back, my children! cried the
woman, the feelings of a mother getting the entire
ascendancy in her bosom.
But her voice was hushed, and every faculty
seemed
frozen with horror, as at that instant the bushes
once more parted, and the two adventurers
re-appeared
,
pale, and nearly insensible themselves, and
laid at her feet the stiff and motionless body of the
lost Asa, with the marks of a violent death but too
plainly stamped on every pallid lineament.
The dogs uttered a long and closing howl, and
then breaking off together, they disappeared on the
forsaken trail of the deer. The flight of birds wheeled
upward into the heavens, filling the air with their
complaints at having been robbed of a victim which,
frightful and disgusting as it was, still bore too much
of the impression of humanity to become the prey
of their obscene appetites.
CHAPTER XIII.
A pickaxe, and a spade, a spade,
For,and a shrouding sheet:
O, a pit of clay for to be made
For such a guest is meet.
Song in Hamlet
.
Stand
back! stand off, the whole of ye! said
Esther hoarsely to the crowd, which pressed too
closely on the corpse; I am his mother, and my
right is better than that of ye all! Who has done
this! Tell me, Ishmael, Abiram, Abner! open your
mouths and your hearts, and let God's truth and no
other issue from them. Who has done this bloody
deed?
Her husband made no reply, but stood, leaning on
his rifle, looking sadly, but with an unaltered eye, at
the mangled remains of his son. Not so the mother,
she threw herself on the earth, and receiving the
cold and ghastly head of the dead man into her lap,
she sat many minutes contemplating those muscular
features, on which the death-agony was still horridly
impressed, in a silence even more expressive than
any language of lamentation could possibly have
proved.
The voice of the woman was literally frozen in
grief. In vain Ishmael attempted a few words of
rude consolation; she neither listened nor answered.
Her sons gathered about her in a circle, and
expressed
,
after their uncouth manner, their sympathy in
her sorrow, as well as their sense of their own loss,
but she motioned them away, impatiently, with her
hand. At times her fingers played in the matted hair
of the dead, and at others they lightly attempted to
smooth the painfully expressive muscles of its
ghastly
visage, as the hand of the mother is often seen to
linger fondly about the features of her sleeping child.
Then starting from their revolting office, her hands
would flutter around her, and seem to seek some
fruitless remedy against the violent blow, which had
thus suddenly destroyed the child in whom she had
not only placed her greatest hopes, but so much of
her maternal pride. It was while engaged in the
latter
incomprehensible manner, that the lethargic
Abner
turned aside, and swallowing the unwonted
emotions
which were rising in his own throat, he
observed
Mother means that we should look for the signs,
that we may know in what manner Asa has come by
his end.
We owe it to the accursed Siouxes! answered
Ishmael; Twice have they put me deeply in their
debt! The third time, the score shall be cleared!
But, as if not content with this plausible
explanation
,
and, perhaps, secretly glad to avert their eyes
from a spectacle which awakened such extraordinary
and unusual sensations in their sluggish bosoms, the
sons of the squatter turned away in a body from
their mother and the corpse, and proceeded to make
the inquiries which they fancied the former had so
repeatedly demanded. Ishmael made no objections;
but, though he accompanied his children while they
proceeded in the investigation, it was more with the
appearance of complying with their wishes, at a time
when resistance might not be seemly, than with any
visible interest in the result. As the borderers,
notwithstanding
their usual dullness, were well
instructed
in most things connected with their habits of life,
an inquiry, the success of which depended so much
on signs and evidences that bore so strong a
resemblance
to a forest trail, was likely to be conducted
with skill and acuteness. Accordingly, they
proceeded
to the melancholy task with great readiness and
intelligence.
Abner and Enoch agreed in their accounts as to
the position in which they had found the body. It
was seated nearly upright, the back supported by a
mass of matted brush, and one hand still grasping a
broken twig of the alders. It was most probably
owing to the former circumstance that the body had
escaped the rapacity of the carrion birds, which had
been seen hovering above the thicket, and the latter
proved that life had not yet entirely abandoned the
hapless victim when he entered the brake. The
opinion now became general, that the youth had
received
his death-wound in the open prairie, and had
dragged his enfeebled form into the cover of the
thicket for the purpose of concealment. A trail
through the bushes confirmed this opinion. It also
appeared, on examination, that a desperate struggle
had taken place on the very margin of the thicket.
This was sufficiently apparent by the trodden
branches
,
the deep impressions on the moist ground, and the
lavish flow of blood.
He has been shot in the open ground and come
here for a cover, said Abiram; these marks would
clearly prove it. The boy has been set upon by the
savages in a body, and has fou't like a hero as he was,
until they have mastered his strength and then drawn
him to the bushes.
To this probable opinion there was now but one
dissenting voice, that of the slow-minded Ishmael,
who demanded that the corpse itself should be
examined
in order to a more accurate knowledge of its
injuries. On examination, it appeared that a rifle
bullet had passed directly through the body of the
deceased, entering beneath one of his brawny
shoulders
,
and making its exit by the breast. It required
some knowledge in gun-shot wounds to decide this
delicate point, but the experience of the borderers
was quite equal to the scrutiny; and a smile of wild,
and certainly of singular satisfaction, passed among
the sons of Ishmael, when Abner confidently
announced
that the enemies of Asa had assailed him in
the rear.
It must be so, said the gloomy but attentive
squatter. He was of too good a stock and too well
trained, knowingly to turn the weak side to man or
beast! Remember, boys, that while the front of
manhood is to your enemy, let him be who or what
he may, you ar' safe from cowardly surprise.Why
Eester, woman! you ar' getting beside yourself; with
picking at the hair and the garments of the child!
Little good can you do him now, old girl.
See! interrupted Enoch, extricating from the
fragments of cloth the morsel of lead which had
prostrated the strength of one so powerful, Here is
the very bullet.
Ishmael took it in his hand and eyed it long and
closely.
There's no mistake; at length he muttered
through his compressed teeth. It is from the pouch
of that accursed trapper. Like many of the hunters
he has a mark in his mould, in order to know the
work his rifle performs; and here you see it plainly
six little holes, laid crossways.
I'll swear to it! cried Abiram, triumphantly.
He shew'd me his private mark, himself, and
boasted
of the number of deer he had laid upon the
prairies
with these very bullets! Now, Ishmael, will you
believe me when I tell you the old knave is a spy of
the red-skins!
The lead passed from the hand of one to that of
another; and unfortunately for the reputation of the
old man, several among them remembered also to
have seen the aforesaid private bullet-marks, during
the curious examination which all had made of his
accoutrements. In addition to this wound, however,
were many others of a less dangerous nature, all of
which were supposed to confirm the supposed guilt
of the trapper.
The traces of many different struggles were to be
seen, between the spot where the first blood was spilt
and the thicket to which it was now generally
believed
Asa had retreated, as a place of refuge. These
were interpreted into so many proofs of the
weakness
of the murderer, who would have sooner
despatched
his victim, had not even the dying strength
of the youth rendered him formidable to the
infirmities
of one so old. The danger of drawing some
others of the hunters to the spot, by repeated
firing, was deemed a sufficient reason for not again
resorting to the rifle, after it had performed the
important
duty of disabling the victim. The weapon
of the dead man was not to be found, and had
doubtless
,
together with many other less valuable and
lighter articles, that he was accustomed to carry
about his person, become a prize to his destroyer.
But what, in addition to the tell-tale bullet,
appeared
to fix the ruthless deed with peculiar
certainty
on the trapper, was the accumulated evidence
furnished
by the trail; which proved, notwithstanding
his deadly hurt, that the wounded man had still been
able to make a long and desperate resistance to the
subsequent efforts of his murderer. Ishmael seemed
to press this proof with a singular mixture of sorrow
and pride: sorrow, at the loss of a son, whom in
their moments of amity he highly valued; and pride,
at the courage and power he had manifested to his
last and weakest breath.
He died as a son of mine should die, said the
squatter, gleaning a hollow consolation from so
unnatural
an exultation; a dread to his enemy to the
last, and without help from the law! Come,
children
;
we have first the grave to make, and then to
hunt his murderer.
Vol. I. R
The sons of the squatter set about their
melancholy
office, in silence and in sadness. An excavation
was made in the hard earth, at a great expense of
toil and time, and the body was wrapped in such
spare vestments as could be collected among the
labourers
.
When these arrangements were completed,
Ishmael approached the seemingly unconscious
Esther
,
and announced his intention to inter the dead.
She heard him, and quietly relinquished her grasp of
the corpse, rising in silence to follow it to its narrow
resting place. Here she seated herself again at the
head of the grave, watching each movement of the
youths with eager and jealous eyes. When a
sufficiency
of earth was laid upon the senseless clay of
Asa, to protect it from injury, Enoch and Abner
entered
the cavity, and trode it into a solid mass, by
the weight of their huge frames, with an appearance
of a strange, not to say savage, mixture of care and
indifference. This well-known precaution was
adopted
to prevent the speedy exhumation of the body by
some of the carnivorous beasts of the prairie, whose
instinct was sure to guide them to the spot. Even
the rapacious birds appeared to comprehend the
nature
of the ceremony, for, mysteriously apprised that
the miserable victim was now about to be abandoned
by the human race, they once more began to make
their airy circuits above the place, screaming, as if to
frighten the kinsmen from their labour of caution and
love.
Ishmael stood, with folded arms, steadily watching
the manner in which this necessary duty was
performed
,
and when the whole was completed, he lifted
his cap to his sons, to thank them for their services,
with a dignity that would have become one much
better nurtured. Throughout the whole of a
ceremony
,
which is ever solemn and admonitory, the
squatter had maintained a grave and serious
deportment
.
His vast features were visibly stamped with
an expression of deep concern; but at no time did
they falter, until he turned his back, as he believed
for ever, on the grave of his first-born. Nature was
then stirring powerfully within him, and the muscles
of his stern visage began to work perceptibly. His
children fastened their eyes on his, as if to seek a
direction to the strange emotions which were moving
their own heavy natures, when the struggle in the
bosom of the squatter suddenly ceased, and, taking
his wife by the arm, he raised her to her feet as
though she had been an infant, saying, in a voice
that was perfectly steady, though a nice observer
would have discovered that it was kinder than
usual
Eester, we have now done all that man and
woman can do. We raised the boy, and made him
such as few others were like, on the frontiers of
America; and we have given him a grave. Let us
go.
The woman turned her eyes slowly from the fresh
earth, and laying her hands on the shoulders of her
husband, stood looking him anxiously in the eyes for
many moments, before she uttered in a voice, deep,
frightful, and nearly choked
Ishmael! Ishmael! you parted from the boy in
your wrath!
May the Lord pardon his sins freely as I have
forgiven his worst misdeeds, calmly returned the
squatter, woman, go you back to the rock and read
in your bible; a chapter in that book always does
you good. You
can
read, Eester; which is a
privilege
I never did enjoy.
Yes, yes, muttered the woman, yielding to his
strength, and suffering herself to be led, though with
powerful reluctance, from the spot. I
can
read;
and how have I used the knowledge! But he,
Ishmael
,
he has not the sin of wasted l'arning to answer
for. We have spared him
that,
at least! whether it
be in mercy, or in cruelty, I know not.
Her husband made no reply, but continued steadily
to lead her in the direction of their temporary abode.
When they reached the summit of the swell of land,
which they knew was the last spot from which the
situation of the grave of Asa could be seen, they all
turned, as by common concurrence, to take a
farewell
view of the place. The little mound itself was
not visible; but it was frightfully indicated by the
flock of screaming birds which hovered above it. In
the opposite direction a low, blue hillock, in the
skirts of the horizon, pointed out the place where
Esther had left the rest of her young, and served as
an attraction to draw her reluctant steps from the
last abode of her eldest son. Nature quickened in
the bosom of the mother at the sight, and she finally
yielded the rights of the dead, to the more urgent
claims of the living.
The foregoing occurrences had struck a spark
from the stern tempers of a set of beings so
singularly
moulded in the habits of their uncultivated
lives, which served to keep alive among them the
dying
embers of family affection. United to their
parents
by ties no stronger than those which use had
created, there had been great danger, as Ishmael had
foreseen, that the overloaded hive would quickly
swarm, and leave him saddled with the difficulties of
a young and helpless brood, unsupported by the
exertions
of those, whom he had already brought to a state
of maturity. The spirit of insubordination, which
emanated from the unfortunate Asa, had spread among
his juniors, and the squatter had been made painfully
to remember the time when, in the wantonness of
his youth and vigour, he had, reversing the order of
the brutes, cast off his own aged and failing parents,
to enter into the world unshackled and free. But
the danger had now abated, for a time at least; and
if his authority was not restored with all its former
influence, it was visibly admitted to exist, and to
maintain its ascendancy a little longer.
It is true that his slow-minded sons, even while
they submitted to the impressions of the recent
event, had glimmerings of terrible distrusts, as to the
manner in which their elder brother had met with his
death. There were faint and indistinct images in the
minds of two or three of the oldest, which
pourtrayed
the father himself, as ready to imitate the
example
of Abraham, without the justification of the
sacred authority which commanded the holy man to
attempt the revolting office. But then, these images
were so transient and so much obscured in
intellectual
mists, as to leave no very strong impressions, and
the tendency of the whole transaction, as we have
already said, was rather to strengthen than to
weaken
the authority of Ishmael.
In this disposition of mind, the party continued
their route towards the place whence they had that
morning issued on a search which had been crowned
with so melancholy a success. The long and
fruitless
march which they had made under the direction
of Abiram, the discovery of the body and its
subsequent
interment, had so far consumed the day, that
by the time their steps were retraced across the
broad tract of waste which lay between the grave
of Asa and the rock, the sun had fallen far below his
meridian altitude. The hill had gradually risen as
they approached, like some tower emerging from
the bosom of the sea, and when within a mile, the
minuter objects that crowned its height came dimly
into view.
It will be a sad meeting for the girls! said
Ishmael
,
who, from time to time, did not cease to utter
something which he intended should be consolatory
to the bruised spirit of his stricken partner. Asa
R 2
was much regarded by all the young; and seldom
failed to bring in from his hunts something that they
loved.
He did; he did; murmured Esther; the boy
was the pride of the family.My other children are
as nothing to him!
Say not so, good woman, returned the father,
glancing his eye a little proudly at the athletic train
which followed, at no great distance, in the rear.
Say not so, old Eester; for few fathers and mothers
have greater reason to be boastful than ourselves.
Thankful, thankful, muttered the humbled
woman
,
ye mean thankful; Ishmael!
Then thankful let it be, if you like the word
better
,
my good girl,but what has become of Nelly
and the young! The child has forgotten the charge
I gave her, and has not only suffered the children to
sleep, but, I warrant you, is dreaming of the fields
of Tennessee at this very moment. The mind of
your niece is mainly fixed on the settlements, I
reckon.
Ay, she is not for us; I said it, and thought it,
when I took her, because death had stripped her of
all other friends. Death is a sad worker in the
bosom of families, Ishmael! Asa had a kind
feeling
to the child, and they might have come one day
into our places, had things been so ordered.
Nay, she is not gifted for a frontier wife, if this
is the manner she is to keep house while the husband
is on the hunt. Abner, let off your rifle, that they
may know we ar' coming. I fear Nelly and the
young ar' asleep.
The young man complied with an alacrity that
manifested how gladly he would see the rounded,
active
figure of Ellen, enlivening the ragged summit of
the rock. But the report was succeeded neither by
signal nor answer of any sort. For a moment, the
whole party stood in suspense, awaiting the result,
and then a simultaneous impulse caused the whole
to let off their pieces at the same instant, producing
a noise which might not fail to reach the ears of all
within so short a distance.
Ah! there they come at last! cried Abiram,
who was usually among the first to seize on any
circumstance
which promised relief from disagreeable
apprehensions.
It is a petticoat fluttering on the line, said
Esther
,
I put it there myself.
You ar' right; but now she comes; the jade has
been taking her comfort in the tent!
It is not so, said Ishmael, whose usually
inflexible
features were beginning to manifest the
uneasiness
he violently felt. It is the tent itself blowing
about loosely in the wind. They have loosened the
bottom, like silly children as they ar', and unless care
s had, the whole will come down!
The words were scarcely uttered before a hoarse,
rushing blast of wind, swept by the spot where they
stood, raising the dust into little eddies, in its
progress
;
and then, as if guided by a master hand, it
quitted the earth, and mounted in its progress to the
precise spot, on which all eyes were just then
riveted
.
The loosened linen felt its influence and
tottered
;
but regained its poise, and, for a moment, it
became
tranquil. The cloud of leaves next played in
circling revolutions around the place, and then
descended
with the velocity of a swooping hawk, and
sailed away into the prairie in long straight lines,
like a flight of swallows resting on their expanded
wings. They were followed for some distance by the
snow-white tent, which, however, soon fell behind the
rock, leaving its highest peak as naked as when it
lay in the entire solitude of the desert.
The murderers have been here! moaned
Esther
.
My babes! my babes!
For a moment even Ishmael faltered before the
weight of such an unexpected blow. But shaking
himself, like an awakened lion, he sprang forward,
and pushing aside the impediments of the barrier, as
though they had been feathers, he rushed up the
ascent
with an impetuosity which proved how
formidable
a sluggish nature may become, when thoroughly
aroused.
CHAPTER XIV.
Whose party do the townsmen yet admit?
King John
.
In
order to preserve an even pace between the
incidents
of the tale, it becomes necessary to revert to
such events as occurred during the ward of Ellen
Wade.
For the few first hours, the cares of the honest
and warm-hearted girl were confined to the simple
offices of satisfying the often-repeated demands which
her younger associates made on her time and
patience
,
under the pretences of hunger, thirst, and all
the other ceaseless wants of captious and
inconsiderate
childhood. She had seized a moment from their
importunities to steal into the tent, where she was
administering to the comforts of one far more
deserving
of her tenderness, when an outcry, which
arose among the children she had left, recalled her
to the duties she had momentarily forgotten.
See, Nelly, see! exclaimed half a dozen eager
voices, as she re-appeared among them, yonder ar'
men; and Phbe says that they ar' Sioux-Indians!
Ellen turned her eyes in the direction in which so
many arms were already extended, and, to her
consternation
,
beheld the forms of several men, who
were advancing, manifestly and swiftly, in a straight
line towards the rock. She counted four, but was
unable to make out any thing concerning their
characters
,
except that they were not any of those who
of right were entitled to admission into the fortress.
It was a fearful moment for Ellen. Looking around,
at the juvenile and frightened flock that pressed
upon
the skirts of her garments, she endeavoured to
recall to her confused faculties some one of the
many tales of female heroism, with which the history
of the western frontier abounded. In one, a
stockade
had been successfully defended by a single man,
supported by three or four women, for days, against
the assaults of a hundred enemies. In another, the
women alone had been able to protect the children,
and less valuable effects of their absent husbands;
and a third was not wanting, in which a solitary
female
had destroyed her sleeping captors and given
liberty not only to herself, but to a brood of timid
and helpless young. This was the case most nearly
assimilated to the situation in which Ellen now found
herself; and, with flushing cheeks and kindling eyes,
the encouraged girl began to consider of, and to
prepare
her slender means of defence.
She posted the larger girls at the little levers that
were to cast the rocks on the assailants, the smaller
were to be used more for shew than any positive
service they could perform, while, like any other
leader, she was reserved in her own person, as a
superintendant and encourager of the whole. When
these dispositions were made, she endeavoured to
await the issue, with an air of composure, that she
intended should inspire her assistants with the
confidence
necessary to insure their success.
Although Ellen was vastly their superior in that
spirit which emanates from moral qualities, she was
by no means the equal of the two eldest daughters
of Esther, in the not less important military property
of insensibility to danger. Reared in all the
hardihood
of a constantly migrating life, on the skirts of
society, where they had become familiarized to the
sights and dangers of the wilderness, these girls
promised
fairly to become, at some future day, no less
distinguished
than their mother for their daring, and for
that singular mixture of good and evil, which, in a
wider sphere of action, would probably have enabled
the wife of the squatter to enrol her name among
the remarkable females of her time. Esther had
already
,
on one occasion, made good the log tenement
of Ishmael against an inroad of savages; and on
another, she had been left for dead by her enemies,
after a defence that with a more civilized foe would
have entitled her to the honours and attentions of a
liberal capitulation. These facts, and sundry others
of a similar nature, had often been recapitulated with
a suitable exultation in the presence of her
daughters
,
and the bosoms of the young Amazons were
now strangely fluctuating between natural terror and
the ambitious wish to do something that might
render
them worthy of being the children of such a
mother. It now appeared that the opportunity for
distinction, of this wild and unnatural character, was
no longer to be denied them.
The party of strangers was already within a
hundred
rods of the rock. Either consulting their usual
wary method of advancing, or admonished by the
threatening attitudes of the two figures, who had
thrust forth the barrels of as many old muskets from
behind their stone entrenchment, the new comers
halted under favour of an inequality in the ground,
where a growth of grass thicker than common
offered
them the advantage of a place of concealment.
From this spot they reconnoitred the fortress for
several
anxious, and to Ellen, apparently interminable
minutes. Then one advanced singly, and
apparently
more in the character of a herald than of an
assailant
.
Phbe,
do you
fire, and no, Hetty,
you,
were
beginning to be heard between the half-frightened
and yet eager daughters of the squatter, when Ellen
probably saved the advancing stranger from some
imminent alarm, if from no greater danger, by
exclaiming
Lay down the muskets; it is Dr. Battius!
Her subordinates complied, so far as to withdraw
their hands from the locks, though the threatening
barrels still maintained their portentous levels. The
naturalist, who had advanced with sufficient
deliberation
to note the smallest hostile demonstration made
by the garrison, now raised a white handkerchief on
the end of his own fusee, and came within speaking
distance of the fortress. Then assuming what he
intended should be an imposing and dignified
semblance
of authority, he blustered forth, in a voice
that might have been heard at a much greater
distance
What, ho! I summon ye all, in the name of the
Confederacy of the United Sovereign States of
North America, to submit yourselves to the laws.
Doctor or no Doctor; he is an enemy, Nelly;
hear him! hear him! he talks of the law.
Stop! stay till I hear his answer! said the
nearly
breathless Ellen, pushing aside the dangerous
weapons
which were again pointed in the direction of
the shrinking person of the herald.
I admonish and forewarn ye all, continued the
startled Doctor, that I am a peaceful citizen of the
before named Confederacy, a supporter of the Social
Compact, and a lover of good order and amity;
then, perceiving that the danger was, at least,
temporarily
removed, he once more raised his voice to
the hostile pitch, and continuedI charge ye all,
therefore, to submit to the laws.
I thought you were a friend, Ellen replied;
and that you travelled with my uncle, in virtue of
an agreement
It is void! I have been deceived in the very
premises, and, I hereby pronounce, a certain
compactum
entered into and concluded between Ishmael
Bush, squatter, and Obed Battius, M. D. to be
incontinently
null and of non-effect. Nay, children, to be
null is merely a negative property, and is fraught
with no evil to your worthy parent; so lay aside the
fire-arms and listen to the admonitions of reason. I
declare it viciousnullabrogated. As for thee,
Nelly, my feelings towards thee are kind, and not at
all given to hostility; therefore listen to that which I
have to utter, nor turn away thine ears in the
wantonness
of security. Thou knowest the character of
the man with whom thou dwellest, young woman,
and thou also knowest the danger of being found in
evil company. Abandon, then, the trifling advantages
of thy situation, and yield the rock peaceably to the
will of those who accompany mea legion, young
womanI do assure you an invincible and powerful
legion. Give, therefore, the effects of this lawless
and wicked squatternay, children, such disregard
of human life, is literally destroying the pleasures of
all amicable intercourse! Point those dangerous
weapons aside, I entreat of you; more for your own
sakes, than for mine. Hetty, hast thou forgotten who
appeased thine anguish, when thy auricular nerves
were tortured by the colds and damps of the naked
earth! and thou, Phbe, ungrateful and forgetful
Phbe, but for this very arm, which you would
prostrate
with an endless paralysis, thy incisores would
still be giving thee pain and sorrow! Lay, then,
aside thy weapons, and hearken to the advice of one
who has always been thy friend. And now, young
woman, still keeping a jealous eye on the musket
which the girls had suffered to be diverted a little
from their aim. And now, young woman, for the
last, and therefore the most solemn asking: I demand
of thee the surrender of this rock, without delay or
resistance, in the joint names of power, of justice
and of the law, he would have added; but
recollecting
that this ominous word would again provoke
the hostility of the squatter's children, he succeeded
in swallowing it in good season, and concluded with
the less dangerous and more convertible term of
reason.
This extraordinary summons, failed however, of
producing the desired effect. It proved utterly
unintelligible
to his younger listeners, with the exception
of the few offensive terms, already sufficiently
distinguished
,
and though Ellen better comprehended
the meaning of the herald, she appeared as little
moved by his rhetoric as her companions. At those
passages which he intended should be tender and
affecting
,
the intelligent girl, though tortured by
painfully
contending feelings, had even manifested a
disposition
to laugh, while to the threats she turned an
utterly insensible ear.
I know not the meaning of all you wish to say,
Dr. Battius, she quietly replied, when he had
ended
,
but I am sure if it would teach me to betray
my trust, it is what I ought not to hear. I caution
you to attempt no violence, for let my wishes be
what they may, you see I am surrounded by a force
that can easily put me down, and you know, or ought
to know, too well the temper of this family, to trifle
in such a matter with any of its members, let them
be of what sex or age they may.
I am not entirely ignorant of human character,
returned the naturalist, prudently receding a little
from the position, which he had, until now, stoutly
maintained at the very base of the hill. But here
comes one who may know its secret windings still
better than I.
Ellen! Ellen Wade, cried Paul Hover, who
had advanced to his elbow, without betraying any of
that sensitiveness on the subject of danger, which
Vol. I. S
had so manifestly discomposed the Doctor; I didn't
expect to find an enemy in you!
Nor shall you, when you ask that, which I can
grant without treachery and disgrace. You know
that my uncle has trusted his family to my care, and
shall I so far betray the trust as to let in his bitterest
enemies to murder his children, perhaps, and to rob
him of the little which the Indians have left?
Am I a murdereris this old manthis officer
of the States, pointing to the trapper and his newly
discovered friend, both of whom by this time stood
at his side, is either of these likely to do the things
you name?
What is it then you ask of me? said Ellen,
wringing her hands, in the pain of excessive doubt.
The beast! nothing more nor less than the
squatter's
hidden, ravenous, dangerous beast!
Excellent young woman, commenced the young
stranger, who had so lately joined himself to the
party on the prairiebut his mouth was
immediately
stopped by a significant sign from the trapper, who
whispered in his private ear
Let the lad be our spokesman. Natur'
will
work
in the bosom of the child, and we shall gain our
object
all in good time.
The whole truth is out, Ellen, Paul continued,
and we have lined the squatter into his most secret
misdoings. We have come to right the wronged and
to free the imprisoned; now, if you are the girl of a
true heart, as I have always believed, so far from
throwing straws in our way, you will join in the
general
swarming, and leave old Ishmael and his hive to
the bees of his own breed.
I have sworn a solemn oath
A compactum which is entered into through
ignorance
,
or in duresse, is null in the sight of all good
moralists,' cried the Doctor.
Hush, hush, again the trapper whispered, leave
it all to natur' and the lad!
I have sworn in the sight and by the name of
Him who is the founder and ruler of all that is good,
whether it be in morals or in religion, the agitated
Ellen continued, neither to reveal the contents of
that tent, nor to help its prisoner to escape. We are
both solemnly, terribly sworn; our lives perhaps
have been the gift we received for the promises. It
is true you are masters of the secret, but not through
any means of ours; nor do I know that I can justify
myself, for even being neutral, while you attempt to
invade the dwelling of my uncle in such a hostile
manner.
I can prove beyond the power of refutation,
the naturalist eagerly exclaimed, by Paley,
Berkeley
,
ay, even by the immortal Binkerschoek, that a
compactum, concluded while one of the parties, be
it a state or be it an individual, is in durance
You will ruffle the temper of the child, with
such abusive language, said the cautious trapper,
while the lad, if left to human feelings, will bring
her down to the meekness of a playful fawn. Ah!
you are like myself, little knowing in the natur' of
these sorts of hidden kindnesses!
Is this the only vow you have taken, Ellen!
Paul continued in a tone which, for the gay,
light-hearted
bee-hunter, sounded dolorous and
reproachful
.
Have you sworn only to this! are the words
which the squatter says, to be as honey in your
mouth, and all other promises like so much useless
comb.
The paleness, which had taken possession of the
usually cheerful countenance of Ellen, was hid in a
bright glow, that was plainly visible even at the
distance
at which she stood. She hesitated a moment,
as if struggling to repress something very like
resentment
,
before she answered with all her native spirit
I know not what right any one has to question
me about oaths and promises, which can only
concern
her who has made them, if indeed any of
the sort you mention, have ever been made, at all. I
shall hold no further discourse with one who thinks
so much of himself, and takes advice merely of his
own feelings.
Now, old trapper, do you hear that! said the
unsophisticated bee-hunter, turning abruptly to his
aged friend. The meanest insect that skims the
heavens, when it has got its load, flies straight and
honestly to its nest or hive, according to its kind;
but the ways of a woman's mind, are as knotty as a
gnarled oak, and more crooked than the windings of
the Mississippi!
Nay, nay child, said the trapper,
good-naturedly
interfering in behalf of the offending Paul, you
are to consider that youth is hasty and not overgiven
to thought. But then a promise is a promise, and
not to be thrown aside and forgotten, like the hoofs
and horns of a buffaloe.
I thank you for reminding me of my oath, said
the still resentful Ellen, biting her pretty nether lip
with vexation; I might else have proved
forgetful
!
Ah! female natur' is awakened in her, said the
old man, shaking his head in a manner to show how
much he was disappointed in the result, but it
manifests
itself against the true spirit!
Ellen! cried the young stranger, who until now,
had been an attentive listener to the parley, since
Ellen is the name by which you are known
They often add to it another. I am sometimes
called by the name of my father.
Call her Nelly Wade at once, muttered Paul;
it is her rightful name, and I care not if she keeps
it for ever!
Wade, I should have added, continued the
youth. You will acknowledge that though bound
by no oath myself, I at least have known how to
respect
those of others. You are a witness yourself
that I have foreborne to utter a single call, while I
am certain it could reach those ears it would gladden
so much. Permit me then to ascend the rock,
singly
;
I promise a perfect indemnity to your kinsman,
against any injury his effects may sustain.
Ellen seemed to hesitate, but catching a glimpse
of Paul, who stood leaning proudly on his rifle,
whistling, with an appearance of the utmost
indifference
the air of a boating song, she recovered her
recollection in time to answer:
I have been left the captain of the rock, while
my uncle and his sons hunt, and captain will I
remain
,
till he returns to receive back the charge.
This is wasting moments that will not soon
return
,
and neglecting an opportunity that may never
occur again, the young soldier gravely remarked.
The sun is beginning to fall already, and many
minutes cannot elapse before the squatter and his
savage brood will be returning to their huts.
Doctor Battius cast an anxious glance behind him,
and took up the discourse by saying
Perfection is always found in maturity, whether
it be in the animal or the intellectual world.
Reflection
is the mother of wisdom, and wisdom the parent
of success. I propose that we retire to a discreet
distance
from this impregnable position, and there hold
a convocation or council to deliberate on what
manner
we may sit down regularly before the place, or
perhaps by postponing the siege to another season
gain the aid of auxiliaries from the inhabited
countries
,
and thus secure the dignity of the laws from
any danger of a repulse.
A storm would be better, the soldier smilingly
answered, measuring the height and scanning all its
S 2
difficulties with a deliberate eye; 'twould be but a
broken arm or a bruised head at the most.
Then have at it! shouted the impetuous
bee-hunter
,
making a spring that at once put him out of
danger from a shot, by carrying him beneath the
projecting
ledge on which the garrison was posted;
now do your worst, young devils of a wicked breed;
you have but a moment to work all your mischief
in!
Paul! rash Paul! shrieked Ellen, another
step and the rocks will crush you! they hang but by
a thread, and these girls are ready and willing to let
them fall!
Then drive the accursed swarm from the hive,
for scale the rock I will, though I find it covered
with hornets.
Let her if she dare! tauntingly cried the eldest
of the girls, brandishing a musket with a mien and
resolution that would have done credit to her
Amazonian
damI know you, Nelly Wade; you are
with the lawyers in your heart, and if you come a
foot nigher, you shall have frontier punishment. Put
in another pry, girls; in with it. I should like to see
the man of them all that dare come up into the
camp of Ishmael Bush, without asking leave of his
children!
Stir not, Paul, for your life keep beneath the
rock!
Ellen was interrupted by the same bright vision,
which on the preceding day had stayed another
scarcely less portentous tumult, by exhibiting itself
on the same giddy height where it was now seen.
In the name of Him, who commandeth all, I
implore
you to pauseboth you, who so madly incur
the risk, and you, who so rashly offer to take that
which you never can return! said a sweet,
imploring
voice, in a slightly foreign accent, that instantly
drew all eyes upward.
Inez, Inez! cried the officer, do I again see
you! mine shall you now be, though a million devils
were posted on this rock. Push up, my brave woods
man, and give room for another!
The sudden appearance of the figure from the
tent had created a momentary stupor among the
defendants
of the rock, which might, with suitable
forbearance
have been happily improved; but startled
by the voice of Middleton, the surprised Phbe
discharged
her musket at the female, scarcely knowing
whether she aimed at the life of a mortal or at some
being which belonged to another world. Ellen
uttered
a cry of horror, and then sprang after her
alarmed or wounded friend, she knew not which,
into
the tent.
During this moment of dangerous bye-play, the
sounds of a serious attack were very distinctly
audible
beneath. Paul had profited by the commotion
over his head to change his place so far as to make
room for Middleton. The latter had been followed
by the naturalist, who, in a state of mental
aberration
produced by the report of the musket, had
instinctively
rushed towards the rocks for a cover.
The trapper remained where he was last seen, an
unmoved but close observer of these several
proceedings
.
Though averse to enter into actual
hostilities
,
the old man was, however, far from being
useless. Favoured by his position, he was enabled
to apprise his friends beneath of the movements of
those who plotted their destruction above, and to
advise
and control their advance accordingly.
In the mean time the children of Esther were true
to the spirit they had inherited from their
redoubtable
mother. The instant they found themselves
delivered
from the presence of Ellen and her unknown
companion, they bestowed an undivided attention on
their more masculine and certainly more dangerous
assailants, who by this time had made a complete
lodgment among the crags of the citadel. The
repeated
summons to surrender, which Paul uttered in
a voice that he intended should strike terror to their
young bosoms, were as little heeded as were the calls
of the trapper to abandon a resistance, which might
prove fatal to some among them without offering the
smallest probability of eventual success. Encouraging
each other to persevere, they poised the fragments
of rocks, prepared the lighter missiles for immediate
service, and thrust forward the barrels of the muskets
with a business-like air, and a coolness that would
have done credit to men long practised in the
dangers
of warfare.
Keep under the ledge, said the trapper,
pointing
out to Paul the manner in which he should
proceed
;
keep in your foot more, ladah! you see
the warning was not amiss! had the stone struck it,
the bees would miss their companion for many a
month. Now, namesake of my friend; Uncas, in
name and spirit! now, if you have the activity of
Le Cerf Agile, now you may make a far leap to the
right, and gain good twenty feet of height, without
danger. Beware the bushbeware the bush! 'twill
prove a treacherous hold! Ah! he has done it;
safely and bravely has he done it! Your turn comes
next, friend, that follows the fruits of natur'. Push
you to the left, and you will divide the attention of
the children. Nay, girls, firemy old ears are used
to the whistling of lead; and little reason have I to
prove a doe-heart with fourscore years on my back.
He shook his head with a melancholy smile, but
without
flinching in a muscle, as the bullet which the
exasperated
Hetty fired, passed innocently at no great
distance from the spot where he stood. It is safer
keeping in your track than dodging when a weak
finger
pulls the trigger, he continued; but it is a
solemn sight to witness how much human natur' is
inclined to evil, in one so young! Well done, my
man of beasts and plants! Another such leap, and
you may laugh at all the squatter's bars and walls.
The Doctor has got his temper up! I see it in his
eye, and something good will now come of him!
Keep closer, mankeep closer.
The trapper, though he was not deceived as to the
state of Dr. Battius' mind, was, however, greatly in
error as to the exciting cause. While imitating the
movements of his companions and toiling his way
upward, with the utmost caution, and not without
great inward tribulation of spirit, the eye of the
naturalist had caught a glimpse of an unknown plant,
a few yards above his head, and in a situation more
than commonly exposed to the missiles which the
girls were unceasingly hurling in the direction of the
assailants. Forgetting, in an instant, every thing but
the glory of being the first to give this jewel to the
catalogues of science, he sprang upward at the prize,
with the avidity with which the sparrow darts upon
the butterfly. The rocks, which instantly came
thundering
down, announced that he was seen, and for a
moment, as his form was concealed in the cloud of
dust and fragments which followed the furious
descent
,
the trapper gave him up for lost; but the next
instant he was seen safely seated in a cavity, formed
by some of the projecting stones which had yielded
to the shock, holding triumphantly in his hand the
captured stem, which he was already devouring with
delighted, and certainly not unskilful eyes. Paul
profited by the opportunity. Turning his course
with the quickness of thought, he also sprang to the
post which Obed thus securely occupied, and
unceremoniously
making a footstool of his shoulder as the
latter stooped over his treasure, he bounded through
the breach left by the fallen rock, and gained the
level. He was followed by Middleton, who joined him
in seizing and disarming the girls. In this manner a
bloodless and complete victory was obtained over
that citadel which Ishmael had vainly flattered
himself
might prove impregnable, for the short period
of his absence.
CHAPTER XV.
So smile the heavens upon this holy act,
That after-hours with sorrow chide us not!
Shakspeare
.
It
is proper that the course of the narrative should
be stayed, while we revert to those causes, which
have brought in their train of consequences, the
singular
contest just related. The interruption must
necessarily be as brief as we hope it may prove
satisfactory
to that class of readers, who require that
no gap should be left by those who assume the office
of historians, for their own fertile imaginations to fill.
Among the troops sent by the government of the
Confederacy to take possession of its newly acquired
territory in the west, was a detachment led by the
young soldier who has become so busy an actor in
the scenes of our legend. The mild and indolent
descendants of the ancient colonists received their
new compatriots without distrust, well knowing that
the transfer raised them from the condition of
subjects
,
to the more enviable distinction of citizens in
a government of laws. The new rulers exercised
their functions with discretion and wielded their
delegated
authority without offence. In such a novel
intermixture, however, of men born and nurtured in
freedom, and the compliant minions of absolute
power
,
the catholic and the protestant, the active and the
indolent, some little time was necessary to blend the
discrepant elements of society. In attaining so
desirable
an end, woman was made to perform her
accustomed
and grateful office. The barriers of
prejudice
and religion were broken through by the
irresistible
power of the master-passion, and family unions
ere long began to cement the political tie which had
made a forced conjunction between people so
opposite
in their habits, their educations, and their
opinions.
Middleton was among the first, of the new
possessors
of the soil, who became captive to the charms
of a Louisianian lady. In the immediate vicinity of
the post he had been directed to occupy, dwelt the
chief of one of those ancient colonial families, which
had been content to slumber for ages amid the ease,
indolence and wealth of the Spanish provinces. He
was an officer of the crown, and had been induced
to remove from the Floridas, among the French of
the adjoining province, by a rich succession of which
he had become the inheritor. The name of Don
Augustin de Certavallos was scarcely known beyond
the limits of the little town in which he resided,
though he found a secret pleasure himself in
pointing
it out, in large scrolls of musty documents, to an
only child, as enrolled among the former heroes and
grandees of old and of new Spain. This fact, so
important
to himself and of so little moment to any
body else, was the principal reason, that while his
more vivacious Gallic neighbours were not slow to
open a frank communion with their visiters, he chose
to keep aloof, seemingly content with the society of
his daughter, who was a girl just emerging from the
condition of childhood into that of a woman.
The curiosity of the youthful Inez, however, was
not so entirely inactive. She had not heard the
martial
music of the garrison, melting on the evening air,
nor seen the strange banner, which fluttered over the
heights that rose at no great distance from her
father's
extensive grounds, without experiencing some
of those secret impulses which are thought to
distinguish
her sex. Natural timidity, and that retiring and
perhaps peculiar lassitude, which forms the very
groundwork of female fascination in the tropical
provinces of Spain, held her in their seemingly
indissoluble
bonds; and it is more than probable, that
had not an accident occurred in which Middleton
was of some personal service to her father, so long a
time would have elapsed before they met, that
another
direction might have been given to the wishes
of one who was just of an age to be alive to all the
power of youth and beauty.
Providenceor if that imposing word is too just
to be classical, fatehad otherwise decreed. The
haughty and reserved Don Augustin was by far too
observant of the forms of that station on which he
so much valued himself, to forget the duties of a
gentleman. Gratitude, for the kindness of
Middleton
,
induced him to open his doors to the officers of
the garrison, and to admit of a guarded but polite
intercourse. Reserve gradually gave way before the
propriety and candour of their spirited young leader,
and it was not long ere the affluent planter rejoiced
as much as his daughter, whenever the well known
signal at the gate announced one of these agreeable
visits from the commander of the post.
It is unnecessary to dwell on the impression which
the charms of Inez produced on the soldier, or to
delay
the tale in order to write a wire-drawn account
of the progressive influence that elegance of
deportment
,
manly beauty, and undivided assiduity and
intelligence
were likely to produce on the sensitive
mind of a romantic, warm-hearted, and secluded girl
of sixteen. It is sufficient for our purpose to say
that they loved, that the youth was not backward to
declare his feelings, that he prevailed with some
facility over the scruples of the maiden, and with no
little difficulty over the objections of her father, and
that before the province of Louisiana had been six
months in the possession of the States, the officer of
the latter was the affianced husband of the richest
heiress on the banks of the Mississippi.
Although we have presumed the reader to be
acquainted
with the manner in which such results are
commonly attained, it is not to be supposed that the
triumph of Middleton either over the prejudices of
the father or of those of the daughter was achieved
entirely without difficulty. Religion formed a
stubborn
and nearly irremoveable obstacle with both.
The devoted young man patiently submitted to a
formidable
essay, which father Ignatius was deputed to
make in order to convert him to the true faith. The
effort on the part of the worthy priest was systematic,
vigorous, and long sustained. A dozen times (it was
at those moments when glimpses of the light,
sylphlike
form of Inez flitted like some fairy being past
the scene of their conferences) the good father
fancied
he was on the eve of a glorious triumph over
infidelity; but all his hopes were frustrated by some
unlooked-for opposition on the part of the subject of
his pious labours. So long as the assault on his faith
was distant and feeble, Middleton, who was no great
proficient in polemics, submitted to its effects with
the patience and humility of a martyr; but the
moment
the good father, who felt such concern in his
future happiness, was tempted to improve his vantage
ground by calling in the aid of some of the peculiar
subtilties of his own creed, the young man was too
good a soldier not to make head against the hot
attack
.
He came to the contest, it is true, with no
weapons more formidable than common sense, and
some little knowledge of the habits of his country as
contrasted with that of his adversary; but with these
homebred implements he never failed to repulse the
father with something of the power with which a
nervous cudgel-player would deal with a skilful
master
Vol. I. T
of the rapier, setting at nought his passados by
the direct and unanswerable arguments of a broken
head and a shivered weapon.
Before the controversy was terminated, an inroad
of Protestants had come to aid the soldier. The
reckless freedom of such among them, as thought
only of this life, and the consistent and tempered
piety of others, caused the honest priest to look
about him, in concern. The influence of example
on one hand, and the contamination of too free an
intercourse on the other, began to manifest
themselves
,
even in that portion of his own flock, which
he had supposed to be too thoroughly folded in
spiritual
government ever to stray. It was time to turn
his thoughts from the offensive, and to prepare his
followers to resist the lawless deluge of opinion
which threatened to break down the barriers of their
faith. Like a wise commander, who finds he has
occupied
too much ground for the amount of his force,
he began to curtail his outworks. The relics were
concealed from profane eyes; his people were
admonished
not to speak of miracles before a race that
not only denied their existence, but who had even the
desperate hardihood to challenge their proofs, and
even the bible itself was once more prohibited, with
terrible denunciations, for the triumphant reason that
it was liable to be misinterpreted.
In the mean time it became necessary to report to
Don Augustin the effects his arguments and prayers
had produced on the heretical disposition of the
young soldier. No man is prone to confess his
weakness
at the very moment when circumstances demand
the utmost efforts of his strength. By a species of
pious fraud, for which no doubt the worthy priest
found his absolution in the purity of his motives, he
declared that, while no positive change was actually
wrought in the mind of Middleton, there was every
reason to hope the entering wedge of argument had
been driven to its head, and that in consequence an
opening was left, through which, it might rationally
be hoped, the blessed seeds of a religious
fructification
would find their way, especially if the subject
was left uninterruptedly to enjoy the advantage of
Catholic communion.
Don Augustin himself was now seized with the
desire of proselyting. Even the soft and amiable
Inez thought it would be a glorious consummation of
her wishes to be a humble instrument of bringing
her lover into the bosom of the true church. The
offers of Middleton were promptly accepted, and,
while the father looked forward impatiently to the
day assigned for the nuptials, as to the pledge of his
own success, the daughter thought of it with feelings
in which the holy emotions of her faith were
blended
with the softer sensations of her years and
situation
.
The sun rose the morning of her nuptials on a
day so bright and cloudless, that the sensitive Inez
hailed it as a harbinger of her future happiness.
Father
Ignatius performed the offices of the church, in
a little chapel that was attached to the estate of Don
Augustin, and long ere the sun had begun to fall,
Middleton pressed the blushing and timid young
Creole to his bosom, as his acknowledged and
unalienable
wife. It had pleased the parties to pass the
day of the wedding in retirement, dedicating it
solely
to the best and purest affections, aloof from all the
noisy and ordinarily heartless rejoicings of a
compelled
festivity.
Middleton was returning through the grounds of
Don Augustin from a visit of duty to his
encampment
,
at that hour in which the light of the sun
begins
to melt into the shadows of evening, when a
glimpse of a robe, similar to that in which Inez had
accompanied him to the altar, caught his eye through
the foliage of a retired arbour. He approached the
spot with a delicacy that was rather increased than
diminished by the claim she had perhaps given him
to intrude on her private moments; but the sounds
of her soft voice, which was offering up prayers, in
which he heard himself named by the dearest of all
appellations, overcame his scruples, and induced
him to take a position where he might listen without
the fear of detection. It was certainly grateful to
the feelings of a husband to be able in this manner
to lay bare the spotless soul of his wife, and to find
that his own image lay enshrined amid its purest and
holiest aspirations. His self-esteem was too much
flattered not to induce him to overlook the
immediate
object of the petitioner. While she prayed that
she might become the humble instrument of bringing
him into the flock of the faithful, she petitioned for
forgiveness on her own behalf, if presumption or
indifference
to the counsel of the church had caused
her to set too high a value on her influence, and led
her into the dangerous error of hazarding her own
soul by espousing a heretic. There was so much of
fervent piety, mingled with so strong a burst of
natural
feeling, so much of the woman blended with the
angel in her prayers, that Middleton could have
forgiven
her, had she termed him a Pagan, for the
sweetness and interest with which she petitioned in
his favour.
The young man waited until his bride arose from
her knees, and then he joined her as though entirely
ignorant of what had just occurred.
It is getting late, my Inez, he said, and Don
Augustin would be apt to reproach you with
inattention
to your health in being abroad at such an hour.
What then am I to do, who am charged with all his
authority, and twice his love?
Be like him in
every
thing, she answered,
looking
up in his face with tears in her eyes, and
speaking
with a marked emphasis; in
every
thing.
Imitate
my father, Middleton, and I can ask no more of
you.
Nor
for
me, Inez? I doubt not that I should be
all you can wish, were I to become as good as the
worthy and respectable Don Augustin. But you are
to make some allowances for the infirmities and
habits
of a soldier. Now let us go and join this
excellent
father.
Not yet, said his bride, gently extricating
herself
from the arm, that he had thrown around her
slight form, while he urged her from the place. I
have still another duty to perform, before I can
submit
so implicitly to your orders, soldier though you
are. I promised the worthy Inesella my faithful
nurse, she who, as you heard, has so long been a
mother to me, MiddletonI promised her a visit at
this hour. It is the last, as she thinks, that she can
receive from her own child, and I cannot disappoint
her. Go you then to Don Augustin, and in one
short hour I will rejoin you.
Remember it is but an hour!
One hour, repeated Inez, as she kissed her
hand to him; and then blushing, as if ashamed at
her own boldness, she darted from the arbour, and
was seen for an instant gliding towards the cottage of
her nurse, in which at the next moment she
disappeared
.
Middleton returned slowly and thoughtfully to the
house, often bending his eyes in the direction in
which he had last seen his wife, as if he would fain
trace her lovely form, in the gloom of the evening,
still floating through the vacant space. Don
Augustin
received him with warmth, and for many minutes
his mind was amused by relating to his new kinsman
plans for the future. The exclusive old Spaniard
listened
to his glowing but true account of the
prosperity
and happiness of those States, of which he
had been an ignorant neighbour half his life, partly
T 2
in wonder, and partly with that sort of incredulity
with which one attends to what he fancies are the
exaggerated descriptions of a too partial friendship.
In this manner the hour for which Inez had
conditioned
passed away, much sooner than her husband
could have thought possible in her absence. At
length his looks began to wander to the clock, and
then the minutes were counted, as one rolled by
after
another, and Inez did not yet appear. The hand
had already made half of another circuit around the
face of the dial, when Middleton arose and
announced
his determination to go and offer himself as an
escort to the absentee. He found the night dark,
and the heavens charged with the threatening vapour,
which in that climate was the infallible forerunner
of a gust. Stimulated no less by the unpropitious
aspect of the skies, than by his secret uneasiness, he
quickened his pace, making long and rapid strides in
the direction of the cottage of Inesella. Twenty
times he stopped, fancying that he caught glimpses
of the fairy form of Inez, tripping across the grounds
on her return to the mansion-house, and as often he
was obliged to resume his course in disappointment.
He reached the gate of the cottage, knocked,
opened
the door, entered, and even stood in the presence
of the aged nurse without meeting the person of her
whom he sought. She had already left the place on
her return to her father's house. Believing that he
must have passed her in the darkness, Middleton
retraced
his steps to meet with another disappointment.
Inez had not been seen. Without communicating
his intention to any one, the bridegroom proceeded
with a palpitating heart to the little sequestered
arbour
,
where he had overheard his bride offering up
those petitions for his happiness and conversion.
Here, too, he was disappointed; and then all was
afloat, in the painful incertitude of doubt and
conjecture
.
For many hours a secret distrust of the motives
of his wife caused Middleton to proceed in the
search with delicacy and caution. But as day
dawned
without restoring her to the arms of her father or
her husband, reserve was thrown aside, and her
unaccountable
absence was loudly proclaimed. The
inquiries after the lost Inez were now direct and
open; but they proved equally fruitless. No one
had seen her or heard of her from the moment that
she left the cottage of her nurse.
Day succeeded day, and still no tidings rewarded
the search that was immediately instituted, until she
was finally given over, by most of her relations and
friends, as irretrievably lost.
An event of so extraordinary a character was not
likely to be soon forgotten. It excited speculation,
gave rise to an infinity of rumours, and not a few
inventions
.
The prevalent opinion, among such of
those emigrants who were overrunning the country,
as had time in the multitude of their employments
to think of any foreign concerns, was the simple and
direct conclusion that the absent bride was no more
nor less than a felo de se. Father Ignatius had
many doubts and much secret compunction of
conscience
,
but like a wise chief he endeavoured to
turn the sad event to some account in the
impending
warfare of faith. Changing his battery, he
whispered
in the ears of a few of his oldest parishioners,
that he had been deceived in the state of
Middleton's
mind, which he was now compelled to believe
was completely stranded on the quicksands of heresy.
He began to shew his relics again, and was even
heard to allude once more to the delicate and nearly
forgotten subject of modern miracles. In
consequence
of these demonstrations on the part of the
venerable priest, it came to be whispered among
the faithful, and finally it was adopted, as part of
the parish creed, that Inez had been translated to
heaven.
Don Augustin had all the feelings of a father, but
they were smothered in the lassitude of a Creole.
Like his spiritual governor he began to think that
they had been wrong in consigning one so pure, so
young, so lovely, and above all so pious, to the arms
of a heretic, and he was fain to believe that the
calamity, which had befallen his age, was a judgment
on his presumption and want of adherence to
established
forms. It is true, that as the whispers of the
congregation came to his ears, he found present
consolation
in their belief, but then nature was too
powerful
,
and had too strong a hold of the old man's
heart, not to give rise to the rebellious thought that
the succession of his daughter to the heavenly
inheritance
was a little premature.
But Middleton, the lover, the husband, the
bride-groom
Middleton
was nearly crushed by the weight
of the unexpected and terrible blow. Educated
himself
under the dominion of a simple and rational faith,
in which nothing is attempted to be concealed from
the believers, he could have no other apprehensions
for the fate of Inez than such as grew out of his
knowledge
of the superstitious opinions she entertained
of his own church. It is needless to dwell on the
mental tortures that he endured, or all the various
surmises, hopes and disappointments, that he was
fated to experience in the first few weeks of his
misery
.
A jealous distrust of the motives of Inez, and
a secret, lingering hope that he should yet find her,
had tempered his inquiries, without however
causing
him to abandon them entirely. But time was
beginning to deprive him, even of the mortifying
reflection
that he was intentionally, though perhaps
temporarily, deserted, and he was gradually yielding
to the more painful conviction that she was dead,
when his hopes were suddenly revived in a new and
singular manner.
The young commander was slowly and
sorrowfully
returning from an evening parade of his troops, to
his own quarters, which stood at some little distance
from the place of the encampment, and on the same
high bluff of land, when his vacant eyes fell on the
figure of a man, who by the regulations of the place,
was not entitled to be there at that forbidden hour.
The stranger was meanly dressed, with every
appearance
about his person and countenance of
squalid
poverty and of the most dissolute habits.
Sorrow
had softened the military pride of Middleton,
and, as he passed the crouching form of the intruder,
he said, in tones of great mildness, or rather of
kindness
You will be given a night in the guard-house,
friend, should the patrole find you herethere is a
dollargo, and get a better place to sleep in, and
something to eat!
I swallow all my food, captain, without
chewing
;
returned the vagabond, with the low
exultation
of an accomplished villain, as he eagerly seized
the silver. Make this Mexican twenty, and I will
sell you a secret.
Go, go, said the other with a little of a soldier's
severity, returning to his manner. Go, before I
order
the guard to seize you.
Well, go it is thenbut if I do go, captain, I
shall take my knowledge with me; and then you
may live a widower bewitched till the tattoo of life
is beat off.
What mean you, fellow? exclaimed Middleton,
turning quickly towards the wretch, who was already
dragging his diseased limbs from the place.
I mean to have the value of this dollar in
Spanish
brandy, and then come back and sell you my
secret
for enough to buy a barrel.
If you have any thing to say, speak now;
continued
Middleton, restraining with difficulty the
impatience
that urged him to betray his feelings.
I am a-dry, and I can never talk with elegance
when my throat is husky, captain. How much will
you give to know what I can tell you; let it be
something
handsome; such as one gentleman can offer to
another.
I believe it would be better justice to order the
drummer to pay you a visit, fellow. To what does
your boasted secret relate?
Matrimony; a wife and no wife; a pretty face
and a rich bride; do I speak plain now, captain?
If you know any thing relating to my wife, say
it at once; you need not fear for your reward.
Ay, captain, I have drove many a bargain in my
time, and sometimes I have been paid in money, and
sometimes I have been paid in promises: now the
last are what I call pinching food.
Name your price.
TwentyNo, damn it, it's worth thirty dollars,
if it's worth a cent.
Here, then, is your money; but remember, if
you tell me nothing worth knowing, I have a force
that can easily deprive you of it again, and punish
your insolence in the bargain.
The fellow examined the bank-bills he received
with a jealous eye, and then pocketed them,
apparently
well satisfied of their being genuine.
I like a northern note, he said very coolly;
they have a character to lose like myself. No fear
of me, captain; I am a man of honour, and I shall
not tell you a word more, nor a word less than I
know of my own knowledge to be true.
Proceed then without further delay, or I may
repent
and order you to be deprived of all your gains;
the silver as well as the notes.
Honour, if you die for it! returned the
miscreant
,
holding up a hand in affected horror at so
treacherous a threat. Well, captain, you must
know that gentlemen don't all live by the same
calling
;
some keep what they've got, and some get what
they can.
You have been a thief.
I scorn the word. I have been a humanity
hunter
.
Do you know what that means? Ay, it has
many interpretations. Some people think the
woolly-heads
are miserable, working on hot plantations
under a broiling sunand all such sorts of
inconveniences
.
Well, captain, I have been, in my time, a
man who has been willing to give them the pleasures
of variety, at least, by changing the scene for them.
You understand me?
You are, in plain language, a kidnapper.
Have been, my worthy captainhave been; but
just now a little reduced, like a merchant who leaves
off selling tobacco by the hogshead, to deal in it by
the yard. I have been a soldier, too, in my day.
What is said to be the great secret of our trade, now
can you tell me that?
I know not, said Middleton, beginning to tire of
the fellow's trifling; courage?
No, legslegs to fight with, and legs to run away
withand therein you see my two callings agreed.
My legs are none of the best just now, and without
legs a kidnapper would carry on a losing trade; but
then there are men enough left, better provided than
I am.
Stolen! groaned the horror-struck husband.
On her travels, as sure as you are standing still!
Villain, what reason have you for believing a
thing so shocking?
Hands offhands offdo you think my tongue
can do its work the better for a little squeezing of
the throat! Have patience, and you shall know it
all; but if you treat me so ungenteelly again, I shall
be obliged to call in the assistance of the lawyers.
Say on; but if you utter a single word more or
less than the truth, expect my instant vengeance!
Are you fool enough to believe what such a
scoundrel as I am tells you, captain, unless it has
probability to back it? No, I know you are not:
Therefore I will give my facts and my opinions, and
then leave you to chew on them, while I go and
drink of your generosity. I know a man who is
called
Abiram White.I believe the knave took that
name to shew his enmity to the race of blacks! But
this gentleman is now, and has been for years, to my
certain knowledge, a regular translator of the human
body from one State to another.I have dealt with
him in my time, and a cheating dog he is! No more
honour in him than meat in my stomach.I saw him
here in this very town, the day of your wedding. He
was in company with his wife's brother, and
pretended
to be a settler on the hunt for new land. A noble
set they were, to carry on businessseven sons, each
of them as tall as your sergeant with his cap on.
Well, the moment I heard that your wife was lost, I
saw at once that Abiram had laid his hands on her.
Do you know thiscan this be true? What
reason
have you to fancy a thing so wild?
Reason enough; I know Abiram White. Now,
will you add a trifle just to keep my throat from
parching?
Go, go; you are stupified with drink already,
miserable man, and know not what you say. Go;
go, and beware the drummer.
Experience is a good guideThe fellow called
after the retiring Middleton, and then turning with a
chuckling laugh, like one well satisfied with himself,
he made the best of his way towards the shop of
the suttler.
A hundred times in the course of that night did
Middleton fancy that the communication of the
miscreant
was entitled to some attention, and as often
did he reject the idea as too wild and visionary for
another thought. He was awakened early on the
following morning, after passing a restless and nearly
sleepless night, by his orderly, who came to report
that a man was found dead on the parade, at no
great distance from his quarters. Throwing on his
clothes he proceeded to the spot, and beheld the
individual
,
with whom he had held the preceding
conference
,
in the precise situation in which he had first
been found.
The miserable wretch had fallen a victim to his
intemperance. This revolting fact was sufficiently
proclaimed by his obtruding eye-balls, his bloated
countenance, and the nearly insufferable odours that
were even then exhaling from his carcass.
Disgusted
with the odious spectacle, the youth was turning
from the sight, after ordering the corpse to be
removed
,
when the position of one of the dead man's hands
struck him. On examination, he found the
fore-finger
extended, as if in the act of writing in the sand,
with the following incomplete sentence, nearly
illegible
,
but yet in a state to be deciphered: Captain,
it is true, as I am a gentle He had either died,
or fallen into a sleep which was the forerunner of his
death, before the latter word was finished.
Concealing this fact from the others, Middleton
repeated his orders and departed. The pertinacity
of the deceased, and all the circumstances united,
induced him to set on foot some secret inquiries. He
found that a family, answering the description which
had been given him, had in fact passed the place the
very day of his nuptials: They were traced along
the margin of the Mississippi for some distance,
until
they took boat and ascended the river to its
confluence
with the Missouri. Here they had
disappeared
,
Vol. I. U
like hundreds of others, in pursuit of the hidden
wealth of the interior.
Furnished with these facts, Middleton detailed a
small guard of his most trusty men, took leave of
Don Augustin, without declaring his hopes or his
fears, and having arrived at the indicated point, he
pushed into the wilderness in pursuit. It was not
difficult
to trace a train like that of Ishmael until he
was well assured its object lay far beyond the usual
limits of the settlements. This circumstance in
itself
quickened his suspicions, and gave additional
force to his hopes of final success.
After getting beyond the assistance of verbal
directions
,
the anxious husband had recourse to the
usual signs of a trail, in order to follow the fugitives.
This he also found a task of no difficulty until he
reached the hard and unyielding soil of the rolling
prairies. Here, indeed, he was completely at fault.
He found himself, at length, compelled to separate
his followers, appointing a place of rendezvous at a
distant day, and to endeavour to find the lost trail by
multiplying, as much as possible, the number of his
eyes. He had been alone a week, when accident
brought him in contact with the trapper and the
bee-hunter. Part of their interview has been
related
,
and the reader can readily imagine the
explanations
that succeeded the tale he recounted, and which
led, as has already been seen, to the recovery of his
bride.
CHAPTER XVI.
These likelihoods confirm her flight from hence,
Therefore, I pray you, stay not to discourse,
But mount you presently;
Shakspeare
.
An
hour had slid by, in hasty and nearly
incoherent
questions and answers, before Middleton, hanging
over his recovered treasure with that sort of jealous
watchfulness with which a miser would regard his
hoards, closed the disjointed narrative of his own
proceedings by demanding
And you, my Inez; in what manner were you
treated?
In every thing, but the great injustice they did
in separating me so forcibly from my friends, as well
perhaps as the circumstances of my captors would
allow. I think the man, who is certainly the master
here, is but a new beginner in wickedness. He
quarrelled
frightfully in my presence, with the wretch
who seized me, and then they made an impious
bargain
,
to which I was compelled to acquiesce, and to
which they bound me as well as themselves by oaths.
Ah! Middleton, I fear the heretics are not so
heedful
of their vows as we who are nurtured in the
bosom of the true church!
Believe it not; these villains are of no religion;
did they forswear themselves?
No, not perjured: but was it not awful to call
upon the good God to witness so sinful a compact?
And so we think, Inez, as truly as the most
virtuous
cardinal of Rome. But how did they observe
their oath, and what was its purport?
They conditioned to leave me unmolested, and
free from their odious presence, provided I would
give a pledge to make no effort to escape; and that
I would not even shew myself, until a time that my
masters saw fit to name.
And that time? demanded the impatient
Middleton
,
who so well knew the religious scruples of
his wifeThat time?
It is already passed. I was sworn by my patron
saint, and faithfully did I keep the vow, until the man
they call Ishmael forgot the terms by offering
violence
.
I then made my appearance on the rock,
for the time too was passed; though I even think
father Ignatius would have absolved me from the
vow, on account of the treachery of my keepers.
If he had not, muttered the youth between his
compressed teeth, I would have absolved him
forever
from his spiritual care of your conscience!
You, Middleton! returned his wife looking up
into his flushed face, while a bright blush suffused
her own sweet countenance; you may
receive
my
vows, but surely you can have no power to
absolve
me from their observance!
No, no, no. Inez, you are right. I know but
little of these conscientious subtilties, and I am any
thing but a priest: yet tell me, what has induced
these monsters to play this desperate gameto trifle
thus with my happiness?
You know my ignorance of the world, and how
ill I am qualified to furnish reasons for the conduct
of beings so different from any I have ever seen
before
.
But does not love of money drive men to acts
even worse than this? I believe they thought that
an aged and wealthy father could be tempted to pay
them a rich ransom for his child; and, perhaps, she
added, stealing an inquiring glance, through her
tears, at the attentive Middleton, they counted
something on the fresh affections of a bridegroom.
They might have extracted the blood from my
heart, drop by drop!
Yes, resumed his young and timid wife,
instantly
withdrawing the stolen look she had hazarded, and
hurriedly pursuing the train of the discourse, as if
glad to make him forget the liberty she had just taken,
I have been told, there are men so base as to
perjure themselves at the altar, in order to command
the gold of ignorant and confiding girls; and if love
of money will lead to such baseness, we may surely
expect it will hurry those, who devote themselves to
gain, into acts of lesser fraud.
It must be so; and now Inez, though I am here
to guard you with my life, and we are in possession
of this rock, our difficulties, perhaps our dangers
are not ended. You will summon all your courage
to meet the trial and prove yourself a soldier's wife,
my Inez?
I am ready to depart this instant. The letter,
you sent by the physician, had prepared me to hope
for the best, and I have every thing arranged for flight,
at the shortest warning.
Let us then leave this place and join our friends.
Friends! interrupted Inez, glancing her eyes
around the little tent in quest of the form of Ellen.
I, too, have a friend who must not be forgotten,
but who is pledged to pass the remainder of her life
with us. She is gone!
Middleton gently led her from the spot, as he
smilingly answered
She may have had, like myself, her own private
communications for some favoured ear.
The young man had not however done justice to
the motives of Ellen Wade. The sensitive and
intelligent
girl had readily perceived how little her
presence was necessary in the interview that has
just been related, and had retired with that intuitive
delicacy of feeling which seems to belong more
properly
to her sex. She was now to be seen seated on a
point of the rock, with her person so entirely
enveloped
in her dress as entirely to conceal her features.
U 2
Here she had remained for near an hour, no one
approaching
to address her, and as it appeared to her
own quick and jealous eyes, totally unobserved. In
the latter particular, however, even the vigilance of
the quick-sighted Ellen was deceived.
The first act of Paul Hover, on finding himself the
master of Ishmael's citadel, had been to sound the
note of victory, after the quaint and ludicrous
manner
that is so often practised among the borderers of
the West. Flapping his sides with his hands, as the
conquering game-cock is wont to do with his wings,
he raised a loud and laughable imitation of the
exultation
of this bird; a cry which might have proved
a dangerous challenge had any one of the athletic
sons of the squatter been within hearing.
This has been a regular knock-down and
dragout
,
he cried, and no bones broke! How now,
old trapper, you have been one of your training,
platoon, rank and file soldiers in your day, and have
seen forts taken and batteries stormed before this
am I right?
Ay, ay, that have I, answered the old man, who
still maintained his post at the foot of the rock, so
little disturbed by what he had just witnessed, as to
return the grin of Paul, with a hearty indulgence in
his own silent and peculiar laughter; you have
gone through the exploit like men!
Now tell me, is it not in rule, to call over the
names of the living, and to bury the dead, after
every
bloody battle?
Some did and other some didn't. When Sir
William push'd the German, Dieskau, thro' the
defiles
at the foot of the Hori
Your Sir William was a drone to Sir Paul, and
knew nothing of regularity. So here begins the
roll-call
by-the-bye
old man, what between bee-hunting
and buffaloe humps and certain other matters, I have
been too busy to ask your name, for I intend to begin
with my rear guard, well knowing that my man in
front is too busy to answer.
Lord, lad, I've been called in my time by as
many names as there are people among whom I've
dwelt. Now, the Delawares nam'd me for my eyes,
and I was called after the far-sighted hawk. Then,
ag'in, the settlers in the Otsego hills christened me
anew, from the fashion of my leggings; and various
have been the names by which I have gone through
life; but little will it matter when the time shall
come, that all are to be muster'd, face to face, by
what titles a mortal has played his part! I humbly
trust I shall be able to answer to any of mine in a
loud and manly voice.
Paul paid little or no attention to this reply, more
than half of which was lost in the distance, but
pursuing
the humour of the moment, he called out in a
stentorian voice to the naturalist to answer to his
name. Dr. Battius had not thought it necessary to
push his success beyond the comfortable niche, which
accident had so opportunely formed for his
protection
,
and in which he now reposed from his labours
with a pleasing consciousness of security, added to
great exultation at the possession of the botanical
treasure, already mentioned.
Mount, mount, my worthy mole-catcher! come
and behold the prospect of skirting Ishmael; come
and look nature boldly in the face, and not go
sneaking
any longer, among the prairie grass and mullein
tops, like a gobbler nibbling for grasshoppers.
The mouth of the light-hearted and reckless
bee-hunter
was instantly closed, and he was rendered as
mute, as he had just been boisterous and talkative,
by the appearance of Ellen Wade. When the
melancholy
maiden took her seat on the point of the
rock as mentioned, Paul affected to employ himself
in conducting a close inspection of the household
effects of the squatter. He rummaged the drawers
of Esther with no delicate hands, scattered the
rustic
finery of her girls on the ground, without the
least deference to its quality or elegance, and tossed
her pots and kettles here and there, as though they
had been vessels of wood instead of iron. All this
industry was however manifestly without an object.
He reserved nothing for himself, not even appearing
to be conscious of the nature of the articles which
suffered by his familiarity. When he had examined
the inside of every cabin, taken a fresh survey of the
spot where he had confined the children, and where
he had thoroughly secured them with cords, and
kicked one of the pails of the woman, like a
football
,
fifty feet into the air, in sheer wantonness, he
returned to the edge of the rock, and thrusting both
his hands through his wampum belt, he began to
whistle the `Kentucky Hunters' as diligently as if
he had been hired to supply his auditors with music
by the hour. In this manner passed the remainder
of the time, until Middleton, as has been related, led
Inez forth from the tent, and gave a new direction to
the thoughts of the whole party. He summoned
Paul from his flourish of music, tore the Doctor
from the study of his plant, and, as acknowledged
leader, gave the necessary orders for their immediate
departure.
In the bustle and confusion that were likely to
succeed
such a mandate, there was little opportunity to
indulge in complaints or reflections. As the
adventurers
had not come unprepared for victory, each
individual
employed himself in such offices as was
best adapted to his strength and situation. The
trapper
had already made himself master of the patient
Asinus, who was quietly feeding at no great distance
from the rock, and he was now busy in fitting his
back with the complicated machinery that Dr.
Battius
saw fit to term a saddle of his own invention
The naturalist himself seized upon his port-folios,
herbals, and collection of insects, which he quickly
transferred from the encampment of the squatter to
certain pockets in the aforesaid ingenious invention,
and which the trapper as uniformly cast away the
moment his back was turned. Paul shewed his
dexterity
in removing such light articles as Inez and
Ellen had prepared for their flight to the foot of the
citadel, while Middleton, after mingling threats and
promises, in order to induce the children to remain
quietly in their bondage, assisted the females to
descend
.
As time began to press upon them, and there
was great danger of Ishmael's returning, these
several
movements were made with singular industry and
despatch.
The trapper bestowed such articles as he
conceived
were necessary to the comfort of the weaker and
more delicate members of the party in those
pockets
,
from which he had so unceremoniously expelled
the treasures of the unconscious naturalist, and then
gave way for Middleton to place Inez in one of those
seats, which he had prepared on the back of the
animal for her and her companion.
Go, child, the old man said, motioning to Ellen
to follow the example of the lady, and turning his
head a little anxiously to examine the waste behind
him. It cannot be long afore the owner of this
place will be coming to look after his household;
and he is not a man to give up his property, however
obtained, without complaint!
It is true, cried Middleton; we have wasted
moments that are precious, and have the utmost
need of all our industry.
Ay, ay, I thought it; and would have said it,
captain; but I remembered how your grand'ther
used to love to look upon the face of her he led
away for a wife, in the days of his youth and his
happiness. 'Tis natur', 'tis natur', and 'tis wiser to
give way a little before its feelings, than to try to
stop a current that will have its course.
Ellen advanced to the side of the beast, and
seizing
Inez by the hand, she said, with heart-felt
warmth, after struggling to suppress an emotion that
nearly choked her
God bless you, sweet lady! I hope you will
forget
and forgive the wrongs you have received from
my uncle
The humbled and sorrowful girl could say no
more, her voice becoming entirely inaudible in an
ungovernable burst of grief.
How is this? cried Middleton; did you not
say, Inez, that this excellent young woman was to
accompany us, and to live with us for the remainder
of her life; or, at least, until she found some more
agreeable residence for herself?
I did; and I still hope it. She has always given
me reason to believe, that after having shown so
much commiseration and friendship in my misery,
she would not desert me, should happier times
return
.
I cannotI ought not, continued Ellen, getting
the better of her momentary weakness. It has
pleased God to cast my lot among these people, and
I ought not to quit them. It would be adding the
appearance of treachery to what will already seem
bad enough, with one of his opinions. He has been
kind to me, an orphan, after his rough customs, and
I cannot steal from him at such a moment.
She is just as much a relation of skirting
Ishmael
,
as I am a bishop! said Paul, with a loud hem,
as if his throat wanted clearing. If the old fellow
has done the honest thing by her in giving her a
morsel
of venison, now and then, or a spoon around his
homminy dish, hasn't she pay'd him in teaching the
young devils to read their bible, or in helping old
Esther to put her finery in some shape and fashion.
Tell me that a drone has a sting, and I'll believe you
as easily as I will that this young woman is a debtor
to any of the tribe of Bush!
It is but little matter who owes me, or where I
am in debt. There are none to care for a girl who
is fatherless and motherless, and whose nearest kin
are the offcasts of all honest people. No, no; go,
lady, and Heaven for ever bless you! I am better
here, in this desert, where there are none to know
my shame.
Now, old trapper, retorted Paul, this is what
I call knowing which way the wind blows! You ar'
a man that has seen life, and you know something of
fashions; I put it to your judgment, plainly, isn't it
in the nature of things for the hive to swarm when
the young get their growth, and if children will quit
their parents, ought one who is of no kith nor kin
Hist! interrupted the man he addressed,
Hector
is discontented. Say it out, plainly, pup; what
is it dogwhat is it?
The venerable hound had risen, and was scenting
the fresh breeze which continued to sweep heavily
over the prairie. At the words of his master he
growled and contracted the muscles of his lips, as if
half disposed to threaten with the remnants of his
teeth. The younger dog, who was resting after the
chace of the morning, also made some signs that his
nose detected a taint in the air, and then the two
resumed their slumbers, as though they had done
enough.
The trapper seized the bridle of the ass and
cried
,
as he urged the beast onward
There is no time for words. The squatter an
his brood are within a mile or two of this blessed
spot.
Middleton lost all recollection of Ellen, in the
danger which now so imminently beset his recovered
bride again, nor is it necessary to add that Dr.
Battius
did not wait for a second admonition to
commence
his retreat.
Following the route indicated by the old man,
they turned the rock in a body, and pursued their
way as fast as possible across the prairie, under the
favour of the cover the light afforded.
Paul Hover, however, remained in his tracks,
sullenly
leaning on his rifle. Near a minute had elapsed
before he was observed by Ellen, who had buried
her face in her hands, as if to conceal her fancied
desolation from herself.
Why do you not fly? the weeping girl
exclaimed
,
the instant she perceived that she was not alone.
I'm not used to it.
My uncle will soon be here! you have nothing
to hope from his pity.
Nor from that of his niece, I reckon. Let him
come; he can only knock me on the head.
Paul, Paul, if you love me, fly.
Alone!if I do may I be.
If you value your life, fly!
I value it not, compared to you.
Paul!
Ellen!
She extended both her hands and burst into
another
and a still more violent flood of tears. The
bee-hunter put one of his sturdy arms around her
thin waist, and in another moment he was urging
her over the plain, in rapid pursuit of their flying
friends.
CHAPTER XVII.
Approach the chamber, and destroy your sight
With a new Gorgon:Do not bid me speak;
See, and then speak yourselves.
Shakspeare
The
little run, which supplied, the family of the
squatter with water, and had nourished the trees and
bushes that had grown near the base of the rocky
eminence, took its rise at no great distance from the
latter, in a small thicket of cotton-wood and vines.
Hither, then, the trapper directed the flight, as to the
place affording the only available cover in so
pressing
an emergency. It will be remembered, that the
sagacity of the old man, which, from long practice
in similar scenes, amounted nearly to an instinct in
all cases of sudden danger, had first induced him to
take this course, as it placed the hill between them
and the approaching party of their enemies.
Favoured
by this circumstance he succeeded in
reaching
the bushes in sufficient time, and Paul Hover
had just hurried the breathless Ellen into the
tangled
brush, as Ishmael gained the summit of the
rock, in the manner already described, where he
stood like a man momentarily bereft of his senses,
gazing at the confusion which had been created
among his chattles, or at his gagged and bound
children
,
who had been safely bestowed by the
forethought
of the bee-hunter under the cover of a bark
roof, in a sort of irregular pile. A long rifle would
have thrown a bullet from the height, on which the
squatter now stood, into the very cover where the
fugitives, who had wrought all this mischief, were
clustered.
The trapper was the first to speak, as the man on
whose intelligence and experience they all depended
Vol. I. X
for counsel, after running his eye, over the different
individuals who gathered about him, in order to see
that none were missing.
Ah! natur' is natur', and has done its work!
he said, nodding to the exulting Paul, with a smile
of approbation. I thought it would be hard for
those, who had so often met in fair and foul, by
starlight
and under the clouded moon, to part at last in
anger. Now is there little time to lose in talk, and
every thing to gain by industry! It cannot be long
afore some of yonder brood will be nosing along the
'arth for our trail, and should they find it, as find it
they surely will, and should they push us to stand on
our courage, the dispute must be settled with the
rifle; which may He in heaven forbid! Captain,
can you lead us to the place where any of your
warriors
lie?For the stout sons of the squatter will
make a manly brush of it, or I am but little of a
judge in warlike dispositions!
The place of rendezvous is many leagues from
this on the banks of La Platte.
It is badit is bad. If fighting is to be done, it
is always wise to enter on it on equal terms. But
what has one so near his time to do with ill-blood
and hot-blood at his heart! Listen to what a gray
head and some experience have to offer, and then if
any among you can point out a wiser fashion for a
retreat, we can just follow his design, and forget that
I have spoken. This thicket stretches for near a
mile, as it may be slanting, from the rock, and leads
towards the sunset instead of the settlements.
Enough, enough, cried Middleton, too
impatient
to wait until the deliberative and perhaps
loquacious
old man could end his minute explanation.
Time is too precious for words. Let us fly.
The trapper made a gesture of compliance, and
turning in his tracks, he led Asinus across the
trembling
earth of the swale and quickly emerged on the
hard ground, on the side opposite to the
encampment
of the squatter.
If old Ishmael gets a squint at that highway
through the brush, cried Paul, casting, as he left
the place, a hasty glance at the broad trail the party
had made through the thicket, he'll need no
finger-board
to tell him which way his road lies. But let
him follow! I know the vagabond would gladly
cross his breed with a little honest blood, but if any
son of his ever gets to be the husband of
Hush, Paul, hush, said the blushing and
terrified
young woman, who leaned on his arm for support,
your voice might be heard.
The bee-hunter was silent, though he did not cease
to cast certain ominous looks behind him, as they
flew along the edge of the run, which sufficiently
betrayed
the belligerent condition of his mind. As
each one was busy for himself, but a few minutes
elapsed before the party rose a swell of the prairie
and descending without a moment's delay on the
opposite
side, they were at once removed from every
danger of being seen by the sons of Ishmael, unless
the pursuers should happen to fall upon their trail.
The old man now profited by the formation of the
land to take another direction, with a view to elude
pursuit, as a vessel changes her course in fogs and
darkness, to escape from the vigilance of her
enemies
.
Two hours, passed in the utmost diligence, had
enabled them to make a half circuit around the
rock, and to reach a point that was exactly opposite
to the original direction of their flight. To most of
the fugitives their situation was as entirely unknown
as is that of a ship in the middle of the ocean to the
uninstructed voyager: but the old man proceeded at
every turn, and through every bottom, with a
decision
that inspired his followers with confidence, as it
spoke favourably of his own knowledge of the
localities
.
His hound, stopping now and then, to catch
the expression of his eye, had preceded the trapper
throughout the whole distance, with as much
certainty
as though a previous and intelligible communion
between them had established the route by which
they were to proceed. But at the expiration of the
time just named, the dog suddenly came to a stand,
and then seating himself on the prairie, he snuffed
the air a moment, and began a low and piteous
whining.
Aypupay. I know the spotI know the
spot, and reason there is to remember it well! said
the old man, stopping by the side of his uneasy
associate
,
until those who followed had time to come up.
Now, yonder, is a thicket before us, he continued,
pointing forward, where we may lie till tall trees
grow on these naked fields, afore any of the
squatter's
kin will venture to molest us.
This is the spot, where the body of the dead
man lay! cried Middleton, examining the place
with an eye that revolted at the recollection.
The very same. But whether his friends have
put him in the bosom of the ground or not, remains
to be seen. The hound knows the scent, but seems
to be a little at a loss, too. It is therefore necessary
that you advance, friend bee-hunter, to examine,
while I tarry to keep the dogs from complaining in
too loud a voice.
I! exclaimed Paul, thrusting his hand into his
shaggy locks, like one who thought it prudent to
hesitate
before he undertook so formidable an
adventure
;
Now heark'ee, old trapper; I've stood in my
thinnest cottons in the midst of many a swarm that
has lost its queen-bee, without winking, and let me
tell you, the man who can do that, is not likely to
fear any living son of skirting Ishmael; but as to
meddling with dead men's bones, why it is neither
my calling nor my inclination; so, after thanking
you for the favour of your choice, as they say, when
they make a man a corporal in the Kentucky militia,
I decline serving.
The old man turned a disappointed look towards
Middleton, who was too much occupied in solacing
Inez to observe his embarrassment, which was,
however
,
suddenly relieved from a quarter, whence, from
previous circumstances, there was little reason to
expect such a demonstration of fortitude.
Doctor Battius had rendered himself a little
remarkable
,
throughout the whole of the preceding
retreat
,
for the exceeding diligence with which he had
laboured to effect that desirable object. So very
conspicuous
was his zeal indeed, as to have entirely
gotten
the better of all his ordinary predilections. The
worthy naturalist belonged to that species of
discoverers
,
who make the worst possible
travelling-companions
to a man who has reason to be in a hurry.
No stone, no bush, no plant is ever suffered to
escape
the examination of their vigilant eyes, and
thunder may mutter, and rain fall, without disturbing
the pleasing abstraction of their reveries. Not so,
however, with the disciple of Linnus, during the
momentous period that it remained a mooted point
at the tribunal of his better judgment, whether the
stout descendants of the squatter were not likely to
dispute his right to traverse the prairie in freedom.
The highest blooded and best trained hound, with
his game in view, could not have run with an eye
more riveted than that with which the Doctor had
pursued his curvilinear course. It was perhaps lucky
for his fortitude that he was ignorant of the artifice
of the trapper in leading them around the citadel of
Ishmael, and that he had imbibed the soothing
impression
that every inch of prairie he traversed was
just so much added to the distance between his own
person and the detested rock. Notwithstanding the
momentary shock he certainly experienced, when he
X 2
discovered this error, he was the man who now so
boldly volunteered to enter the thicket in which
there was some reason to believe the body of the
murdered Asa still lay. Perhaps the naturalist was
urged to show his spirit, on this occasion, by some
secret consciousness that his excessive industry in the
retreat might be liable to misconstruction; and it is
certain that, whatever might be his peculiar notions
of danger from the quick, his habits and his
knowledge
had placed him far above the apprehension of
suffering harm from any communication with the
dead.
If there is any service to be performed, which
requires the perfect command of the nervous
system
,
said the man of science, with a look that was
slightly blustering, you have only to give a
direction
to his intellectual faculties, and here stands one
on whose physical powers you may depend.
The man is given to speak in parables,
muttered
the single-minded trapper, but I conclude there
is always some meaning hidden in his words, though
it is as hard to find sense in his speeches, as to
discover
three eagles on the same tree. It will be wise,
friend, to make a cover, lest the sons of the squatter
should be out skirting on our trail, and, as you well
know, there is some reason to fear yonder thicket
contains a sight that may horrify a woman's mind.
Are you man enough to look death in the face; or
shall I run the risk of the hounds raising an outcry,
and go in myself? You see the pup is willing to run
with an open mouth, already.
Am I man enough? Venerable trapper, our
communications have a recent origin, or thy
interrogatory
might have a tendency to embroil us in an
angry disputation. Am I man enough? I claim to
be of the
class,
mammalia;
order,
primates;
genus,
homo! such are my physical attributes; of my moral
properties, let posterity speak; it becomes me to
be mute.
Physic may do for such as relish it; to my taste
and judgment it is neither palatable nor healthy; but
morals never did harm to any living mortal, be it
that he was a sojourner in the forest or a dweller in
the midst of glazed windows and smoking chimneys.
It is only a few hard words that divide us, friend,
for I am of an opinion that, with use and freedom,
we should come to understand one another, and
mainly settle down into the same judgments of
mankind
,
and of the ways of the world. Quiet, Hector,
quiet; what ruffles your temper, pup; is it not used
to the scent of human blood?
The Doctor bestowed a gracious but
commiserating
smile on the philosopher of nature, as he
retrograded
a step or two from the place whither he had
been impelled by his excess of spirit, in order to
reply
with less expenditure of breath and with a
greater
freedom of air and attitude.
A homo is certainly a homo, he said, stretching
forth an arm in an imposing and argumentative
manner
;
so far as the animal functions extend, there
are the connecting links of harmony, order,
conformity
and design between the whole genus; but there
the resemblance ends. Man may be degraded to the
very margin of the line which separates him from
the brute, by ignorance; or he may be elevated to a
communion with the great master-spirit of all, by
knowledge; nay I know not, if time and opportunity
were given him, but he might become the master of
all learning, and consequently equal to the great
moving principle.
The old man, who stood leaning on his rifle in
a thoughtful attitude, shook his head, as he answered
with a native steadiness, that entirely eclipsed the
imposing air which his antagonist had seen fit to
assume
`This is neither more than less than mortal
wickedness
!
Here have I been a dweller on the earth
for fourscore and six changes of the seasons, and all
that time have I look'd at the growing and the dying
trees, and yet do I not know the reasons why the bud
starts under the summer sun, or the leaf falls when
it is pinch'd by the frosts. Your l'arning, though it
is man's boast, is folly in the eyes of Him, who sits
in the clouds, and looks down, in sorrow, at the pride
and vanity of his creatur's. Many is the hour that
I've passed, lying in the shades of the woods, or
stretch'd upon the hills of these open fields, looking
up into the blue skies, where I could fancy the Great
One had taken his stand, and was solemnizing on the
waywardness of man and brute, below, as I myself
had often look'd at the ants tumbling over each other
in their eagerness, though in a way and a fashion
more suited to His mightiness and power.
Knowledge
!
It is his plaything. Say, you who think it
so easy to climb into the judgment-seat above, can
you tell me any thing of the beginning and the end?
Nay, you're a dealer in ailings and cures: what is
life, and what is death? Why does the eagle live so
long, and why is the time of the butterfly so short?
Tell me a simpler thing: why is this hound so
uneasy
,
while you, who have passed your days in
looking
into books, can see no reason to be disturbed?
The Doctor, who had been a little astounded by
the dignity and energy of the old man, drew a long
breath, like a sullen wrestler who is just released
from the throttling grasp of his antagonist, and
seized
on the opportunity of the pause to reply
It is his instinct.
And what is the gift of instinct?
An inferior gradation of reason. A sort of
mysterious
combination of thought and matter.
And what is that which you call thought?
Venerable venator, this is a method of reasoning
which sets at nought the uses of definitions, and
such as I do assure you is not at all tolerated in the
schools.
Then is there more cunning in your schools than
I had thought, for it is a certain method of showing
them their vanity; returned the trapper, suddenly
abandoning a discussion, from which the naturalist
was just beginning to anticipate great delight, by
turning to his dog, whose restlessness he attempted
to appease by playing with his ears. This is
foolish
,
Hector; more like an untrained pup than a
sensible
hound; one who has got his education by hard
experience, and not by nosing over the trails of other
dogs, as a boy in the settlements follows on the track
of his masters, be it right or be it wrong. Well,
friend; you who can do so much, are you equal to
looking into the thicket? or must I go in myself?
The Doctor again assumed his air of resolution,
and, without further parlance, proceeded to do as
desired. The dogs were so far restrained, by the
remonstrances
of the old man, as to confine their noise
to low but often-repeated whinings. When they saw
the naturalist advance, the pup, however, broke
through all restraint, and made a swift circuit around
his person, scenting the earth as he proceeded, and
then, returning to his companion, he howled aloud.
The squatter and his brood have left a strong
scent on the earth, said the old man, watching as he
spoke for some signal from his learned pioneer to
follow; I hope yonder-school bred man knows
enough to remember the errand on which I have
sent him.
Doctor Battius had already disappeared in the
bushes, and the trapper was beginning to betray
additional
evidences of impatience, when the person of
the former was seen retiring from the thicket
backwards
,
with his face fastened on the place he had
just left as though his look was bound in the
thraldom
of some charm.
Here is something skeary, by the wildness of the
creatur's countenance! exclaimed the old man
relinquishing
his hold of Hector, and moving stoutly
to the side of the totally unconscious naturalist.
How is it, friend; have you found a new leaf in
your book of wisdom?
It is a basilisk! muttered the Doctor, whose
altered visage betrayed the utter confusion which
had beset his faculties. An animal of the
order
serpens. I had thought its attributes were fabulous,
but mighty nature is equal to all that man can
imagine!
What is't? What is't? The snakes of the
prairies
are harmless, unless it be now and then an
angered
rattler, and he always gives you notice with his
tail, afore he works his mischief with his fangs.
Lord, Lord, what a humbling thing is fear! Here is
one who in common delivers words too big for a
humble mouth to hold, so much beside himself, that
his voice is as shrill as the whistle of the
whip-poor-will
!
Courage! what is it, man? what is it?
A prodigy! a lusus natur! a monster, that
nature
has delighted to form in order to exhibit her
power! Never before have I witnessed such an
utter
confusion in her laws, or a specimen that so
completely
bids defiance to the distinctions of
class
and
genera
. Let me record its appearance, fumbling
for his tablets with hands that trembled too much to
perform their office, while time and opportunity
are allowed
eyes
, enthrallling;
colour
, various
complex
,
and profound
One would think the man was craz'd, with his
enthralling looks and pieball'd colours!
interrupted
the discontented trapper, who began to grow a
little uneasy that his party was all this time
neglecting
to seek the protection of some cover. If there
is a reptile in the brush, show me the creatur', and
should it refuse to depart peaceably, why there must
be a quarrel for the possession of the place.
There! said the Doctor, pointing into a dense
mass of the thicket, to a spot within fifty feet of where
they both stood. The trapper turned his look, with
perfect composure, in the required direction, but the
instant his keen and practised glance met the object
which had so utterly upset the philosophy of the
naturalist, he gave a start himself, and threw his rifle
rapidly forward, and as instantly recovered it, as
though a second flash of thought convinced him he
was wrong. Neither the instinctive movement nor
the sudden recollection was without a sufficient
object
.
At the very margin of the thicket, and in
absolute
contact with the earth, lay an animate ball,
that might easily, by the singularity and fierceness of
its aspect, have justified the disturbed condition of
the naturalist's mind. It were difficult to describe
the shape or colours of this extraordinary substance,
except to say, in general terms, that it was nearly
spherical, and exhibited all the hues of the rainbow,
intermingled without reference to harmony, and
without any very ostensible design. The
predominant
hues were a black and a bright vermilion.
With these, however, the several tints of white,
yellow
,
and crimson, were strangely and wildly blended.
Had this been all, it would have been difficult to
have pronounced that the object was possessed of
life, for it lay as motionless as any stone; but a pair
of dark, glaring, and moving eyeballs which watched
with jealousy the smallest movements of the trapper
and his companion, sufficiently established the
important
fact of its possessing vitality.
Your reptile is a scouter, or I'm no judge of
Indian
paints and Indian deviltries! muttered the old
man, dropping the butt of his weapon to the ground,
and gazing with a steady eye at the frightful object,
as he leaned on its barrel, in an attitude of great
composure. He wants to face us out of sight and
reason, and make us think the head of a red-skin is
a stone covered with the autumn leaf; or he has
some other devilish artifice in his mind!
Is the animal human? demanded the Doctor,
of the
genus,
homo? I had fancied it a
non-descript
.
It's as human, and as mortal too, as a warrior of
these prairies is ever known to be. I have seen the
time when a red-skin would have shewn a foolish
daring to peep out of his ambushment in that fashion
on a hunter I could name, but who is too old now,
and too near his time, to be any thing better than a
miserable trapper. It will be well to speak to the
imp, and to let him know he deals with men whose
beards are grown. Come forth from your cover,
friend, he continued in the language of the
extensive
tribes of the Dahcotahs; there is room on the
prairie for another warrior.
The eyes appeared to glare more fiercely than
before, but the mass which, according to the
trapper's
opinion, was neither more nor less than a
human
head, shorn, as usual among the warriors of the
west, of its hair, still continued without motion or
any other sign of life.
It is a mistake! exclaimed the Doctor. The
animal is not even of the
class,
Mammalia, much
less a man.
So much for your knowledge! returned the
trapper, laughing with great inward exultation. So
much for the l'arning of one who has look'd into so
many books, that his eyes are not able to tell a moose
from a wild-cat. Now my Hector, here, is a dog of
education after his fashion, and, though the meanest
primer in the settlements would puzzle his
information
,
you could not cheat the hound in a matter
like this. As you think the object an't a man, you
shall see his whole formation, and then let an
ignorant
old trapper, who never willingly pass'd a day
within reach of a spelling-book in his life, know by
what name to call it. Mind, I mean no violence;
but just to start the devil from his ambushment.
The trapper now very deliberately examined the
priming of his rifle, taking care to make as great a
parade as possible of his hostile intentions, in going
through the necessary evolutions with the weapon.
When he thought the stranger began to apprehend
some danger, he very deliberately presented the
piece, and called aloud
Now, friend, I am all for peace, or all for war, as
you may say. No! well it
is
no man, as the wiser
one, here, says, and there can be no harm in just
firing into a bunch of leaves.
The muzzle of the rifle fell as he concluded, and
the weapon was gradually settling into a steady, and
what would easily have proved a fatal aim, when a
tall Indian sprang from beneath that bed of leaves
and brush, which he had probably collected about
his person at the approach of the party, and stood
upright, uttering the sententious exclamation,
Wagh!
END OF VOLUME I.